_	As for Alan—a man who faced the probability that Galloway would be partitioned between his legitimate daughters on his eventual death—the marital alliance may have been conducted as a means to ensure a power base for Thomas, whose illegitimacy threatened to exclude him from inheriting his father's domain under the feudal laws of the English and Scottish realms.
_	After choosing a box at random and withdrawing one coin at random that happens to be a gold coin, the question is what is the probability that the other coin is gold.
_	It indicates the probability that very low ability individuals will get this item correct by chance, mathematically represented as a lower asymptote.
_	After his sentencing on the charge of planting drugs on Gewertz, Turner stated that he had no intention of dropping out of the race, saying "I intend to win, and I expect the Senate to seat me", despite the probability that the Senate would deny him the right to serve in office, even if he won the seat.
_	Let formula_32 be the probability that the agent guesses formula_25 when using an optimal measurement strategy
_	Most simply, is the number of collisions that result in a reaction per second, is the number of collisions (leading to a reaction or not) per second occurring with the proper orientation to react and formula_3 is the probability that any given collision will result in a reaction.
_	where is the probability that and .
_	Absolute efficiency values represent the probability that a gamma ray of a specified energy passing through the detector will interact and be detected.
_	Thus, for a red light (r) to carry the information that a goal (s) has been scored (is F) is for the probability that a goal has been scored, given that the light is red (and given my background knowledge of the world, k), to be 1 (but less than 1 given just my background knowledge).
_	He used as an example the probability that John Smith, a consumptive Englishman aged fifty, will live to sixty-one.
_	If the configuration space is continuous (something like the real line or Euclidean space, see above), then there are no valid quantum states corresponding to particular , and the probability that the system is "in the state " will always be zero.
_	In simple words, MDA provides the probability that the under study forecasting method can detect the correct direction of the time series.
_	The answer to why there was so little assimilation of Jews in central and eastern Europe for so long would seem to lie in part in the probability that the alien surroundings in central and eastern Europe were not conducive, though contempt did not prevent some assimilation.
_	The probability that the strategy produces a correct guess on input formula_6 is given by formula_11 and the probability that it produces a wrong guess is given by formula_12.
_	If the spatial subchannels are sufficiently uncorrelated from each other, the probability that the receiver(s) will obtain linearly independent combinations (and therefore obtain innovative information) approaches
_	The anime takes place in a dystopia where it is possible to instantaneously measure a person's mental state, personality, and the probability that a person will commit crimes with a device installed on each citizen's body called the Psycho-Pass.
_	In other words, if we select a node with degree formula_27, and then select one of its neighbors randomly, the probability that this randomly selected neighbor will have degree formula_28 is given by the expression formula_29 above.
_	Let formula_56 denote the probability that Eve survives in the broodtree formula_57 given by the above process.
_	During a five-impulse train, assuming that the last impulse in the train cannot autoinhibit the Ca influx during the train, the expectation value of n can be found by solving [(1 − 0.019)] =(1 − 0.5), i.e. the probability that there will be no local release, given n varicosities within the diffusion range.
_	That is, for such an formula_1, the probability that the sequence of flips of a fair coin will wind up in formula_1 is not well-defined.
_	the probability that it is 1 is therefore
_	If the mutation rate (to go from the "B" to the "A" allele) in the population is "u" then the rate with which one member of the population will mutate to "A" is given by and the rate with which the whole population goes from all "B" to all "A" is the rate that a single mutant "A" arises times the probability that it will take over the population ("fixation probability"):
_	Suppose that an item has survived for a time t and we desire the probability that it will not survive for an additional time "dt":
_	As a consequence, the higher copy number of this region increases the probability that genes encoding host-association factors will be horizontally transferred.
_	the probability that the needle will cross a line is
_	A statement in the language of graphs is true in this theory if and only if the probability that an "n"-vertex random graph models the statement tends to 1 in the limit as "n" goes to infinity.
_	Based on the differences in the gravity of offenses between the Eight Rules and the pāyantika dharmas, she also asserts the probability that the Eight Rules might have been added later.
_	The goal is to compute , the probability that at least two people in the room have the same birthday.
_	However, it is simpler to calculate , the probability that no two people in the room have the same birthday.
_	Moreover, because multiple phosphorylations are required, the probability that Sic1 is degraded by random is small.
_	The difference in meaning between this and the probabilistic sense can be seen from an example: if careful assays before and after indicate that a procedure has inactivated 90% of the biological agents in some unit, then the procedure can be correctly reported to have achieved a 1-log reduction, even though the probability that the unit is sterile is not 90% but 0.
_	Given the observed percentage difference "p" − "q" (2% or 0.02) and the standard error of the difference calculated above (.03), any statistical calculator may be used to calculate the probability that a sample from a normal distribution with mean 0.02 and standard deviation 0.03 is greater than 0.
_	In addition, the sheer number of red dwarfs, which account for about 85% of at least 100 billion stars in the Milky Way, statistically increases the probability that there might exist habitable planets orbiting some of them.
_	Here, formula_13 is the probability that a person comes in contact with another person in one time-step and that that contact results in disease transmission.
_	A commitment scheme "Commit" is formula_7 secure, if for all algorithms that run in time "t" and output formula_8 the probability that formula_5 and formula_10 is at most formula_11.
_	For any , the expected value of is simply the probability that all of the
_	They found that the transcription factor CREB modulates the probability that individual amygdala neurons become involved in storing a specific emotional memory: higher levels of CREB increase this probability while lower levels of CREB have the opposite effect.
_	After training, the word probabilities (also known as likelihood functions) are used to compute the probability that an email with a particular set of words in it belongs to either category.
_	Thompson sampling consists in playing the action formula_15 according to the probability that it maximizes the expected reward, i.e.
_	Suppose he is able to produce a random number, let's call it "Z", such that the probability that "Z" is larger than any particular quantity "z" is exp(-"z").
_	If one takes an element in formula_66, let say formula_70 then the probability that formula_71 is
_	In the 19th and 20th centuries, the desired number of pregnancies has declined as reductions in infant and childhood mortality have increased the probability that children will reach adulthood.
_	The amplitude of measuring a photon at distance "x" from the center of the screen is the sum of these two amplitudes coming out of each hole, and therefore the probability that a photon is detected at position "x" will be given by the square of this sum:
_	Similarly, if Alice measures spin in a direction and Bob measures in c direction, the probability that both
_	The dotted line in Figure 1 shows the optimal probability that player Y plays 'Stag' (in the y-axis), as a function of the probability that player X plays Stag (shown in the x-axis).
_	In Figure 2 the dotted line shows the optimal probability that player X plays 'Stag' (shown in the x-axis), as a function of the probability that player Y plays Stag (shown in the y-axis).
_	Being part of a group dilutes an individual’s risk of being attacked, as the more group members there are, the lower the probability that that individual will be the victim.
_	To get a feeling for the probability that the vibration of molecule may be thermally excited,
_	If rather than 365 days there are , if there are persons, and if , then using the same approach as above we achieve the result that if is the probability that at least two out of people share the same birthday from a set of available days, then:
_	The models estimate the probability that a person chooses a particular alternative.
_	English cosmologist and astrophysicist Martin Rees calculated an upper limit of 1 in 50 million for the probability that the Large Hadron Collider will produce a global catastrophe or black hole.
_	Simply, the probability that all formula_13 nodes fail is formula_75, which is a low probability; so with high probability at least one of them is alive and the node will have the correct pointer.
_	For this reason, a computational system is under study which takes X-ray photographs of the fruit while they run on conveyor belts, and which is also able to analyse (by data mining techniques) the taken pictures and estimate the probability that the fruit contains watercores.
_	The odds are defined as the probability that a particular outcome is a case divided by the probability that it is a noncase.
_	The selection of a prime modulus results in improved "mixing" (error patterns are detected with more uniform probability, improving the probability that the least detectable patterns will be detected, which tends to dominate overall performance).
_	It expresses the probability that one state will pass a test to identify as the other.
_	The conclusion Fields reached is that the probability that the princes were, in fact, murdered is about 50% to 70%, and if they were, the probability that Richard did it is in the same range, so the logical probability that Richard is guilty is 25% to 49%, which is less than 50-50.
_	Brzezinski later claimed that "We didn't push the Russians to intervene, but we knowingly increased the probability that they would."
_	In this formula, if formula_43 refers to the graph's degree distribution (i.e., the probability that a node has degree "k") then formula_44.
_	Information like this and via methods like the predecessor attack and intersection attack helps an attacker increase the probability that a user sent the message.
_	By a process similar to that outlined in the Maxwell–Boltzmann statistics article, it can be shown thermodynamically that formula_81 and formula_82 where formula_83 is the chemical potential, "k" is Boltzmann's constant and "T" is the temperature, so that finally, the probability that a state will be occupied is:
_	For an arbitrary cutoff "r", the probability that the best applicant is selected is
_	that is, the probability that one finds no significant differences in making p-1 independent tests, each at protection level formula_59, is formula_64, under the hypothesis that all p population means are equal.
_	The final Report of the Condon Committee, which otherwise concluded that UFOs were simple misidentifications of natural phenomena or aircraft, took an unusual position on the case: "In conclusion, although conventional or natural explanations certainly cannot be ruled out, the probability of such seems low in this case and the probability that at least one genuine UFO was involved appears to be fairly high".
_	So even if the wheel has landed on red in ten or a hundred consecutive spins, the probability that the next spin will be black is still no more than 48.6% (assuming a "fair" European wheel with only one green zero; it would be exactly 50% if there were no green zero and the wheel were fair, and 47.4% for a fair American wheel with one green "0" and one green "00").
_	As described by Ginsberg, Dr.Fill works by converting a crossword to a weighted constraint satisfaction problem and then attempting to maximize the probability that the fill is correct.
_	It gives a bound on the probability that a stochastic process exceeds any given value over a given interval of time.
_	The intuition of this result is that out of every hundred students (60 boys and 40 girls), since we observe trousers the student is one of the 80 students who wear these (60 boys and 20 girls); since 20/80 = 1/4 of these are girls, the probability that the student in trousers is a girl is 1/4.
_	From these frequencies a set of probability parameters were derived for the appearance of each amino acid in each secondary structure type, and these parameters are used to predict the probability that a given sequence of amino acids would form a helix, a beta strand, or a turn in a protein.
_	Fitness in this model is the probability that an individual survives to reproduce.
_	According to the results of estimating the probability that each income group will remain in the same class for the whole household from 2011 to 12, it is 29.8% for low income class, 38.2% for middle class and 32.0% for high income class.
_	Blanchard et al. argued that the fraternal birth order effect (the probability that a boy will be homosexual increases with the number of older brothers who have the same biological mother) appears to be limited to right-handed men.
_	In other words, the problem is equivalent to asking the question "What is the probability that I will pick a box with two coins of the same color?".
_	When comparing percentages, it can accordingly be useful to consider the probability that one percentage is higher than another.
_	While credit rating agencies are sometimes viewed as interchangeable, Moody's, S&P and Fitch in fact rate bonds differently; for example, S&P and Fitch Ratings measure the probability that a security will default, while Moody's ratings seek to measure the expected losses in the event of a default.
_	Like the closely related Scheffé's method in the analysis of variance, which considers all possible contrasts, the Working–Hotelling procedure considers all possible values of the independent variables; that is, in a particular regression model, the probability that all the Working–Hotelling confidence intervals cover the true value of the mean response is the confidence coefficient.
_	According to this paper, "order flow toxicity" can be measured as the probability that informed traders (e.g., hedge funds) adversely select uninformed traders (e.g., market makers).
_	For citizens outside the nationalist right the period around the Oslo Accords represented a time when negotiation over territory became acceptable on the understanding that the alternative was the probability that Israel would have to lose either its liberal democracy or Zionist identity.
_	Stigma – and fear of being stigmatized – increase the probability that people avoid taking an HIV test, disclosing their serostatus to partners or potential partners, requesting care and adhering to treatment.
_	The original problem is to find the probability that the first candidate is always strictly ahead in the vote count.
_	One may instead consider the problem of finding the probability that the second candidate is never ahead (that is, with ties are allowed).
_	Given that formula_8 is received, the probability that the codeword is incorrectly detected as formula_9 is:
_	The expected gain from building is exactly 1 times the probability that the other player does NOT build.
_	The appellate court cited precedent that "malice" as used in California's "Exemplary damages" code included "not only a malicious intention to injure the specific person harmed, but conduct evincing 'a conscious disregard of the probability that the actor's conduct will result in injury to others.'"
_	This is the probability that squared sum of formula_57 independent normally distributed variables of zero mean and unit variance will be greater than T, namely that formula_1 with formula_57 degrees of freedom is larger than T.
_	Then, when testing membership of an element not in the set, for the array position given by any of the "k" hash functions, the probability that the bit is found set to 1 is formula_6.
_	So the probability that all "k" hash functions find their bit set to 1 is formula_7.
_	Further, the expected value of "q" is the probability that a given array position is left untouched by each of the "k" hash functions for each of the "n" items, which is (as above)
_	The relation between the Survival probability and the FPTD is as follows(the probability that a particle has reached the absorption point between times formula_14 and formula_27 is formula_28.
_	The integral of "f" over any window of time (not only infinitesimal windows but also large windows) is the probability that the bacterium dies in that window.
_	Thus the probability that the particle is in the volume at is
_	Likewise, extension to weighted networks, or networks with heterogeneous transmission probabilities, is a matter of adjusting the normalization of formula_11 to include the probability that that cluster forms.
_	The law – which prohibited carcinogenic substances in food, no matter how low the probability that they would in fact result in cancer – led to the substitution of those substances by ingredients that, while not causing cancer, stood a far greater chance of causing some sort of medical harm.
_	Then, the probability that the patient actually has the disease given the positive test result is
_	It can be viewed as the probability that a relevant document is retrieved by the query.
_	The measure equals the probability that two entities taken at random from the dataset of interest represent the same type.
_	Now, the probability that a codeword formula_80 associated with a fixed message formula_81 lies in a Hamming ball formula_82 is given by
_	Repricing risk also refers to the probability that the yield curve will move in a way that influence by the values of securities tied to interest rates -- especially, bonds and market securities.
_	In the computer science subfield of algorithmic information theory, a Chaitin constant (Chaitin omega number) or halting probability is a real number that, informally speaking, represents the probability that a randomly constructed program will halt.
_	Chaitin has defined Chaitin's constant Ω, a real number whose digits are equidistributed and which is sometimes informally described as an expression of the probability that a random program will halt.
_	If the wire is an infinite line, under conditions that the vacuum does not have winding number fluctuations which are coherent throughout the system, the conservation law is a superselection rule --- the probability that the winding will unwind is zero.
_	An example of when such approach would be necessary is a situation in which an experimenter bends a coin slightly and tosses it once, recording whether it comes up heads, and is then given the task of predicting the probability that the next flip comes up heads.
_	In optical spectroscopy, the quantum yield is the probability that a given quantum state is formed from the system initially prepared in some other quantum state.
_	Despite the probability that the original jack may have been a simple striped flag, since about 1880, this jack has traditionally been depicted as consisting of thirteen red and white stripes charged with an uncoiled rattlesnake and the motto "Dont Tread on Me" ["sic"]; this tradition dates at least back to 1880, when this design appeared in a color plate in Admiral George Henry Preble's influential "History of the Flag of the United States".
_	The judge must also ensure that the jury does not confuse the match probability (the probability that a person that is chosen at random has a matching DNA profile to the sample from the scene) with the probability that a person with matching DNA committed the crime.
_	In cold fusion reactions (which use heavier projectiles, typically from the fourth period, and lighter targets, usually lead and bismuth), the fused nuclei produced have a relatively low excitation energy (~10–20 MeV), which decreases the probability that these products will undergo fission reactions.
_	Notice that the probability that a bid wins an auction can be estimated from a data set of completed auctions, where all bids are observed.
_	The purpose of dive planning is to increase the probability that a dive will be completed safely and the goals achieved.
_	As before, we would like to calculate the probability that our system has energy formula_1.
_	Through eliminating infants of another species in the same environment, the probability that the aggressor and their own infants will obtain more resources increases.
_	In probability theory, Markov's inequality gives an upper bound for the probability that a non-negative function of a random variable is greater than or equal to some positive constant.
_	Using the adjacent diagram, the probability that individuals "B" and "C" have received autozygous alleles from ancestor "A" is "1/2" (one out of the two diploid alleles).
_	This can be viewed as the probability that two random gametes from ancestor A carry autozygous alleles, and in that context is called the "coefficient of parentage" ( f ).
_	To qualify as a probability distribution, the assignment of values must satisfy the requirement that if you look at a collection of mutually exclusive events (events that contain no common results, e.g., the events {1,6}, {3}, and {2,4} are all mutually exclusive), the probability that any of these events occurs is given by the sum of the probabilities of the events.
_	The "value" of each element of the partition is the probability that the object is located there.
_	The theorem states that, in systems away from equilibrium over a finite time "t", the ratio between the probability that formula_1 takes on a value "A" and the probability that it takes the opposite value, −"A", will be exponential in "At".
_	The 1/3–2/3 conjecture states that, under this probability distribution, there exists a pair of elements "x" and "y" such that the probability that "x" is earlier than "y" in a random linear extension is between 1/3 and 2/3.
_	The greater a company's brand equity, the greater the probability that the company will use a family branding strategy rather than an individual branding strategy.
_	New species ("balls") are added as old ones speciate (i.e., split in two) and, assuming that new species belong to the same genus as their parent (except for those that start new genera), the probability that a new species is added to a genus will be proportional to the number of species the genus already has.
_	(Since ' is so short, the probability that two or more will leave during is very small and will be ignored.)
_	or, equivalently, the expected value of the logarithm of the probability that a microstate will be occupied
_	PSPs are deemed excitatory if they increase the probability that an action potential will occur, and inhibitory if they decrease the chances.
_	Software reliability is the probability that software will work properly in a specified environment and for a given amount of time.
_	Although biased, PPM is provably consistent, meaning that as the number of samples goes to infinity, the bias error goes to zero, and the probability that the estimate is correct reaches one.
_	The Holm–Bonferroni method is one of many approaches that control the family-wise error rate (the probability that one or more Type I errors will occur) by adjusting the rejection criteria of each of the individual hypotheses or comparisons.
_	It is easier to first calculate the probability that all birthdays are "different".
_	These items are allowed to remain on the backside of the mound at the discretion of the umpire, thus reducing the probability that they will affect a live play.
_	The number of people required so that the probability that some pair will have a birthday separated by days or fewer will be higher than 50% is:
_	In a paper from 2010, exact formula for the probability that the mafia wins was found.
_	The quarterback factor is adjusted for the probability that the quarterback will start, injuries, rookies, and trades.
_	In particular, if the formula_31 are eigenstates (with eigenvalues "c") of an observable, and that observable is measured on the normalized state formula_32, then the probability that the result of the measurement is "k" is |"c"|.
_	The difference equations for the probability that the system is in state "k" at time "t" are,
_	To put this "to the test", we ask for the probability that the length is less than 4.
_	Tittle (1995: 142) proposed a control balance theory contending that the "amount of control to which people are subject relative to the amount of control they can exercise affects their general probability of committing some deviant acts as well as the probability that they will commit specific types of deviance".
_	The proportion of graphs with n vertices that are in A equals the probability that a random graph with n vertices (chosen with the uniform distribution) is in A, and choosing a graph in this way has the same outcome as generating a graph by flipping a coin for each pair of vertices to decide whether to connect them.
_	Therefore, equivalently to the preceding definition, A contains almost all graphs if the probability that a coin flip-generated graph with n vertices is in A tends to 1 as n tends to infinity.
_	More generally, the "moment method" consists of bounding the probability that a random variable fluctuates far from its mean, by using its moments.
_	A neurotransmitter influences trans-membrane ion flow either to increase (excitatory) or to decrease (inhibitory) the probability that the cell with which it comes in contact will produce an action potential.
_	Each of these individual outcomes has probability zero, yet the probability that the outcome will fall into the interval is nonzero.
_	This apparent paradox is resolved by the fact that the probability that "X" attains some value within an infinite set, such as an interval, cannot be found by naively adding the probabilities for individual values.
_	In cold fusion reactions (which use heavier projectiles, typically from the fourth period, and lighter targets, usually lead and bismuth), the produced fused nuclei have a relatively low excitation energy (~10–20 MeV), which decreases the probability that these products will undergo fission reactions.
_	Ewens's sampling formula, introduced by Warren Ewens, states that under certain conditions (specified below), if a random sample of "n" gametes is taken from a population and classified according to the gene at a particular locus then the probability that there are "a" alleles represented once in the sample, and "a" alleles represented twice, and so on, is
_	“If Libyans choose to fight each other instead of uniting, they risk increasing the probability that ISIL and other violent extremists in its mould will be back," he said.
_	In particular, it is an elegant application of the inclusion–exclusion principle to show that the probability that there are no fixed points approaches 1/"e".
_	Because there are more oxygen molecules outside the cell, the probability that oxygen molecules will enter the cell is higher than the probability that oxygen molecules will leave the cell.
_	By definition, all assumptions introduce possibilities for error; if an assumption does not improve the accuracy of a theory, its only effect is to increase the probability that the overall theory is wrong.
_	It is common to use a log-odds representation of the probability that each grid cell is occupied.
_	That is, the probability that any event will "not" happen (or the event's complement) is 1 minus the probability that it will.
_	Kinship is the probability that two alleles will be identical by descent when one allele is taken randomly from each mating individual.
_	More precisely, with this data structure, for every inverse-quasipolynomial probability , there is a constant such that the probability that there exists an operation that exceeds time is at most .
_	"where B is the benefit to the recipient, C is the cost to the altruist (both measured as the number of offspring gained or lost) and r is the coefficient of relationship (i.e. the probability that they share the same gene by descent)."
_	Advocates of a Bayesian approach sometimes claim that the goal of a researcher is most often to objectively assess the probability that a hypothesis is true based on the data they have collected.
_	An adversary's advantage is the difference between the adversary's probability of breaking the system and the probability that the system can be broken by simply guessing.
_	Eugene Volokh says, "I think the most useful definition of a slippery slope is one that covers all situations where decision A, which you might find appealing, ends up materially increasing the probability that others will bring about decision B, which you oppose."
_	Let formula_24 be the probability that strategy profile formula_
_	One study computed the probability that the pattern of vowels in the singular would predict the pattern in the broken plural (or vice versa) and found values ranging from 20% to 100% for different patterns.
_	Larger frames are more likely to suffer undetected errors with the simple CRC32 error detection used in Ethernet frames — a larger amount of data increases the probability that several errors cancel each other out.
_	In this example, it should be easy to relate to the difference between the conditional probabilities "P"(positive | ill) which with the assumed probabilities is 99%, and "P"(ill | positive) which is 50%: the first is the probability that an individual who has the disease tests positive; the second is the probability that an individual who tests positive actually has the disease.
_	For well-understood faults the probability that a segment may rupture during the next few decades can be estimated.
_	Specifically, ISKME’s study of authors who created content within the open repository Connexions revealed how as content creation group size increased beyond one author, the probability that users stayed with Connexions (and continued to create content) increased with it (Petrides et al., 2008).
_	Since the first four tosses turn up heads, the probability that the next toss is a head is:
_	Therefore, methods of statistical hypothesis testing are used to determine the probability that an earthquake such as is predicted would happen anyway (the null hypothesis).
_	The pairwise error probability formula_7 is defined as the probability that, when formula_1 is transmitted, formula_2 is received.
_	Probabilistic forecasts, which give estimates of the probability that the seasonal mean will be above, near, or below normal are also provided for the 1-3 and 2-4 month periods.
_	By Dixon's theorem, the probability that the largest factor of such a number is less than ("p" − 1) is roughly "ε"; so there is a probability of about 3 = 1/27 that a "B" value of "n" will yield a factorisation.
_	So formula_66 is the probability that a "single" random variable formula_1 is smaller than formula_68, and formula_69 is the "average number" of random variables that are smaller than formula_68.
_	PVA is a process that can help determine the probability that a species will go extinct within a given number of years.
_	Now, the probability that the measurement results in each string formula_106 is
_	In other words, given formula_169, for formula_170, not all zero, what is the probability that the formula_163’s we chose satisfies formula_172?
_	formula_56 is the probability that a life age formula_41 will survive to age formula_49.
_	what is the probability that this is the predominantly red bag?
_	The cross section is proportional to the probability that an interaction will occur; for example in a simple scattering experiment the number of particles scattered per unit of time (current of scattered particles ) depends only on the number of incident particles per unit of time (current of incident particles ), the characteristics of target (for example the number of particles per unit of surface ), and the type of interaction.
_	The probability that any randomly selected neighbor is of degree k is the probability that the neighbor is connected to k-1 additional agents of the remaining N-2 agents and is given by:
_	Cliff Figallo and Nancy Rhine, the authors of the 2012 book "Building the Knowledge Management Network: Best Practices, Tools, and Techniques for Putting Conversation to Work", said that the actual United Airlines website exhibited "a heightened attention to customer service" and that "Maybe these improvements" may have happened without pressure from Untied.com but that "the probability that disgruntled customers on the Web will find a way to raise their voices in unison should be a sobering reality to all businesses."
_	Notably in Case 02 in Section IV, Chapter 2 the report said of the 1956 Lakenheath-Bentwaters incident: "In conclusion, although conventional or natural explanations certainly cannot be ruled out, the probability of such seems low in this case and the probability that at least one genuine UFO was involved appears to be fairly high."
_	If the intervals are statistically independent from each other, the probability that at least one interval does not contain the population parameter is 99.4%.
_	The function codice_13 calculates the probability that there are x events in an interval, where the argument "poissonLambda" is the average number of events per interval.
_	If you and your friend repeat this "proof" multiple times (e.g. 128), your friend should become convinced ("completeness") that the balls are indeed differently coloured; otherwise, the probability that you would have randomly succeeded at identifying all the switch/non-switches is close to zero ("soundness").
_	Essentially, they ask themselves this: "Based on what I know about the candidate personally, what is the probability that this presidential candidate was a good governor?
_	What is the probability that he will be a good president?"
_	In QM, predictions are formulated in terms of probabilities — for example, the probability that an electron will be detected in a particular place, or the probability that its spin is up or down.
_	This does "not" imply that the probability that the true value is in the confidence interval is 95%.
_	In those with four out of five of the following: pulsating headache, duration of 4–72 hours, pain on one side of the head, nausea, or symptoms that interfere with the person's life, the probability that this is a migraine is 92%.
_	In other words, the probability that a random variable assumes a value depends on the other random variables only through the ones that are its immediate neighbours.
_	This method consists of plotting the logarithm of an estimator of the probability that a particular number of the distribution occurs versus the logarithm of that particular number.
_	Surprises, in part, manifest themselves in changes in the probability that some conceived-of event will take place, such that contingency plans are in place to respond to tactical warnings.
_	When asked to guess the probability that the Blue Bus Company was responsible for the accident, participants from both groups correctly reported an average 80% chance.
_	As single mothers were responsible for both supporting their families and raising children, government assistance would reduce the probability that they could be charged with neglecting their "home duties".
_	Now we don't know the state at the initial starting point, we don't know the transition probabilities between the two states and we don't know the probability that the chicken lays an egg given a particular state.
_	Indeed, despite widespread censorship of social media, we find that when the Chinese people write scathing criticisms of their government and its leaders, the probability that their post will be censored does not increase.
_	Given random variables "X", "Y", ..., that are defined on a probability space, the joint probability distribution for "X", "Y", ... is a probability distribution that gives the probability that each of "X", "Y", ... falls in any particular range or discrete set of values specified for that variable.
_	Because the kinks are in thermal equilibrium, the probability that a kink resides in any rotational conformation is given by a Boltzmann distribution and we may associate an entropy with its end-to-end distance.
_	Under this scenario, given the initial batch of 10 observations resulted in an insignificant result, the probability that the experiment will be stopped at some finite sample size, formula_21, can be bounded using Boole's inequality
_	Under the assumption of uniform hashing, given a hash function h, and a hash table of size m, the probability that two non-equal elements will hash to the same slot is
_	In real-life situations, particles in solution do not have a fixed size, resulting in the probability that a particle that would otherwise be hampered by a pore passing right by it.
_	One represents the likelihood that a subgroup of a specific size will emerge; the other is the probability that it will persist.
_	For the later part of the 16th century, peace was ensured by the probability that James VI of Scotland, who was raised as a Protestant and was the son of Mary, Queen of Scots, would become King of England on the death of Elizabeth.
_	For any given finite problem, the probability that the simulated annealing algorithm terminates with a global optimal solution approaches 1 as the annealing schedule is extended.
_	Therefore, their "relationship" can be "quantified" on the basis of the probability that they each have inherited a copy of an allele from the common ancestor.
_	In earlier sections, the "Inbreeding coefficient" has been defined as, "the probability that two "same" alleles ( A and A, or a and a ) have a common origin"—or, more formally, "The probability that two homologous alleles are autozygous."
_	It is obvious, however, that this probability of autozygosity for an individual must also be the probability that each of its "two parents" had this autozygous allele.
_	Subjects are asked to estimate the probability that the urn contains predominantly blue chips.
_	Using Bayes' rule, the probability that a blue chip is drawn given that the urn contains predominantly blue chips is equal to the probability of the urn being predominantly blue multiplied by the probability of the urn being predominantly blue given that a blue chip was drawn, all divided by the probability that the urn is predominantly blue.
_	When the connectivity changes, possibly due to the loss of a unit or the failure of equipment, the relay automatically takes this into account and modifies message routing in an attempt to maintain the probability that messages get to their addressees.
_	That is, the survival function is the probability that the time of death is later than some specified time "t".
_	By placing the fission fuel in water, the probability that the neutrons will cause fission in another U-235 is greatly increased, which means the level of enrichment needed to reach criticality is greatly reduced.
_	Let "P"(A) denote "the probability that A is true".
_	It was developed by the researchers (Wickens et al., 2001) as a model of scanning behavior describing the probability that a given area of interest will attract attention (AOI).
_	Since every quadratic residue modulo "N" has four square roots, the probability that the receiver learns "m" is 1/2.
_	Moreover, let formula_17 be the probability that formula_15 on input formula_12 a formula_4-bit long sequence selected uniformly at random in formula_21.
_	In quantum mechanics, the unit sphere of the Hilbert space "H" is interpreted as the set of possible states Φ of a quantum system, the measurable space "X" is the value space for some quantum property of the system (an "observable"), and the projection-valued measure π expresses the probability that the observable takes on various values.
_	As thongs pass between the buttocks and, in women, may be in close contact with the anus and labia, concerns have been raised that they may become damp and act as a conduit for germ transfer, increasing the probability that the wearer may develop urinary tract infections, such as cystitis.
_	Koh et al. (2004) use a "nomographic model of affiliate extinctions", which estimates the probability that the extinction of a species leads to the extinction of its mutualist, for a given estimate of the specificity of the mutualism.
_	Statistical significance indicates the probability that an alignment of a given quality could arise by chance, but does not indicate how much superior a given alignment is to alternative alignments of the same sequences.
_	Columnists stated that Johnston would be suited to face difficult constitutional choices, given the probability that the Canadian parliament's minority status would continue well after the start of his tenure as viceroy.
_	The term false discovery rate (FDR) was used by Colquhoun (2014) to mean the probability that a "significant" result was a false positive.
_	However, the probability that something has occurred in contradiction of all past experience should always be judged to be less than the probability that either ones senses have deceived one, or the person recounting the miraculous occurrence is lying or mistaken.
_	In addition to risk of infection, cross-immunity may modulate the probability that a host becomes infectious and the duration that a host remains infectious.
_	The approach equals that of plotting the points according to the probability that the last of () randomly drawn values will not exceed the -th smallest of the first randomly drawn values.
_	GABA is an inhibitory neurotransmitter that decreases the probability that the target neuron will send a subsequent signal.
_	In PBIL, genes are represented as real values in the range [0,1], indicating the probability that any particular allele appears in that gene.
_	If the item was made by the first machine, then the probability that it is defective is 0.05; that is, "P"("B" | "A") = 0.05. Overall, we have
_	He writes, "As heretical as it may sound, there is the probability that Negro poets, dependent as they are on the English language, may have more to gain from the rich background of English and American poetry than form the nebulous atavistic yearnings towards an African inheritance."
_	Suppose the cumulative distribution function of the buyer is formula_1, defined as the probability that the seller's valuation is less than formula_2.
_	Assuming that the points needed for estimating a model are selected independently, formula_4 is the probability that all "n" points are inliers and formula_5 is the probability that at least one of the points is an outlier, a case which implies that a bad model will be estimated from this point set.
_	That probability to the power of is the probability that the algorithm never selects a set of points which all are inliers and this must be the same as formula_6.
_	For each edge formula_28 of the search graph, the transition probability is defined as the probability that the simulated annealing algorithm will move to state formula_2 when its current state is formula_1.
_	A string "s" is compressed to the shortest byte string representing a base 256 big-endian number "x" in the range [0, 1] such that P("r" < "s") ≤ "x" < P("r" ≤ "s"), where P("r" < "s") is the probability that a random string "r" with the same length as "s" will be lexicographically less than "s".
_	and the probability that there actually is no disease:
_	The competition challenged contestants to build a model that predicts the probability that a driver will initiate an auto insurance claim in the next year.
_	(It was found to contain no propaganda leaflets: only Łobodowski's poetry manuscripts and fragments were present, a circumstance explainable by the probability that the leaflets in question may form part of the as yet unopened French military archives instead.)
_	These biases can be thought of as a probability distribution that contains the probability that each possible hypothesis is likely to be correct.
_	where P(1) is the probability that the next bit will be a 1, P(1) is the probability estimated by the "i"-th model, and
_	For example, a classifier (for example "k"-means), takes a vector of features (decision variables) and outputs for each possible classification result the probability that the vector belongs to the class.
_	Given a subset "A" of "G", the measure can be thought of as answering the question: what is the probability that a random element of "G" is in "A"?
_	In addition, the availability of a telescope is believed to increase the probability that the mission will be launched at all.
_	The Simpson index equals 1/"D" and quantifies the probability that two individuals taken at random from the dataset (with replacement of the first individual before taking the second) represent the same species.
_	The Gini-Simpson index equals 1 - 1/"D" and quantifies the probability that the two randomly taken individuals represent different species.
_	Some systems have a larger database that gives the probability that the output is the expected output.
_	The choice of the code parameters is related to the probability that a random syndrome is decodable.
_	What is the probability that more than "t" sample trials are needed to collect all "n" coupons?
_	Note that this probability of making an incorrect decision is "not" the probability that the null hypothesis is true, nor whether any specific alternative hypothesis is true.
_	As an analogy, when a die has landed the outcome is certain by 100%, but the probability that it Would Have Occurred In the First Place (hereafter abbreviated WHOIFP) is still 1/6.
_	In the same way, the probability that a presentation or condition would have occurred in the first place in an individual (WHOIFPI) is not same as the probability that the presentation or condition "has" occurred in the individual, because the presentation "has" occurred by 100% certainty in the individual.
_	However, an atlas can also include richer information, such as local image statistics and the probability that a particular spatial location has a certain label.
_	If a young tree, or seedling is infected by the mistletoe the probability that the tree will die is great, in one study it was determined that 50% of infected seedlings will die over 12 years and the survivors will often be bush like and not develop properly.
_	formula_2 is the probability that the host will survive formula_3 predators; whereas formula_4 is that they will not, bearing in mind the parasitoid eventually will hatch into larva and escape.
_	Consequently, Susan calculates the probability that three (or any number of consecutive heads) were tossed with the unfair coin must be 0; if still more heads are thrown, Susan does not change her probability.
_	In cold fusion reactions, the produced fused nuclei have a relatively low excitation energy (~10–20 MeV), which decreases the probability that these products will undergo fission reactions.
_	The image included a chart listing the probability that the suspect had the traits he was assigned.
_	Now, if "a", "b" are any real constants (not both zero!) then the probability that formula_36 is found by the same integral as above, but with the bounding line formula_37.
_	The Dvoretzky–Kiefer–Wolfowitz inequality bounds the probability that the random function "F" differs from "F" by more than a given constant "ε" >
_	The proliferation of these technologies will increase the probability that future forces will face sophisticated improvised weapons quickly engineered to mitigate US technological overmatch.
_	The last few hundred years of capitalist history learns us that on longer horizons the probability that equities have a negative return is much lower.
_	The first is formula_65, or the probability that a random jump will occur.
_	The inequality states that the probability that the estimated and true values differ by more than is bounded by .
_	Similarly, the probability that hypercalcemia is caused by cancer in the individual can be calculated as:
_	In probability theory and statistics, the cumulative distribution function (CDF, also cumulative density function) of a real-valued random variable "X", or just distribution function of "X", evaluated at "x", is the probability that "X" will take a value less than or equal to "x".
_	If formula_54 is the rule that assigns a winner among two candidates given their relative orders in the votes, then the probability that there is a Condorcet winner given a uniformly random vote is formula_122, from which the theorem easily follows.
_	Using 130 years of data on historical migrations to the United States, one study finds "that a doubling of the number of residents with ancestry from a given foreign country relative to the mean increases by 4.2 percentage points the probability that at least one local firm invests in that country, and increases by 31% the number of employees at domestic recipients of FDI from that country.
_	Assume that Charles knows that the function is of the form formula_59 and he knows Ana's message formula_60 but he does not know the key "x" then the probability that Charles can change the message or send his own message can be explained by the following theorem.
_	Ivacaftor, a CFTR potentiator, improves the transport of chloride through the ion channel by binding to the channels directly to induce a non-conventional mode of gating which in turn increases the probability that the channel is open.
_	The survival probability is the probability that no jump has occurred in the interval .
_	In the context of a binary variable, a simple statistical measure of risk is simply the probability that a variable will take on the lower of two values.
_	For such a set of sequences to be "universally" measurable, on the other hand, an arbitrarily "biased" coin may be used—even one that can "remember" the sequence of flips that has gone before—and the probability that the sequence of its flips ends up in the set must be well-defined.
_	If we assume that one end of the chain is at the origin, then the probability that a block of size formula_74 around the origin will contain the other end of the chain, formula_75, assuming a Gaussian probability density function, is
_	Using this information, the expected value of the greatest common divisor function can be seen (informally) to not exist when "k" = 2. In this case the probability that the gcd equals "d" is "d"/ζ(2), and since ζ(2) = π/6 we have
_	As in other forms of linear regression, multinomial logistic regression uses a linear predictor function formula_2 to predict the probability that observation "i" has outcome "k", of the following form:
_	However, in September 2015, a new case of polio virus (strand: VDPV, short for Vaccine-derived Polio Virus) has popped up again, resulting in a serious national issue since the probability that polio would spread throughout the country was extremely high (considering the low rates of health care).
_	These extra nutrients in the sperm are assimilated by the female and are thought to enhance the fitness of the offspring produced, thus increasing the probability that a male passes on its genes.
_	It is traditionally defined as the process that determines the probability that a population will go extinct within a given number of years.
_	The statistical criticisms were threefold: firstly, Meadow was accused of applying the so-called prosecutor's fallacy in which the probability of "cause given effect" (i.e. the true likelihood of a suspect's innocence) is confused with that of "effect given cause" (the probability that an innocent person would lose two children in this manner).
_	If 3% of the electric bulbs manufactured by a company are defective find the probability that in a sample of 100 bulbs exactly 5 bulbs are defective.
_	Thus, if the codeword is corrupted in at most a formula_19 fraction of locations, by the union bound, the probability that the algorithm samples only uncorrupted coordinates (and thus correctly recovers the bit) is at least formula_154.
_	One study found that the probability that seizures will occur within 5 years of injury is in 0.5% of mild traumatic brain injuries (defined as no skull fracture and less than 30 minutes of post-traumatic amnesia, abbreviated PTA, or loss of consciousness, abbreviated LOC); 1.2% of moderate injuries (skull fracture or PTA or LOC lasting between 30 minutes and 24 hours); and 10.0% of severe injuries (cerebral contusion, intracranial hematoma, or LOC or PTA for over 24 hours).
_	Historically, the US was home to some six or more sign languages (that number rising with the probability that Plains Sign Talk is actually a language family with several languages under its umbrella) which has fallen with the death of several of these.
_	He writes, “It is obvious that every single thing or event has an indefinite number of properties or attributes observable in it, and might therefore be considered as belonging to an indefinite number of different classes of things”, leading to problems with how to assign probabilities to a single case, for example the probability that John Smith, a consumptive Englishman aged fifty, will live to sixty-one.
_	0. It thus gives the probability that a value of "t" less than that calculated from observed data would occur by chance.
_	For the statistic "t", with ν degrees of freedom, "A"("t"|ν) is the probability that "t" would be less than the observed value if the two means were the same (provided that the smaller mean is subtracted from the larger, so that "t" ≥ 0).
_	When the probability that the event will not happen is greater than the probability that it will, then the odds are "against" that event happening.
_	To determine the rate of fusion reactions, the value of most interest is the cross section, which describes the probability that particle with fuse by giving a characteristic area of interaction.
_	In probability theory, the Vysochanskij–Petunin inequality gives a lower bound for the probability that a random variable with finite variance lies within a certain number of standard deviations of the variable's mean, or equivalently an upper bound for the probability that it lies further away.
_	where formula_2 is the probability that context formula_3 is active, given that item formula_4 has occurred (this is obtained simply by dividing the raw frequency, formula_5 by the total of the item vector, formula_6).
_	However, the plane through the first three points forms a subset of measure zero of the cube, and the probability that the fourth point lies on this plane is zero.
_	In addition, the increasing size of the EU increases the probability that there will be third parties who consider that an EU trade mark application conflicts with their trade mark rights, and oppose the application accordingly.
_	Given certain relatively weak conditions on the shape of the free space, PRM is provably probabilistically complete, meaning that as the number of sampled points increases without bound, the probability that the algorithm will not find a path if one exists approaches zero.
_	Recall that formula_121, the probability that there are at most "k" successes.
_	Devised as an answer to the improved Soviet anti-ballistic missile defences around Moscow, the system increased the probability that at least one warhead would penetrate Moscow's anti-ballistic missile (ABM) defences, something which the Royal Navy's earlier UGM-27 Polaris re-entry vehicles (RV)s were thought to be unlikely to do.
_	It follows that the probability that a random element lies on a cycle of length "m" is
_	Fisher claimed that the probability that "μ" − "μ" is in this interval, given the data (ultimately the "X"s) is the probability that a Behrens–Fisher-distributed random variable is between −"A" and "A".
_	Given formula_2, the probability that a neighbor takes action 1 is:
_	A concordance rate is a statistical measure of probability - if one twin has a specific trait or disease, what is the probability that the other twin has (or will develop) that same trait or disease.
_	The main idea behind LORA is to route connection requests away from congested areas of the network, increasing the probability that connection requests will be accepted.
_	If we use this to check the probability that a newborn is more likely to be a boy than a girl, i.e., formula_47, we find
_	Dendritic excitability is thought to contribute to E-S potentiation, or an increase in the probability that a given input will result in the firing of an action potential.
_	Using data from Kepler, a correlation has been found between the metallicity of a star and the probability that the star host planets.
_	Chang was already regarded as the second-most powerful person in North Korea and his appointment strengthened the probability that Kim's third son, Kim Jong-un, would succeed him.
_	where "P(i,j)" denotes the probability that a point belongs to both the cluster formula_9 in "U" and cluster formula_10 in "V":
_	If the standard measure on consists of atoms only (we shall call such sets "discrete"), and specifies the measure of any equal to , then an integral over is simply a sum and defines the value of the probability measure on the set }, in other words, the probability that the quantum system is in the state .
_	Thus, Plantinga argued, the probability that our minds are reliable under a conjunction of philosophical naturalism and naturalistic evolution is low or inscrutable.
_	The photoconductive gain formula_6 is the probability that an excited electron contributes to the photocurrent—or more generally, the number of electrons in the external circuit, divided by the number of quantum well electrons that absorb a photon.
_	The reason for this is that the more independent variables are included in a regression, the greater the probability that one or more will be found to be statistically significant while in fact having no causal effect on the dependent variable—that is, the more likely the results are to be afflicted with Type I error.
_	An evolutionary stable state S is also stochastically stable if under vanishing noise the probability that the population is in the vicinity of state S does not go to zero.
_	Given a pair of individuals and drawn from some population, it estimates the probability that the pairwise comparison turns out true, as
_	A central question has regarded the probability that a tomb might contain the specific group of names as the Talpiot Tomb.
_	Let "p"(1) be the probability that a member of the investigated population shows symptom "s" and "p"(0) be the probability that a member of the investigated population does not show symptom "s".
_	During an ideal measurement of a quantum mechanical system, the probability that a system collapses from a given initial state to a particular eigenstate is given by the square of the absolute value of the probability amplitudes between the initial and final states.
_	The simulation results show the probability that the retirement plan will be successful.
_	This Hamiltonian is exactly similar to that of a two state system with unperturbed energies formula_39 & formula_40 with a perturbation expressed by formula_41; According to Rabi oscillation, starting with formula_25 state, a dipole in parallel to formula_16 with energy formula_19, the probability that it will transit to formula_45 state (i.e. it will flip) is
_	Impaction also increases as the size of the liquid droplet decreases because the presence of more droplets within the vessel increases the probability that particles will impact on the droplets.
_	The "simultaneous coverage probability" of a collection of confidence intervals is the probability that all of them cover their corresponding true values simultaneously.
_	In the example above, the simultaneous coverage probability is the probability that the intervals for "x" = 18,19... all cover their true values (assuming that 18 is the youngest age at which a person can vote).
_	Then the probability that "T" is less than 2.132 is 95% or Pr(−∞ < "T" < 2.132) = 0.95; this also means that Pr(−2.132 < "T" < 2.132) = 0.9.
_	Thus, letting "d"("u") denote the degree of "u", the probability that "u" is added to "S" is at least 1/("d"("u")+1).
_	The reciprocal of is the probability that any three positive integers, chosen at random, will be relatively prime (in the sense that as goes to infinity, the probability that three positive integers less than chosen uniformly at random will be relatively prime approaches this value).
_	Let formula_4 be the probability that the kth event is interesting.
_	It follows from this assumption that the expected value of a series of bets is equal to the sum, over all bets that could potentially occur in the series, of the expected value of a potential bet times the probability that the player will make that bet.
_	This is not the same as the probability that those parameters are the right ones, given the observed sample.
_	If we attempt to model the probability that formula_63 is 0 or 1 with the function formula_69, we take our likelihood function assuming that all the samples are independent,
_	The laws of genetics indicate the probability that the legendary audacity and love of adventure can appear again in the lineage of the feudal lords.
_	Coordinated effects arise where, under certain market conditions (e.g., market transparency, product homogeneity etc.), the merger increases the probability that, post merger, merging parties and their competitors will successfully be able to coordinate their behaviour in an anti-competitive way, for example, by raising prices.
_	The Born rule (also called the Born law, Born's rule, or Born's law) formulated by German physicist Max Born in 1926, is a law of quantum mechanics giving the probability that a measurement on a quantum system will yield a given result.
_	A hazard is the probability that a patient fails between formula_2 and formula_3, given that he has survived up to time formula_2, divided by formula_5, as formula_5 approaches zero.
_	The theoretical return period is the inverse of the probability that the event will be exceeded in any one year (or more accurately the inverse of the expected number of occurrences in a year).
_	Other scorecard types may include behavioural scorecards - which try to predict the probability of an "existing" account turning "bad"; propensity scorecards - which try to predict the probability that a customer would accept another product if offered one; and collections scorecards - which try to predict a customer's response to different strategies for collecting owed money.
_	This is because as the number of atoms in a molecule increases, the probability that the entire molecule contains at least one heavy isotope atom also increases.
_	In these interpretations, a value is interpreted as the "degree" of truth – to what extent a proposition is true, or the probability that the proposition is true.
_	What is the probability that a bacterium lives 5 hours?
_	Given the task of finding a particular object in a query image, the overall objective of the Bayesian One-Shot Learning algorithm is to compare the probability that that object is present in the image and the probability that only background clutter is present in the image.
_	Increasing the encoding-retrieval match improves memory performance, he believes, but only because it increases the probability that distinctive features will come into play.
_	For a classical system (i.e., a collection of classical particles) with a discrete set of microstates, if formula_1 is the energy of microstate "i", and formula_2 is the probability that it occurs during the system's fluctuations, then the entropy of the system is
_	One way to use this rule would be as a cost based on the probability that a forecaster or algorithm assigns, then checking to see which event actually occurs.
_	where is the probability that a node has "energy" and "fitness" .
_	A focused crawler must predict the probability that an unvisited page will be relevant before actually downloading the page.
_	and hence the probability that a positive result is a false positive is about 1 − 0.019 = 0.98, or 98%.
_	Using 130 years of data on historical migrations to the United States, one study finds "that a doubling of the number of residents with ancestry from a given foreign country relative to the mean increases by 4.2 percentage points the probability that at least one local firm invests in that country, and increases by 31% the number of employees at domestic recipients of FDI from that country.
_	Associated with the random variable is a probability distribution that allows the computation of the probability that the height is in any subset of possible values, such as the probability that the height is between 180 and 190 cm, or the probability that the height is either less than 150 or more than 200 cm.
_	Several modern developments relating to corporate formation have limited the probability that ultra vires acts will occur.
_	Linkage is the proximity of two or more markers on a chromosome; the closer together the markers are, the lower the probability that they will be separated by recombination.
_	Since there are a total of "M" messages, and the entries in the codebook are i.i.d., the probability that formula_7 is confused with any other message is formula_6 times the above expression.
_	What is the probability that the needle will cross a line?
_	Moreover, collective efficacy reduces the probability that time spent away from activities such as school or work will lead to crime among teenagers.
_	Let formula_59 be the protection level for testing the significance of a difference between two means; that is, the probability that a significant difference between two means will not be found if the population means are equal.
_	The hazard rate "λ"("t") for that random variable is defined to be the limiting value of the probability that the event will occur in a small interval ["t","t+Δt"]; given the event has not occurred before time "t", divided by "Δt".
_	Choosing formula_14, we get that the probability that at least one formula formula_
_	For example, if the units in the model are neurons, the activation could represent the probability that the neuron would generate an action potential spike.
_	For example, the probability that it lives longer than 5 hours, but shorter than (5 hours + 1 nanosecond), is (2 hour)×(1 nanosecond) ≃ 6×10 (using the unit conversion 3.6×10 nanoseconds = 1 hour).
_	The increased micro-topography generally increases the probability that plant seeds will be caught on the soil surface and not blown away.
_	Assuming no scattering and ideal (transparent) contacts, the conductance of the one-dimensional system is given by G = GNT, where T is the probability that an electron will be transmitted along the channel, N is the number of the channels available for transport, and G is the conductance quantum 2e/h = (12.9kΩ).
_	Sometime in 1914, the torpedo-boat destroyer became a tender to the Atlantic Fleet Submarine Force and continued to operate in support of submarines until sometime in March 1917 when she was sent to New York on special duty in connection with a recruiting campaign necessitated by the probability that the United States would enter World War I.
_	The normalized Hamming distance and the Jukes-Cantor correction formulas provide the degree of divergence and the probability that a nucleotide changes to another, respectively.
_	For an alternative "Super Ω", the universality probability of a prefix-free Universal Turing Machine (UTM) namely, the probability that it remains universal even when every input of it (as a binary string) is prefixed by a random binary string can be seen as the non-halting probability of a machine with oracle the third iteration of the halting problem (i.e., 0``` = 0^{(3)}).
_	In 1954, Charles Sternberg reevaluated the genera in Hadrosauridae, invoking the probability that Saurolophinae should be sunk into Hadrosaurinae.
_	But there are three feet in a yard, so the probability that the first digit of a length in yards is 1 must be the same as the probability that the first digit of a length in feet is 3, 4, or 5; similarly the probability that the first digit of a length in yards is 2 must be the same as the probability that the first digit of a length in feet is 6, 7, or 8.
_	The same notion can be generalized to any probability distribution on points of the plane, not just the empirical distribution given by a set of sample points, by defining the depth to be the probability that a randomly chosen formula_6-tuple of points has a convex hull that
_	For example, the beta distribution can be used in Bayesian analysis to describe initial knowledge concerning probability of success such as the probability that a space vehicle will successfully complete a specified mission.
_	This behavior is defined by an atomic orbital, a mathematical function that characterises the probability that an electron appears to be at a particular location when its position is measured.
_	The processing of a word increases its accessibility and the probability that this word will be produced even when only some of its components are presented (i.e. the first few letters of the word).
_	This was explicitly tested by Dawes, Mirels, Gold and Donahue (1993) who had people judge both the base rate of people who had a particular personality trait and the probability that a person who had a given personality trait had another one.
_	We can calculate the probability formula_15 as the product of 2 probabilities: formula_16, where formula_17 is the probability that the center of the needle falls close enough to a line for the needle to possibly cross it, and formula_18 is the probability that the needle actually crosses the line, given that the center is within reach.
_	A related topic is the probability that life would emerge, which has been discussed in several studies, for example by Russell Doolittle.
_	Moreover, the theory advises you to favour choices in such situations in proportion to the probability that they will bring good results to your various successors.
_	Mishnoff, it turns out, is concerned about the probability that life in some universe will arise somewhere other than Earth, and will find its way to his Earth through the portal on one of the dead Earths.
_	The Fermi–Dirac probability distribution function, Fig. 4, is used to find the probability that a fermion occupies a specific quantum state in a system at thermal equilibrium.
_	This greatly elevates the probability that a democracy will survive.
_	But in industrial practice, everything is done to reduce the probability that a serving contains the bacterium.
_	The Joint Strategic Survey Committee in a report for the U.S. Joint Chiefs of Staff said that "The long term solution to the unrest in Indochina lies in sweeping political and economic concessions by France" and "the more aid and assistance furnished to France before reforms are undertaken, the less the probability that France of its own accord will take the necessary action."
_	The positional uncertainty and size of the target object then allow estimating the probability that the panspermia vehicles will arrive at their targets.
_	For example, the probability that any given person has a cough on any given day may be only 5%.
_	where "p" is the probability that an information source will produce the "i" th symbol from an "r"-symbol alphabet and is independent of previous symbols.
_	And if the probability that the box has two like coins changes to no matter what kind of coin is shown, the probability would have to be even if you hadn't observed a coin this way.
_	It can be resolved only by recognizing how the combination of "observing a gold coin" with each possible box can only affect the probability that the box was GS or SS, but not GG.
_	In words: the probability that for "all" events in formula_1, the relative-frequency is near the probability, is lower-bounded by an expression that depends on the growth-function of formula_1.
_	Given a prefix-free Turing machine, the universality probability of it is the probability that it remains universal even when every input of it (as a binary string) is prefixed by a random binary string.
_	Both players receive an extra die in their dice distributions, increasing the probability that their territories will survive attacks for the first round of play.
_	Barlow and Proschan [1975] define availability of a repairable system as "the probability that the system is operating at a specified time t."
_	But if two detectors detect the signal pulse simultaneously, the probability that it is a noise pulse in the detectors is formula_2.
_	The Nikonov mechanism fires the second shot in the burst quickly enough to allow it to escape before the recoil of the first shot is felt, thus potentially allowing the two shots to hit somewhat near each other increasing the probability that at least one will hit the target if there was a deficiency in the shooter's aim.
_	where, formula_2 is the probability that the new node picks a node formula_3 from the labelled nodes of the existing network.
_	What is the probability that a sequence drawn from some null distribution will have an HMM probability (in the case of the forward algorithm) or a maximum state sequence probability (in the case of the Viterbi algorithm) at least as large as that of a particular output sequence?
_	The system continues to drill students on exercises that require effective application of a rule until the probability that the rule has been learned reaches at least 95% probability.
_	If formula_19, then the probability that the algorithm returns "Yes" is less than or equal to one half.
_	Text producers often speculate on the receiver's attitude of acceptability and present texts that maximizes the probability that the receivers will respond as desired by the producers.
_	Therefore, the probability that one of the drivers among the 1 + 49.95 = 50.95 positive test results really is drunk is formula_1.
_	In this case the fixation probability is formula_4 (where "N" is the number of vertices) since this is the probability that the mutation arises in the first vertex which will eventually replace all the other ones.
_	A confidence interval approach is also used, where after each item is administered, the algorithm determines the probability that the examinee's true-score is above or below the passing score.
_	Using Carnap's formula for induction, he finds that the probability that all ravens are black decreases from 0.9985 to 0.8995 when it is discovered that one of the two objects is a black raven.
_	In cold fusion reactions, the produced fused nuclei have a relatively low excitation energy (~10–20 MeV), which decreases the probability that these products will undergo fission reactions.
_	Once the MTBF of a system is known, the probability that any one particular system will be operational at time equal to the MTBF can be estimated.
_	The VaR of formula_1 at the confidence level formula_2 is the smallest number formula_3 such that the probability that formula_4 does not exceed formula_3 is at least formula_6.
_	The House of Lords confirmed this on 3 March, giving considerably more detail of the case, which increases the probability that this was the Samuel Fisher who had been driven out of Shropshire.
_	Additionally, in individuals with weakened immune systems, the concentration of bacteria in the blood can reach levels high enough to increase the probability that some will attach to the valve.
_	It is also possible to perform the same analysis using Stirling's approximation instead of the Chernoff bound to estimate the probability that a block contains exactly hashed values.
_	It can be shown that formula_11, and furthermore, that the formula_12 converge to a specific value formula_13, which is the probability that the individual will have no descendants.
_	The "p"-value was introduced by Karl Pearson in the Pearson's chi-squared test, where he defined P (original notation) as the probability that the statistic would be at or above a given level.
_	Gravity at one-sixth that of the gravitational force of the Earth increases the time in which dust remains airborne, thereby increasing the probability that these dust particles will be inhaled.
_	If we recalculate keys in step 4 then the probability that item from m1 will be in final sample is 10/110 instead of required 10/210.
_	Similarly formula_2 is the probability that an agent gets an signal when the correct action is reject.
_	In the computer science subfield of algorithmic information theory, Chaitin's constant is the real number representing the probability that a randomly chosen Turing machine will halt, formed from a construction due to Argentine-American mathematician and computer scientist Gregory Chaitin.
_	Similarly, the Maguire model, suggested in 2011 as a potential statistical model for determining the probability that a child’s trauma was caused by abuse, has been questioned.
_	where formula_9 is the probability that an entire molecule will be replicated successfully.
_	Availability is the probability that an item will be in an operable and commitable state at the start of a mission when the mission is called for at a random time, and is generally defined as uptime divided by total time (uptime plus downtime).
_	where formula_12 is the probability that an excited atom will decay via "WXY" Auger transition, "ρ"("z") is the atomic concentration of the element "α" at depth "z", "λ"("WXY") is the mean free path for an "WXY" Auger electron, "θ" is the angle that the escaping Auger electron makes with the surface normal and "κ" is the photon emission probability which is dictated the atomic number.
_	The method is often quantitative, in that one can often deduce a lower bound on the probability that the random variable is larger than some constant times its expectation.
_	For each particle, the robot computes the probability that, had it been at the state of the particle, it would perceive what its sensors have actually sensed.
_	They are probabilistically complete, meaning the probability that they will produce a solution approaches 1 as more time is spent.
_	In these circumstances the probability that the child inherits two copies of a harmful recessive gene (allele) rather than one (which would not have immediate effects) is much increased.
_	These functions give the probability that a nucleon of momentum formula_11 carries a given fraction formula_7 of the plus component of the nuclear momentum, formula_13, formula_14.
_	The following table gives the probability that an attack will succeed, given the number of dice on the attacking and defending territories.
_	Howard Hamilton (2009) proposed "a useful statistic in soccer" that "will ultimately contribute to what I call an 'expected goal value' — for any action on the field in the course of a game, the probability that said action will create a goal".
_	The particles being identical, it is more relevant to consider the probability that "any" formula_28 of them occupy positions formula_24 in "any" permutation, thus defining the formula_28-"particle density"
_	The lower bound can be proved by noting that formula_57 is the probability that formula_58, where formula_59, which is bounded below by formula_60, where formula_61 is relative entropy (See the entry on bounds on tails of binomial distributions for details).
_	Targeting double-stranded breaks increases the probability that cells will undergo cell death.
_	A study by Kock suggests that the probability that Simpson’s paradox would occur at random in path models (i.e., models generated by path analysis) with two predictors and one criterion variable is approximately 12.8 percent; slightly higher than 1 occurrence per 8 path models.
_	Given that the item is defective, the probability that it was made by the third
_	Alternatively, substances that facilitate the aggregation of water molecules can increase the probability that they will reach the critical size necessary for ice formation.
_	The three main factors for this above average season forecast cited included a continuation of abnormally warm sea surface temperatures, the probability that La Niña conditions would remain, and that the Quasi-Biennial Oscillation (QBO) winds would be in a westerly phase.
_	In BBO, formula_7 is the probability that a given independent variable in the formula_8-th candidate solution will be replaced; that is, formula_7 is the immigration probability of formula_10.
_	Parametric linkage analysis is the traditional approach, whereby the probability that a gene important for a disease is linked to a genetic marker is studied through the LOD score, which assesses the probability that a given pedigree, where the disease and the marker are cosegregating, is due to the existence of linkage (with a given linkage value) or to chance.
_	The laws of genetics indicate the probability that the legendary audacity and love of adventure can appear again in the lineage of the feudal lords.
_	More precisely, the probability that a normal deviate lies in the range between formula_170 and formula_171 is given by
_	The third equality follows because the expectation of an indicator function is the probability that the event it selects occurs.
_	In probability theory, Bennett's inequality provides an upper bound on the probability that the sum of independent random variables deviates from its expected value by more than any specified amount.
_	The issue then focused on the probability that the particular harm will result from what is done.
_	The success of the screening program was judged in terms of predictive value: the probability that a child, if referred, would be eligible for services.
_	For every pair of sequences compute the probability that letters formula_1 and formula_2 are paired in formula_3 an alignment that is generated by the model.
_	If it is assumed that each of the matchboxes originally contained formula_1 matches, what is the probability that there are exactly formula_2 matches in the other box?
_	According to it, the probability that a response to one stimulus will be generalized to another will be a function of the distance between the two stimuli.
_	The reasons for this can be debated; everything from poor management to signal and promotions versus WRWD to the probability that the Hudson Valley can truly support only one country station.
_	The power of the test is the probability that the test will find a statistically significant difference between men and women, as a function of the size of the true difference between those two populations.
_	An internal pelvic exam is not recommended for sexually immature or prepubescent girls due to the probability that internal injuries do not exist in this age group.
_	Rather than computing the probability that a random vote counting order has the desired property, one can instead compute the number of favourable counting orders, then divide by the total number of ways in which the votes could have been counted.
_	The higher the probability that stock will be used in the future, the more the on-hand stock value can be reduced.
_	Given that the host opened door 3, the probability that the car is behind door 3 is zero, and it is twice as likely to be behind door 2 than door 1.
_	Combining all of the values from the various questions, an overall ranking is derived which gives the A.I. the probability that the object is or is not a human.
_	A meta analysis essentially tells us the probability that the findings across the results of many studies are attributable to chance or to the independent variable.
_	In more elementary terms, the probability that the option expires in the money and the value of the underlying at exercise are not independent – the higher the price of the underlying, the more likely it is to expire in the money "and" the higher the value at exercise, hence why Delta is higher than moneyness.
_	Inductive arguments, by contrast, can have different degrees of logical strength: the stronger or more cogent the argument, the greater the probability that the conclusion is true, the weaker the argument, the lesser that probability.
_	The rotating motion while suspended increases the probability that the particles present a different orientation to the mesh when they fall back again, and thus might eventually pass through the mesh.
_	Here it is "best" in the sense that it minimised the asymptotic variance and thus both minimised the expected absolute value of the error, and maximised the probability that the estimate would lie in any symmetric interval about the unknown coefficient, no matter what the error distribution.
_	Let acc be the probability that on inputs distributed as described, the "J" output by "A" is greater than or equal to 1.
_	the probability that infinitely many of the "E" occur is 1.
_	The plaintext-recovery-under-chosen-plaintext-attack advantage (PR-CPA advantage) is defined as the probability that an algorithm with fixed computational resources can use a chosen-plaintext attack to decrypt a randomly selected message that has been encrypted with a symmetric cipher.
_	The understanding achieved by these geneticists spanned the action of natural selection on alleles (alternative forms of a gene), the Hardy-Weinberg equilibrium, the evolution of continuously-varying traits (like height), and the probability that a new mutation will become fixed.
_	The Pearson's chi-squared test can be used to calculate the probability that the occurrence of an event matches the initial expectations.
_	Then the reliability polynomial is a function formula_20, a polynomial in "p", that gives the probability that every pair of vertices in "G" remains connected after the edges fail.
_	By the law of total probability, the probability that the hidden color is the same as the displayed color equals the weighted average of the probabilities that the hidden color is the same as the displayed color, given that the displayed color is black or white respectively (the weights are the probabilities of seeing black and white respectively).
_	Select a random subset "Q" of ["n"] containing "m" elements and a random permutation, and ask about the probability that all elements of "Q" lie on the same cycle.
_	At the time of its establishment, BNFL and its trade unions agreed that the causation of cancer by radiation was sufficiently well understood that "it should be possible to construct a scheme which would evaluate the probability that a diagnosed cancer may have been caused by radiation exposure at work."
_	where each "Y" is an exponentially distributed random variable with rate parameter "λ", and "p" is the probability that "X" will take on the form of the exponential distribution with rate "λ".
_	Note that, in a typical classification system, the probability that a retrieved document is relevant depends on the document.
_	Inherited factors also play a role in the probability that an individual will develop PMR.
_	The birthday problem asks, for a set of randomly chosen people, what is the probability that some pair of them will have the same birthday?
_	A seismic hazard is the probability that an earthquake will occur in a given geographic area, within a given window of time, and with ground motion intensity exceeding a given threshold.
_	Given the probability that this applied also to early humans, it's hard to see why they should have abandoned this efficient method in favour of more costly and cumbersome systems of visual gesturing — only to return to sound at a later stage.
_	The World telecommunications and informations society is an annual event which aims to aid raise awareness of the probability that utilises the internet and other related information communication technologies can bring to societies and economies, as well as awareness to bridge the digital divide.
_	The above coefficient is the standard measure of inbreeding, and gives the probability that, at any given neutral locus, an individual has inherited two copies of a same gene of a common ancestor (i.e. the probability of being homozygous "by descent").
_	According to Martin Nowak, a Harvard professor of mathematics and evolutionary biology, "We cannot calculate the probability that an eye came about.
_	But the probability that one node will begin during any particular time slot is
_	Grain's authors discuss the complete diffusion rates of Grain initialization process in the Grain Version 1.0 specifications: "For initialization with two different IVs, differing by only one bit, the probability that a shift register bit is the same for both initializations should be close to 0.5.
_	One property studied on graphs with two types of individuals is the "fixation probability", which is defined as the probability that a single, randomly placed mutant of type A will replace a population of type B.
_	What is the probability that a randomly selected individual with a positive test is a drug user?
_	It is easiest to answer this question by first answering a slightly different question: what is the probability that formula_22 takes a value in some particular subset formula_27?
_	The number of ionization depends upon the probability that an electron hits a gas molecule.
_	In cold fusion reactions, the produced fused nuclei have a relatively low excitation energy (~10–20 MeV), which decreases the probability that these products will undergo fission reactions.
_	Let "F"(θ,"t") be the probability that the rotation axis of the binary is oriented at angle θ at time "t".
_	Furthermore, the probability that a given neuron formula_8 spikes in a time period formula_9, according to the probabilistic model, is described by the formula
_	If a woman has at least one different partner per year for four years, the probability that she will leave college with an HPV infection is greater than 85%.
_	We can define the probability that the firm can reset its price in any one period as h (the hazard rate), or equivalently the probability (1-h) that the price will remain unchanged in that period (the survival rate).
_	For example, we might seek the probability that in a certain seven-day period there were at most two days in on which only one phone call was received, given that the number of phone calls during that time was 20.
_	Then the probability that the network is in state formula_3 immediately before an arrival to any node is also formula_2.
_	This is equal to the probability that an arbitrary demand unit is delivered without delay.
_	There are only four possible nucleotides and when DNA substitution rates are high, the probability that two lineages will evolve the same nucleotide at the same site increases.
_	in which formula_4 is the probability that was forecast, formula_5 the actual outcome of the event at instance formula_6 (formula_7 if it does not happen and formula_8 if it does happen) and formula_9 is the number of forecasting instances.
_	Roughly speaking, Schilder's theorem gives an estimate for the probability that a (scaled-down) sample path of Brownian motion will stray far from the mean path (which is constant with value 0).
_	John Michell was the first to suggest that double stars might be physically attached to each other when he argued in 1767 that the probability that a double star was due to a chance alignment was small.
_	Then the probability that formula_1 occurs before formula_2 equals the conditional probability that formula_1 occurs given that formula_1 or formula_2 occur on the next trial, which is
_	According to the market, the probability that the deal is consummated at its original terms is 75% and the probability that the deal will be terminated is 25%.
_	In probability theory, Gauss's inequality (or the Gauss inequality) gives an upper bound on the probability that a unimodal random variable lies more than any given distance from its mode.
_	In the simple solutions, we have already observed that the probability that the car is behind door 1, the door initially chosen by the player, is initially .
_	("P") is the probability that, if a given day is of type "i", it will be
_	Enfield and colleagues have calculated the probability that a change in the AMO will occur within a given future time frame, assuming that historical variability persists.
_	Experiments have observed only three decay pathways for this excited-state nucleus, with the branching ratio showing the probability that any given intermediate follows a particular pathway.
_	With the random matching of workers to available jobs, the ratio of available jobs to total job seekers gives the probability that any person moving from the agricultural sector to the urban sector will be able to find a job.
_	... the probability of order of the right kind is very much greater if there is a God, and so that the existence of such order adds greatly to the probability that there is a God."
_	The theory of Wegman-Carter MACs and the analysis of VMAC show that if one "instantiates" VMAC with truly random keys and pads then the probability that an attacker (even a computationally unbounded one) produces a correct tag for messages of its choosing is less than 1/2 or 1/2 when the tags are of length 64 or 128 bits, respectively.
_	Pau then asks the doctor the probability that the operation would be successful to which the doctor replies fifty percent.
_	This average parameter represents the probability that if we again select a random element of formula_48 of a random permutation, the element lies on a cycle of size "m".
_	In assessing the probability that a given individual is a member of a particular class, we must account for other information besides the base rate.
_	The model can answer questions such as the probability that this occurs within finite time, or the mean time until which it occurs.
_	It is sometimes difficult to predict whether a species will become established upon release, and if not initially successful, humans have made repeated introductions to improve the probability that the species will survive and eventually reproduce in the wild.
_	"What's the probability that Pat finishes on the tenth house?"
_	If the probability that the algorithm returns the correct answer is formula_1, then when the number of nodes is very large, the algorithm is correct with a probability that is very near
_	formula_38, which is the probability that "x" will be under the tail of the Gaussian PDF towards positive infinity.
_	formula_9 will give the probability that a single sample taken from a random process with zero-mean and unit-variance Gaussian probability density function will be greater or equal to formula_10.
_	The Fermi–Dirac distribution, formula_2, gives the probability that (at thermodynamic equilibrium) a state having energy "ϵ" is occupied by an electron:
_	As a consequence, the probability that a randomly chosen number between 1 and is prime is inversely proportional to the number of decimal digits of .
_	Likewise, until the return of the New Zealanders the brigade would have little artillery support; as such if large Chinese forces arrived before these two units returned the forward companies would be without support and would have to accept the probability that they would be cut-off.
_	Although formula_19 is not intuitively any "simpler" or "better-behaved" than formula_1, the probability that the sequence of flips of a fair coin will be in formula_
_	The proportion 12/23 = 52.174% is exactly the probability that appears in standard catalogs of suit combinations.
_	That is, the probability that is true is equal to the similarity , assuming randomly chosen sets and .
_	Being the only chamber of its kind in England, there has been much dispute over its use, but the most popular theory and all the evidence points towards the probability that Guildford has the oldest synagogue remains in the British Isles and one of the oldest in Western Europe.
_	Participants were then asked to estimate the probability that a certain choice would be of benefit or risk to the individual being discussed.
_	For example, calculating the Subjective expected utility of an outcome requires knowing the both the value of an outcome and the probability that it will occur.
_	As compared to regression analysis, which creates a formula that health care providers can use to calculate the probability that a patient has a disease, recursive partition creates a rule such as 'If a patient has finding x, y, or z they probably have disease q'.
_	The summation is over all the possible microstates of the system, and "p" is the probability that the system is in the "i"-th microstate.
_	One study finds that interstate wars have important impacts on the fate of political regimes, and that the probability that a political leader will fall from power in the wake of a lost war is particularly high in democratic states .
_	This is the numerator we are looking for in our equation, and we divide by the total probability of the observation sequence to normalize this value and extract only the probability that formula_41.
_	It measures the probability that
_	A natural generalization of the problem is to consider "n" non-necessarily fair dice, with "p" the probability that each die will select the 6 face when thrown (notice that actually the number of faces of the dice and which face should be selected are irrelevant).
_	For everyday (macroscopic) situations, the probability that the second law will be violated is practically zero.
_	The key data-dependent term formula_3 is the likelihood of the model "M" in view of the data "D", and represents the probability that some data are produced under the assumption of the model "M"; evaluating it correctly is the key to Bayesian model comparison.
_	Dumville objects that this political argument glosses over the probability that while Bran and Donnchad gave way to overlords from rival dynasties, they were nevertheless succeeded by members of their family in their own "tuatha" or "mórthuatha".
_	Discrete choice models specify the probability that an individual chooses an option among a set of alternatives.
_	He calculated that the probability that the sun will rise tomorrow, given that it has never failed to in the past, was
_	However, counter-intuitively, the probability that at least one student has the same birthday as "any" other student on any day is around 70% (for n = 30), from the formula formula_5.
_	which is (up to terms of higher order than formula_26) the probability that "i" − 1, 1, "j" − 1 − "i", 1 and "n" − "j" sample elements fall in the intervals formula_21, formula_22, formula_29, formula_30, formula_31 respectively.
_	By linearity of expectation, this expected number equals the sum, over all other keys in the hash table, of the probability that the given key and the other key collide.
_	The second function, formula_76, is the "mass-observable" kernel giving the probability that a halo with mass formula_77 and redshift formula_45 will have a particular value of the observable formula_79.
_	The SIL level expresses the probability that the safety function does not work upon demand from the process.
_	When the absolute value of this function is squared, it gives the probability that a particle will be observed near a location—a probability density.
_	A more complex "f" might give the probability that an item belongs to a certain class.
_	Using for example epidemiology and the individual's risk factors, let's say that the probability that the hypercalcemia would have been caused by primary hyperparathyroidism in the first place is estimated to be 0.00125 (or 0.125%), the equivalent probability for cancer is 0.0002, and 0.0005 for other conditions.
_	The survival function is a function that gives the probability that a patient, device, or other object of interest will survive beyond any given specified time.
_	where formula_12 is the probability of identity by descent of two individuals given that the two individuals are in the same subpopulation, and formula_13 is the probability that two individuals from the total population are identical by descent.
_	A representative of OLG attributed Lotto Max's popularity to the size of its total prize pools (which approach the larger jackpots seen in U.S. lotteries), and the perception of consumers that the MaxMillions system increased the probability that they could win a major prize.
_	Males may gain reproductive success from being cannibalized by either providing nutrients to the female (indirectly to the offspring), or through enhancing the probability that their sperm is used to fertilize the female's eggs.
_	Where formula_30 is the probability density function, a positive number that measures the probability that the particle will be found at a certain location.
_	For the air conditioning example, the graph of the CDF below illustrates that the probability that the time to failure is less than or equal to 100 hours is 0.81, as estimated using the exponential curve fit to the data.
_	DR is the probability that the audit procedures may fail to detect existence of a material error or fraud.
_	First, they generate a large target population of mutant cells and so increase the probability that the multiple mutations necessary to cause cancer will be acquired within that clone.
_	If "n" points are chosen uniformly at random in a unit square, the probability that they are in convex position is
_	But, knowing that the host can open one of the two unchosen doors to show a goat does not mean that opening a specific door would not affect the probability that the car is behind the initially chosen door.
_	The host can always open a door revealing a goat "and" (in the standard interpretation of the problem) the probability that the car is behind the initially chosen door does not change, but it is "not because" of the former that the latter is true.
_	Solutions based on the assertion that the host's actions cannot affect the probability that the car is behind the initially chosen appear persuasive, but the assertion is simply untrue unless each of the host's two choices are equally likely, if he has a choice (Falk 1992:207,213).
_	One way of understanding this phenomenon is to see that the increase in the number of possible combinations of sets of points in that area overwhelms the decrease in the probability that any given set of points in that area line up.
_	The configuration probabilities "P"(σ) represent the probability that (in equilibrium) the system is in a state with configuration σ.
_	The sunrise problem can be expressed as follows: "What is the probability that the sun will rise tomorrow?"
_	(Positive predictive value meant the probability that a child with a suspect Denver II would be diagnosed as abnormal when evaluated; negative predictive value meant the probability that a child with a normal Denver II would be diagnosed as normal when evaluated.)
_	David Roberts provided a natural combinatorial link between the Artin–Hasse exponential and the regular exponential in the spirit of the ergodic perspective (linking the "p"-adic and regular norms over the rationals) by showing that the Artin–Hasse exponential is also the generating function for the probability that an element of the symmetric group is unipotent in characteristic "p", whereas the regular exponential is the probability that an element of the same group is unipotent in characteristic zero.
_	It works by showing that if one randomly chooses objects from a specified class, the probability that the result is of the prescribed kind is strictly greater than zero.
_	Unlike deep vein thrombosis, the probability that superficial thrombophlebitis will cause a clot to break up and be transported in pieces to the lung is very low.
_	Welch showed that the first confidence procedure dominates the second, according to desiderata from confidence interval theory; for every formula_40, the probability that the first procedure contains formula_41 is "less than or equal to" the probability that the second procedure contains formula_41.
_	The value of "a" is 20 times the probability that a Poisson-distributed random variable exceeds 8, and it is easily calculated as 1 minus the sum of the probabilities corresponding to 0 through 8.
_	Mascot then computes a score based on the probability that the peptides from a sample match those in the selected protein database.
_	The ensemble interpretation may well be applied to a single system or particle, and predict what is the probability that that single system will have for a value of one of its properties, on repeated measurements.
_	With a choice model we are explaining the share of travelers using a mode (or the probability that an individual traveler uses a mode multiplied by the number of travelers).
_	The energy, formula_11, of each photon is multiplied by the number of states available at that frequency, and the probability that each of those states will be occupied.
_	Direct visualization of the pathogen, the identification of different strains, immunological responses in the host, how the infection is spread and, the combination of these should all be taken into account to determine the probability that an infectious agent is the cause of the disease.
_	Score voting is independent of clones in the sense that if there is a set of candidates such that every voter gives the same rating to every candidate in this set, then the probability that the winner is in this set is independent of how many candidates are in the set.
_	Generally it refers to the probability that at least some minimum quantity of precipitation will occur within a specified forecast period and location.
_	Low participation lowers the probability that the articles are reviewed, developed and updated, and political polarisation of participants is likely to lead to biases in the articles.
_	The resulting image is a map of the probability that the point lies within the area represented by each pixel.
_	The concept (although not so named) originated in 1785 with the Marquis de Condorcet, whose "jury theorem" states that if each member of a voting group is more likely than not to make a correct decision, the probability that the highest vote of the group is the correct decision increases with the number of members of the group (see Condorcet's jury theorem).
_	Laplace used the rule of succession to calculate the probability that the sun will rise tomorrow, given that it has risen every day for the past 5000 years.
_	Although the failure rate, formula_1, is often thought of as the probability that a failure occurs in a specified interval given no failure before time formula_2, it is not actually a probability because it can exceed 1.
_	Under the assumption that little or nothing is known "a priori" about the relative plausibilities of the outcomes, Laplace derived a formula for the probability that the next trial will be a success.
_	Similarly, if one has a sample {"X", ..., "X"} then the probability that the next observation "X" will be the largest is 1/("n" + 1), since all observations have equal probability of being the maximum.
_	In the same way, the probability that "X" will be the smallest is 1/("n" + 1).
_	Diversity factor (or simultaneity factor formula_1) is a measure of the probability that a particular piece of equipment will turn on coincidentally to another piece of equipment.
_	One method is to sum the probability that the total deviation in numbers of events in either direction from the expected value is either more than or less than the expected value.
_	The second method involves computing the probability that the deviation from the expected value is as unlikely or more unlikely than the observed value, i.e. from a comparison of the probability density functions.
_	The Pay-per-Share (PPS) approach offers an instant, guaranteed payout to a miner for his contribution to the probability that the pool finds a block.
_	For instance, in the p-box depicted at right, the probability that the value will be 2.5 or less is between 4% and 36%.
_	Again, the utility of the grand canonical partition function is that it is related to the probability that the system is in state formula_56:
_	The interpretation of λ as the probability that two entities taken at random from the dataset of interest represent the same type assumes that the first entity is replaced to the dataset before taking the second entity.
_	Suppose that observations in a random sample from a population are classified into mutually exclusive classes with respective observed numbers (for ), and a null hypothesis gives the probability that an observation falls into the th class.
_	So the probability that "A" will always be strictly ahead is
_	What this means is that as the number of trials "n" goes to infinity, the probability that the average of the observations is equal to the expected value will be equal to one.
_	Since the exciton samples many potential analyte binding sites during its excited state lifetime, the probability that the exciton will sample an occupied ‘receptor’ site and be quenched is greatly increased."
_	formula_5 is the probability that the stochastic process does not
_	This means that if an attacker wants to replace one message with another and, from his point of view the hash function was chosen completely randomly, the probability that the UMAC will not detect his modification is at most 1/|D|.
_	Assuming that the incidence of each letter in a passage is independent of the incidence of the other letters, and provided "m" is much larger than 26, the probability that a sequence of length "m" will contain all 26 letters is approximately
_	where formula_5 is the probability that the system is in state "j", and formula_6 is the pay-off if one follows action "i" while the system is in state "j".
_	By Kolmogorov's zero–one law, for any given , the probability that an infinite cluster exists is either zero or one.
_	Males in poor condition with a limited supply of saliva may deliberately delay initiating copulations to decrease the probability that their costly gift is rejected and, thus, wasted.
_	Therefore, in response to the question "What is the probability that the bacterium dies at 5 hours?", a literally correct but unhelpful answer is "0", but a better answer can be written as (2 hour) "dt".
_	This is the probability that the bacterium dies within a small (infinitesimal) window of time around 5 hours, where "dt" is the duration of this window.
_	The probability of obtaining the product of the reaction above is given by formula_18, since the probability that a B group reach with a branched unit is formula_19 and the probability that a B group react with non-branched A is formula_20.
_	By the night of 29 July, the fact that the ARVN 7th Division north of Highway 4 had found few VC and that the VC in central Cam Son had evaded major battle prompted 9th Division commander General O'Connor and Marine commander Colonel Lan, to consider the probability that the VC were in the Ban Long area.
_	The R function codice_4 calculates the probability that there are x events in an interval, where the argument "lambda" is the average number of events per interval.
_	If we have inserted "n" elements, the probability that a certain bit is still 0 is
_	Based on his theory of inductive logic sketched above, Carnap formalizes Goodman's notion of projectibility of a property "W" as follows: the higher the relative frequency of "W" in an observed sample, the higher is the probability that a non-observed individual has the property "W".
_	Then the quantity exp((AIC − AIC)/2) can be interpreted as being proportional to the probability that the "i"th model minimizes the (estimated) information loss.
_	However, for simplicity, let’s say that the probability that any of these would have occurred in the first place is calculated at 0.0005 in this example.
_	This is just the probability that a Poisson-distributed random variable with expected value 1 is equal to "k".
_	He showed in this case that the probability that any particular ball remained in the vase at noon was 0 and therefore, by using Boole's inequality and taking a countable sum over the balls, that the probability the vase would be empty at noon was 1.
_	The sixth possibility can be quantified by statistical tests that can calculate the probability that the correlation observed would be as large as it is just by chance if, in fact, there is no relationship between the variables.
_	Radiation increases the probability that dicentric chromosomes form after every mitotic event, creating physical bridges between them in anaphase and telophase.
_	Growth rates are lower for trees with lianas; they directly damage hosts by mechanical abrasion and strangulation, render hosts more susceptible to ice and wind damage, and increase the probability that the host tree falls.
_	In years that are very favorable for insects, like the 1996 season was, the aphid population can become so large that even a very low percentage of PLRV infected seed could result in sufficient spread to cause a problem, because as the aphid population increases, so does the probability that they will encounter an infected plant.
_	A Bayesian probability analysis then gives the probability that the object is present based on the actual number of matching features found.
_	When using an estimate which has no contingency to set a budget or to set aside funding, a contingency is often added to improve the probability that the budget or funding will be adequate to complete the project.
_	The probability of capture of an initially launched capsule by a planet (or astronomical object) P is given by the equation below, where P is the probability that the capsule reaches the target accretion disc or cloud zone, and P is the probability of capture from this zone by a planet.
_	If "k" is the number of hash functions and each has no significant correlation between each other, then the probability that the bit is not set to 1 by any of the hash functions is
_	Splicing "silencers" are sites to which splicing repressor proteins bind, reducing the probability that a nearby site will be used as a splice junction.
_	Splicing "enhancers" are sites to which splicing activator proteins bind, increasing the probability that a nearby site will be used as a splice junction.
_	Van Eyck was tasked by Philip the Good with bringing back two (mostly likely a pair were painted to increase the probability that one would make it back to the Netherlands) faithful representations of her likeness for the duke to evaluate.
_	A naive Bayes classifier considers each of these features to contribute independently to the probability that this fruit is an apple, regardless of any possible correlations between the color, roundness, and diameter features.
_	Life tables are used to calculate the probability that the annuitant lives to each future payment period.
_	Therefore, for a given , what is the probability that an open path (meaning a path, each of whose links is an "open" bond) exists from the top to the bottom?
_	McCurley constant is a mathematical constant representing the probability that the determinants of two randomly chosen square integer matrices will be relatively prime.
_	This function is defined so that, denoting the PVF by "P"("t"), the probability that a CMB photon last scattered between time "t" and is given by "P"("t") "dt".
_	Considering whether to take the interview, she tries to calculate the probability that she'll get accepted.
_	The equation can be understood as simply the probability that an isoprene unit is NOT a crosslink ("1-p)" in "N-1" successive units along a chain.
_	For the probability that a certain event will happen, one sums the probability amplitudes for all of the possible ways in which the event can occur, and then takes the square of the length of the result.
_	For example, for the probability that a photon will reflect off of a mirror and be observed at a given point a given amount of time later, one sets the photon's probability amplitude spinning as it leaves the source, follows it to the mirror, and then to its final point, even for paths that do not involve bouncing off of the mirror at equal angles.
_	One can then evaluate the probability amplitude at the photon's final point; next, one can integrate over all of these arrows (see vector sum), and square the length of the result to obtain the probability that this photon will reflect off of the mirror in the pertinent fashion.
_	This means meetings are only scheduled when both parties are interested, thus increasing the efficiency of the event and the probability that the right business partners will be found.
_	More formally, formula_10 denotes the probability that an action formula_11 is chosen.
_	Subsequently, the probability that hypercalcemia is caused by primary hyperparathyroidism (PH) in the individual can be calculated as:
_	In this case, the expectation value is the probability that the experiment results in "1", and it can be computed as
_	If the game is played repeatedly until someone wins, then the conditional probability above is the probability that the player wins the game.
_	In this case, "p(C = 1)" represents the probability that a randomly selected document is a member of a particular cluster, and "p(C = 0)" represents the probability that it isn't.
_	Similarly, "p(T = 1)" represents the probability that a randomly selected document contains a given term, and "p(T = 0)" represents the probability that it doesn't.
_	The joint probability distribution function "p(C, T)" represents the probability that two events occur simultaneously.
_	For example, "p(0, 0)" is the probability that a document isn't a member of cluster "c" and doesn't contain term "t"; "p(0, 1)" is the probability that a document isn't a member of cluster "C" and does contain term "T"; and so on.
_	If we repeat an experiment that we know can result in a success or failure, "n" times independently, and get "s" successes, then what is the probability that the next repetition will succeed?
_	To qualify as a probability, the assignment of values must satisfy the requirement that if you look at a collection of mutually exclusive events (events with no common results, e.g., the events {1,6}, {3}, and {2,4} are all mutually exclusive), the probability that at least one of the events will occur is given by the sum of the probabilities of all the individual events.
_	"The diversity index measures the probability that any two residents, chosen at random, would be of different ethnicities.
_	The length of the instantiation vector represents the probability that a capsule’s entity is present in the scene.
_	The presence of a particular cis-acting RNA sequence element may increase the probability that a nearby site will be spliced in some cases, but decrease the probability in other cases, depending on context.
_	The probability that they change an incorrect majority to a correct majority is (1-"p")"p", while the probability that they change a correct majority to an incorrect majority is "p"(1-"p")(1-"p").
_	NIOSH’s responsibility under the Act is to determine the probability that an individual’s cancer was a result of their occupational radiation exposure at a DOE or AWE facility.
_	Cumulative incidence is defined as the probability that a particular event, such as occurrence of a particular disease, has occurred before a given time.
_	The probability that the algorithm succeeds is 1 − the probability that all attempts fail.
_	By independence, the probability that all attempts fail is
_	Thus, the expected cost of supporting an erroneous policy (obtained by multiplying the cost of the policy by the probability that the individual voter will have a decisive role in influencing the policy) is very low.
_	Therefore, showing work to others increases the probability that weaknesses will be identified and improved.
_	The odds (in favor) of an event or a proposition is the ratio of the probability that the event will happen to the probability that the event will not happen.
_	If there are no other limitations on the number of flips, the probability that the game will eventually end this way is 1.
_	An audit of a company's Disaster Recovery Plan primarily looks into the probability that operations of the organization can be sustained at the level that is assumed in the plan, as well as the ability of the entity to actually establish operations at the site.
_	Given "β", the choice probability is the probability that the random terms, (which are random from the researcher’s perspective, since the researcher does not observe them) are below the respective quantities formula_15 Different choice models (i.e. different specifications of G) arise from different distributions of "ε" for all "i" and different treatments of "β".
_	So it can be looked at as "the probability that a relevant document is retrieved by the query".
_	In cold fusion reactions, the produced fused nuclei have a relatively low excitation energy (~10–20 MeV), which decreases the probability that these products will undergo fission reactions.
_	Taking for example formula_56, the probability that a measurement of the system in y-direction at time formula_51 results in formula_58 is formula_59, where the initial state is in formula_60.
_	Using the same ideas as the usual Gauss circle problem and the fact that the probability that two integers are coprime is 6/"π", it is relatively straightforward to show that
_	Although each single issue, taken in isolation, might have been resolved, the probability that they could all be resolved in time and in mutually compatible ways was practically zero.
_	This probability can be interpreted as the probability that the sequence in question belongs to the same class of sequences as the ones in the MSA, for example the class of all protein sequences belonging to a specific protein family.
_	the probability that formula_22 is not covered is
_	A more adequate characteristic of this sequence is the probability that a randomly chosen number from it belongs to an era of length "K" where "K" is large.
_	Shot Quality is a term used in the statistical analysis of ice hockey to indicate the probability that a given shot will result in a goal, based on factors such as the distance of the shot taken, the type of shot (wrist shot, slapshot, backhand, etc.) and other factors such as the number of players on the ice for each team.
_	Also, the probability that an event has an even chance of occurring (e.g., a tossed coin coming up heads) may also be assigned a high level of confidence.
_	If the field size is sufficiently large, the probability that the receiver(s) will obtain linearly independent combinations (and therefore obtain innovative information) approaches
_	Instead, the organism records the times of onset and offset of CSs and USs and uses these to calculate the probability that the US will follow the CS.
_	In probability theory, Hoeffding's inequality provides an upper bound on the probability that the sum of bounded independent random variables deviates from its expected value by more than a certain amount.
_	The probability attached to each square was then the probability that the wreck was in that square.
_	formula_7 is a volume element, formula_8 is the primary quantum yield, formula_9is the probability that a hole-electron pair separated by a distance formula_10 at an angle formula_11 to the direction of electric field formula_12, formula_13 is the spatial distribution function between ions.
_	Job security is the probability that an individual will keep their job; a job with a high level of job security is such that a person with the job would have a small chance of becoming unemployed.
_	Despite this difference in the source of failure between software and hardware, several software reliability models based on statistics have been proposed to quantify what we experience with software: the longer software is run, the higher the probability that it will eventually be used in an untested manner and exhibit a latent defect that results in a failure (Shooman 1987), (Musa 2005), (Denney 2005).
_	This tells us that the probability that we are often interested in is related not just to the 4 bound above, but also probabilities related to the density of prime numbers in the region near "n".
_	If the probability of bouncing right on a peg is "p" (which equals 0.5 on an unbiased level machine) the probability that the ball ends up in the "k"th bin equals formula_2.
_	In this case, the probability that the energy value measured for a system in the state formula_10 will yield the value
_	In other words, the probability that a random variable assumes a value depends on the other random variables only through the ones that are its immediate neighbours.
_	Thus, the current price of the contract could be imputed as the market's global opinion of the probability that the specified event would occur.
_	Peaks have been found in the correlation function (the probability that two galaxies will be a certain distance apart) at , indicating that this is the size of the sound horizon today, and by comparing this to the sound horizon at the time of decoupling (using the CMB), we can confirm that the expansion of the universe is accelerating.
_	Formally, P{"B"|"A"}≥ P{"B"} where P{"B"|"A"} is the conditional probability that "B" will occur given the information that "A" occurred, and P{"B"}is the probability that "B" will occur having no knowledge whether "A" did or did not occur.
_	Through this process, audience control, or the probability that certain responses will occur in the presence of certain audiences, develops.
_	Then the probability that a state with range formula_3 is the nearest neighbour in the four-dimensional space (or in general the ("d"+1)-dimensional space) is
_	Specifically, formula_62 is the probability that the call will be exercised provided one assumes that the asset drift is the risk-free rate.
_	Note that "f" is not one-way for randomly selected integers "p,q">1, since the product will have 2 as a factor with probability 3/4 (because the probability that an arbitrary "p" is odd is 1/2, and likewise for "q", so if they're chosen independently, the probability that both are odd is therefore 1/4; hence the probability that p or q is even is 1 - 1/4 = 3/4).
_	Suppose that somebody secretly rolls two fair six-sided dice, and we wish to compute the probability that the face-up value of the first one is 2, given the information that their sum is no greater than 5.
_	Here, formula_7 is the probability that a particular neutron will strike a fuel nucleus, formula_8 is the probability that the neutron, having struck the fuel, will cause that nucleus to undergo fission, formula_9 is the probability that it will be absorbed by something other than fuel, and formula_
_	10 is the probability that it will "escape" by leaving the core altogether.
_	We can use Bayes' theorem to determine the probability that a positive result is in fact a false positive.
_	The distribution gives the probability that there are zero failures before the first success, one failure before the first success, two failures before the first success, and so on.
_	A typical proof proceeds by operating on the complex object in a random manner and uses the Lovász Local Lemma to bound the probability that any of the features is missing.
_	One use of the password length parameters is in the expression formula_1, where formula_2 is the probability that a password can be guessed in its lifetime, formula_3 is the maximum lifetime a password can be used to log into a system, formula_4 is the number of guesses per unit of time, and formula_5 is the number of unique algorithm-generated passwords (the 'password space').
_	Reliability is the probability that a failure will not occur during a specific span of time.
_	and for any other state "i", let "f" be the probability that the chain ever visits state "j" if it starts at "i",
_	Since the probability of the number being replaced in the round is formula_19, the probability that it survives the round is formula_24.
_	Thus, the probability that a given number is in the reservoir after the round is the product of these two probabilities, i.e. the probability of being in the reservoir after the round, and surviving replacement in the round.
_	The probability of a true positive is the probability that the patient has the disease times the probability that the random classifier guesses this correcty, or formula_12.
_	Even after a fix is developed, the fewer the days since Day Zero, the higher is the probability that an attack against the afflicted software will be successful, because not every user of that software will have applied the fix.
_	For zero-day exploits, the probability that a user has patched their bugs is zero, so the exploit should always succeed.
_	Let be the probability that is outside the ball of radius "ε" centered at "X".
_	For example, when an MOI of 1 (1 viral particle per cell) is used to infect a population of cells, the probability that a cell will not get infected is formula_8, and the probability that it be infected by a single particle is formula_9, by two particles is formula_10, by three particles is formula_11, and so on.
_	However, the court ruled that "When an individual commits an act of gross recklessness without regard to the probability that death to another is likely to result, that individual exhibits the state of mind required to uphold a conviction of manslaughter even if the individual did not intend for death to ensue."
_	A strictly positive tolerance is usually necessary, since the probability that the simulation outcome coincides exactly with the data (event formula_31) is negligible for all but trivial applications of ABC, which would in practice lead to rejection of nearly all sampled parameter points.
_	The following will show that for an oversampling factor of formula_27 the probability that no bucket has more than formula_28 elements is larger than formula_29.
_	Find the probability that exactly two of the tosses result in heads.
_	If more flips are conducted, each further head increases the probability that the coin is the unfair one.
_	But if a tail ever occurs, the probability that the coin is unfair immediately goes to 0 and stays at 0 permanently.
_	The location of the victim's body and the probability that she was seen alive in company of the Manson family prior to her murder prompted police to suspect their involvement in her murder.
_	Admiral Rolf Carls believed "Seal" was a war-winning asset and insisted that she be made operational, despite the probability that three superior new German U-boats could be built for the same cost.
_	That is, "F"("x") returns the probability that "X" will be less than or equal to "x".
_	where the right-hand side represents the probability that the random variable "X" takes on a value less than or
_	At that instant an electron shows up somewhere in accordance with the probability that is the square of the absolute value of the sum of the complex-valued amplitudes of the two superimposed waveforms.
_	where formula_21 is the probability that a particular tag (syntactic probability) and formula_22 is the probability that this tag corresponds to the text formula_23 (lexical probability).
_	From there the probability that x belongs to the prototype event can be calculated.
_	With reference to a "demand period", α denotes the probability that an arbitrarily arriving customer order will be completely served from stock on hand, i.e. without an inventory-related waiting time (period formula_1 service level):
_	It is used to find the probability that a statistic is observed below, above, or between values on the standard normal distribution, and by extension, any normal distribution.
_	Then for all polynomial-time formula_1 the probability that formula_1 succeeds is negligible.
_	The result is a set of weight matrices that will be used to calculate the probability that an examinee has mastered a particular cognitive attribute based on their observed response pattern.
_	An important example of the unilateral Z-transform is the probability-generating function, where the component "x[n]" is the probability that a discrete random variable takes the value "n", and the function "X(z)" is usually written as "X(s)", in terms of "s" = "z".
_	functions represent the probability that a given proposition is "provable" from a set of other propositions, to which probabilities are assigned.
_	Following the "B" path, the probability that any autozygous allele is "passed on" to each successive parent is again (1/2) at each step (including the last one to the "target" X ).
_	C, if the system is not evolving with time and nucleation occurs in one step, then the probability that nucleation has "not" occurred should undergo exponential decay as seen in radioactive decay.
_	In microbiology, sterility assurance level (SAL) is the probability that a single unit that has been subjected to sterilization nevertheless remains nonsterile.
_	They are also capable of discriminating between familiar and unknown queens, and l generally are more attracted to queens of a foreign colony, which likely arose as an outbreeding mating strategy, which increases genetic diversity of the population and decreases the probability that the next generation would be subject to genetic disease.
_	It decompose at various levels, starting from the first level Loss Event Frequency and Probable Loss Magnitude, going on examining the asset, the threat agent capability compared to the vulnerability (computing) and the security control (also called countermeasure) strength, the probability that the agent get in contact and actually act against the asset, the organization capability to react to the event and the impact on stakeholders.
_	This maximizes the probability that exactly one telegram is received.
_	Their initial thesis stated that the lower the level from which a person starts, the greater is the probability that he will be upwardly mobile, simply because many more occupational destinations entail upward mobility for men with low origins than for those with high ones.
_	In addition, certain characteristics of promises and threats, such as "magnitude" and "credibility", affect the probability that the target will gain compliance or failure.
_	The nuclear cross section of a nucleus is used to characterize the probability that a nuclear reaction will occur.
_	A practical definition of reliability is “the probability that a piece of equipment operating under specified conditions shall perform satisfactorily for a given period of time”.
_	The Bose–Einstein probability distribution function is used to find the probability that a boson occupies a specific quantum state in a system at thermal equilibrium.
_	If formula_42, the probability that no coalescent event occurs between the last one and the end of the population at time formula_14; i.e. during the time interval formula_44.
_	One approach which lends itself well to computer implementation is to apply Bayes Theorem, that is formula_5, where the translation model formula_6 is the probability that the source string is the translation of the target string, and the language model formula_7 is the probability of seeing that target language string.
_	In particular, the probability that an edge from formula_23 is contracted grows towards the end.
_	(The expected value of the cut is the sum over edges of the probability that the edge is cut, which is proportional to the angle formula_98 between the vectors at the endpoints of the edge over formula_99.
_	(This will give a function for the probability that "N" ≤ "Z"):
_	In this case, the probability that the needles will cross the lines is formula_41.
_	This dependence on layer thickness is due to the probability that an electron is able to travel distances on the order of exciton diffusion length within the applied electric field.
_	If one assumes the rotations are completely randomly distributed, then the probability that they end up in only two (or three) signs is very small.
_	The square of the absolute amplitude is the probability that the system is in state at time , since
_	This possibility kept it at Level 1 on the Torino impact hazard scale until August 2006, when the probability that Apophis would pass through the keyhole was determined to be very small.
_	These are easily computed, based on the observation that the probability that "k" samples will fall in an interval covering "p" of the range (0 ≤ "p" ≤ 1) is "p" (assuming in this section that draws are "with" replacement, to simplify computations; if draws are without replacement, this overstates the likelihood, and intervals will be overly conservative).
_	Statistical checks assess the probability that data which seem to support a hypothesis come about simply by chance.
_	The probability of type I error is therefore the probability that the estimator belongs to the critical region given that null hypothesis is true (statistical significance) and the probability of type II error is the probability that the estimator doesn't belong to the critical region given that the alternative hypothesis is true.
_	The statistical power of a test is the probability that it correctly rejects the null hypothesis when the null hypothesis is false.
_	Benjamin Peirce, Charles' father, then took the stand and asserted that, given the independence of each downstroke, the probability that all 30 downstrokes should coincide in two genuine signatures was formula_1.
_	An alternative to graphing the probability that the failure time is "less" than or equal to 100 hours is to graph the probability that the failure time is "greater" than 100 hours.
_	The probability that the failure time is greater than 100 hours must be 1 minus the probability that the failure time is less than or equal to 100 hours, because total probability must sum to 1.
_	If the probability that a randomly selected donor is a suitable match is p=0.1, what is the expected number of donors who will be tested before a matching donor is found?
_	Analysts attempt to predict the probability that a borrower will default on its debts, and also the severity of losses in the event of default.
_	The kinship coefficient (φ) is the probability that two homologous loci are identical by descent.
_	A network is named scale-free if its degree distribution, i.e., the probability that a node selected uniformly at random has a certain number of links (degree), follows a particular mathematical function called a power law.
_	The modularity and adaptability of developmental systems reduces the number of regulatory changes needed to generate adaptive phenotypic variation, increases the probability that genetic mutation will be viable, and allows organisms to respond flexibly to novel environments.
_	A history of devaluation of the group that becomes the victim, past violence against the group that becomes the perpetrator leading to psychological wounds, authoritarian cultures and political systems, and the passivity of internal and external (bystanders) all contribute to the probability that the violence develops into genocide.
_	The study assesses paternal investment based on four measures: the probability that a child attends college, the probability that the child receives money for college, the total money spent on children, and the amount of time per week spent with children.
_	Let formula_14 be the probability that, on input the formula_1 first bits of formula_16, a string randomly selected in formula_6 with probability formula_18, the circuit correctly predicts formula_19, i.e. :
_	If we ask whether either of them is a girl, and are told yes, what is the probability that the other child is also a girl?
_	Considering this new child independently, one might expect the probability that the other child is female is ½ (50%).
_	Vulnerability is the probability that one will experience harm.
_	As the transmembrane potential rises, the value of "m" increases, thus increasing the probability that the activation gate will be open.
_	And as the transmembrane potential drops, the value of "h" increases, along with the probability that the inactivation gate will be open.
_	A member stated: "Given the significant and real progress you have made over the years, your case management team is of the opinion that the probability that you commit a crime after your release is low."
_	In the formal model, similarity is the probability that matched responses occur (match method.
_	Then in the limit as tends to infinity the probability that models will tend either to zero or to one:
_	Most SDRs teams combine phone, email, and social media outreach in a multi-channel touch pattern to improve the probability that they will connect with their buyer.
_	The quantity formula_38 is the amplitude that no particles are present, and its absolute square is the probability that the system is in the vacuum.
_	If an item is chosen at random from the total output and is found to be defective, what is the probability that it was produced by the third machine?
_	The probability that more than one is in this latter interval is already formula_20, so we have to calculate the probability that exactly "k" − 1, 1 and "n" − "k" observations fall in the intervals formula_21, formula_22 and formula_23 respectively.
_	This casts doubt on the wisdom of categorizing individuals as having high blood pressure or raised cholesterol and treating these individual risk factors without a consideration of both their overall risk of cardiovascular disease and of the probability that they will benefit.
_	The energy (color) of the photon, and the probability that a photon and not a phonon will be emitted, depends on the material, its purity, and the presence of defects.
_	"Probabilistic completeness" is the property that as more “work” is performed, the probability that the planner fails to find a path, if one exists, asymptotically approaches zero.
_	The probability of having an EF allocation is the probability that formula_40, which is exactly formula_13.
_	If six voters are selected randomly, what is the probability that there will be exactly one supporter for candidate A, two supporters for candidate B and three supporters for candidate C in the sample?
_	formula_2 then represents the probability that will win a match against .
_	Tardive dyskinesia is often misdiagnosed as a mental illness rather than a neurological disorder, and as a result patients are prescribed neuroleptic drugs, which increase the probability that the patient will develop a severe and disabling case, and shortening the typical survival period.
_	Most notable among these is the construction of Chaitin's constant Ω, a real number which expresses the probability that a self-delimiting universal Turing machine will halt when its input is supplied by flips of a fair coin (sometimes thought of as the probability that a random computer program will eventually halt).
_	The main idea of the proof of the existence of small ε-nets is to choose a random sample "x" of cardinality formula_57 and a second independent random sample "y" of cardinality formula_60, and to bound the probability that "x" is missed by some large event "E" by the probability that "x" is missed and simultaneously the intersection of "y" with "E" is larger than its median value.
_	For any particular "E", the probability that "x" is missed while "y" is larger than its median is very small,
_	Factors, including the absolute number or relative fraction of shared citations in the pattern, as well as the probability that citations co-occur in a document are also considered to quantify the patterns’ degree of similarity.
_	The study of this model is to determine if, or at least estimate the probability that, a property may occur.
_	is just the probability that the number of failures before the "r"th success is equal to "k", provided "r" is an integer.
_	A subsequent review of these tests by the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act Scientific Advisory Panel points out that while "the negative results decrease the probability that the Cry9C protein is the cause of allergic symptoms in the individuals examined ... in the absence of a positive control and questions regarding the sensitivity and specificity of the assay, it is not possible to assign a negative predictive value to this."
_	The opposition parties counted on the probability that Governor General Michaëlle Jean would invite a Liberal-NDP coalition able to hold the confidence of the House of Commons to form a government, instead of any other options available to her.
_	Suppose an object is picked at random from "S"; the probability that the object falls into cluster formula_9 is:
_	As with sensitivity, it can be looked at as "the probability that the test result is negative given that the patient is not sick".
_	In particular, they describe how the probability that a stochastic process is in a certain state changes over time.
_	The goal is to find the probability that the driver is drunk given that the breathalyzer indicated he/she is drunk, which can be represented as
_	Risk can be identified as the probability that an undetected software bug may have a negative impact on the user of a system.
_	When the spin of this particle is measured with respect to a given axis (in this example, the -axis), the probability that its spin will be measured as is just formula_29.
_	Correspondingly, the probability that its spin will be measured as is just formula_30.
_	is the probability that we return to state "i" for the first time after "n" steps.
_	Here, formula_10 expresses the rate of incoming matter and formula_5 is the probability that a nucleus of critical size (at the maximum of the energy barrier) will continue to grow and not dissolve.
_	Methods and techniques are needed to: check integrity and accuracy; highlight, identify and corroborate evidence; assess the probability that a given statement is true; equate weight differences between market sectors or companies; establish clearing houses for raising and settling disputes between competing (and possibly conflicting) data providers; and interact with messy erroneous Web data of potentially dubious provenance and quality.
_	He and Randu discuss the probability that the Mule is a mutant and if so, what sort of abilities he might have.
_	Given basic "visibility" conditions on C, it has been proven that as the number of configurations N grows higher, the probability that the above algorithm finds a solution approaches 1 exponentially.
_	In probability theory, the birthday problem or birthday paradox concerns the probability that, in a set of randomly chosen people, some pair of them will have the same birthday.
_	1. We want to calculate the probability that the red ball is "not" taken.
_	This is an exothermic process involving a release of heat, and heating the surface increases the probability that an atom will escape within a given time.
_	The probability of identify (also known as the random match probability) is the probability that two individuals selected at random will have an identical genetic profile.
_	The power of a binary hypothesis test is the probability that the test correctly rejects the null hypothesis (H) when a specific alternative hypothesis (H) is true.
_	This proximity of the king of Larsa to the very doorstep of Uruk further increases the probability that he also controlled the city itself.
_	For example, the concept of the outage probability "p", which is informally the probability of not being able to successfully send a signal on a channel, is made more precise in the point-to-point case by defining it as the probability that the SINR of a channel is less than or equal to some network-dependent threshold.
_	The coverage probability "p" is then the probability that the SINR is larger than the SINR threshold.
_	For instance, [[priming (psychology)|priming]] subjects with information about an effect increases the probability that a person falsely believes is the cause.
_	With this law he computes, for instance “the probability that μ (mean of a Gaussian variable – our note) is less than any assigned value, or the probability that it lies between any assigned values, or, in short, its probability distribution, in the light of the sample observed”.
_	Attempts have been made to put idf on a probabilistic footing, by estimating the probability that a given document contains a term as the relative document frequency,
_	This means that the probability that a randomly chosen graph on formula_24 vertices is not reconstructible goes to 0 as formula_24 goes to infinity.
_	This reconstruction is based on the probability that Risborough (Buckinghamshire), one of Ælfgifu’s holdings mentioned in the will, was previously held by Æthelgyth.
_	And more recent research bears this out, e.g. child abuse has been shown to have a causal role in depression, PTSD, eating disorders, substance abuse and dissociative disorders, and research reveals that the more severe the abuse the higher the probability that psychiatric symptoms will develop in adult life.
_	Finally, if Alice measures spin in c direction and Bob measures in b direction, the probability that both
_	Local connectivity means the probability that any two sensor nodes have a common key with which they can establish a secure link to communicate.
_	How does the number of hours spent studying affect the probability that the student will pass the exam?
_	The few people who publicly mentioned the book suggested the probability that the poems were written by either Johanne or Michael Agerskov, themselves, or maybe by their subconscious selves.
_	1) to find the county where the loser owns real estate property; 2) the probability that there are secured loans, tax liens and/or other judgments that come ahead of the judgment lien; 3) the possibility that the loser/debtor may go bankrupt and avoid paying the debt.
_	The quantities that describe how they change in time are the transition probabilities formula_40, which gives the probability that, starting at x, the particle ends up at y time t later.
_	The objective of Design Controls, in this context, is to require that manufacturers follow a methodologically-sound process to develop a medical device, with the intent of improving the probability that the device will reach an acceptable level of efficacy and safety.
_	What does it mean to say that the probability that a coin lands heads is ½?
_	In cold fusion reactions (which use heavier projectiles, typically from the fourth period, and lighter targets, usually lead and bismuth), the fused nuclei produced have a relatively low excitation energy (~10–20 MeV), which decreases the probability that these products will undergo fission reactions.
_	As the transmembrane voltage is increased the probability that a given voltage gated sodium channel is open is increased, thus enabling an influx of Na ions.
_	Under these assumptions, the probability that no large meteorites hit the earth in the next 100 years is roughly 0.37.
_	the probability that reaction is formula_14,
_	An important concept in survival analysis is the hazard rate, defined as the probability that the event will occur at time t conditional on surviving until time t.
_	where formula_6 is the probability that amino acid formula_2 transforms into amino acid formula_3 and formula_9, formula_10 are the frequencies of amino acids i and j.
_	The probability of "at least one" event that exceeds design limits during the expected life of the structure is the complement of the probability that "no" events occur which exceed design limits.
_	In other words the probability that "x" < "z" strictly increases if one adds the condition that "x" < "y".
_	She was referring to the probability that the man elected vice president would later become president, either by succession or by a presidential bid.
_	There are "n" phases, so the probability that formula_21 is lucky because "V" selects at some stage a convenient "r" is at most 1/"n".
_	Multiplying by that value gives a probability vector, giving the probability that the maximizing player will choose each of the possible pure strategies.
_	This makes sense since the more means there are, the greater the probability that at least some differences between pairs of means will be significantly large due to chance alone.
_	Lemma: "For a randomly selected formula_234 the probability that formula_252 is irreducible is about one third."
_	These provided measures of the probability that a given piece could help to fill or 'tile' a given region, and the probability that a given region could be tiled by some combination of pieces.
_	In response to these concerns, the U.S. federal government set in motion "an aggressive program for cleaning up abandoned hazardous waste sites, without examining the probability that illness would actually occur," and legislation was passed that did not reflect serious study of the actual degree of danger.
_	Frequently, a pleasant-smelling perfume is used to encourage the member of the opposite sex to more deeply inhale the air surrounding its wearer, increasing the probability that the individual's pheromones will be inhaled.
_	Eventually Ellen Marx was reconciled to the probability that Nora was dead, but she never stopped trying to find out more about what had happened, though many details remain uncertain.
_	Utilizing this contract structure, the current price of a contract can be imputed as "the market's" global opinion of the probability that the specified event will occur.
_	In that case, μ = 50, but probability of ultimate extinction is greater than 0.5, since that's the probability that the first individual has 0 children).
_	This would imply that the probability that a new node will attach to a node that has a zero degree is zero – formula_2.
_	The Chou–Fasman method takes into account only the probability that each individual amino acid will appear in a helix, strand, or turn.
_	Thus the probability that "A" is less than "B" is the same as the probability that their difference is less than zero, and this probability can be said to be the value of the expression "A" < "B".
_	Sinha and his wife, Urbasi Sinha, an associate professor at the Raman Research Institute (RRI), along with other scientists in RRI working in similar areas set up a tabletop experiment that will provide scientists their first opportunity to measure the probability that particles can move through slits in a twisted path.
_	The probability that two lineages coalesce in the immediately preceding generation is the probability that they share a parental DNA sequence.
_	Under a random mating model, the probability that two alleles originate from the same parental copy is thus 1/(2"N") and, correspondingly, the probability that they do "not" coalesce is 1 − 1/(2"N").
_	Then, the probability that this so-called unlikely event does "not" happen (improbability) in a single trial is 99.9% (0.999).
_	In fact, since u is selected randomly, the probability that a webpage with degree formula_3
_	Launched singly a missile with a 50% chance of getting through to its target will only get to its target 50% of the time, but with a salvo two such missiles the chance of at least one missile getting through is 75%, with three missiles 87.5% etc., with the probability that at least one missile will get through to its target becoming closer to certainty with each missile fired.
_	When relaxing the requirement on solvability it seems rational to require that the probability that a solution is obtained approaches 1 if the procedure is allowed to continue forever.
_	where formula_9 is the average degree of the network, formula_10 is the total number of vertices, formula_11 is the probability a randomly chosen vertex will have degree formula_2, and formula_13 is the probability that a randomly picked edge will connect on one side a vertex with degree formula_2 with a vertex of degree formula_3.
_	The large surface areas of these solids increase the probability that a reactant molecule in solution will come into contact with the catalyst surface and react.
_	In this form of mixture, each of the sources is described by a component probability density function, and its mixture weight is the probability that an observation comes from this component.
_	Because the language component is repeated again and again, it becomes automated and increases the probability that it will last in the memory (Schöpper-Grabe 1998: 241).
_	Thus, specifying the cross section for a given reaction is a proxy for stating the probability that a given scattering process will occur.
_	It follows that if all bijections are assigned the same probability then the probability that a random bijection is a derangement quickly approaches 1/"e" as "n" grows.
_	Under a more thorough quantum mechanical analysis, an electron has some probability of showing up at any point in the universe, but the probability that it will be far from where one might expect it to be becomes very low for places at great distances from the neighborhood in which it was originally found.
_	With these corrections, the scientists were capable of implementing a coin flipping protocol by introducing a small honest abort probability, the probability that two honest participants cannot obtain a coin flip at the end of the protocol, but at a short communication distance.
_	The second condition that needs to be met in support of the predator attraction hypothesis is that additional predators must occasionally disrupt predation events, increasing the probability that prey will escape.
_	In cases of threats to bodily well-being, the standard depends on the probability that an injury will actually occur.
_	The communities of randomly chosen nodes in each iteration follow a p(C) distribution that represents the probability that a randomly picked node is from the community C. Consider a partition of the same network that was predicted by some community finding algorithm and has p(C2) distribution.
_	For a prolonged modulation (or demodulation), it will be appropriate to consider the probability that an assigned value of the degree of distortion will be exceeded.
_	This "resonance" greatly increases the probability that an incoming alpha particle will combine with beryllium-8 to form carbon.
_	In a large single-column formation, a signal could take 10 minutes or more to be passed from one end of the line to the other, whereas in a formation of parallel columns, visibility across the diagonals was often better (and always shorter) than in a single long column, and the diagonals gave signal "redundancy", increasing the probability that a message would be quickly seen and correctly interpreted.
_	Typically, a borrower’s credit is highly related to the probability that the loan will go into default (failure to make monthly installments).
_	By calculation, for any edge e in "E", the probability that it is cut is 1/2.
_	That is, the probability that the absolute difference is a small number, approaches zero as the number of flips becomes large.
_	The correlation function (ξ) is a function of comoving galaxy separation distance ("s") and describes the probability that one galaxy will be found within a given distance of another.
_	the probability that a composite number could pass the test every time is at most formula_216.
_	define a randomized scheme for generating hash functions to be universal if, for any two keys, the probability that they collide (that is, they are mapped to the same value as each other) is 1/"m", where "m" is the number of values that the keys can take on.
_	They defined a stronger property in the subsequent paper : a randomized scheme for generating hash functions is "k"-independent" if, for every "k"-tuple of keys, and each possible "k"-tuple of values, the probability that those keys are mapped to those values is 1/"m". 2-independent hashing schemes are automatically universal, and any universal hashing scheme can be converted into a 2-independent scheme by storing a random number "x" as part of the initialization phase of the algorithm and adding "x" to each hash value.
_	Using 130 years of data on historical migrations to the United States, one study finds "that a doubling of the number of residents with ancestry from a given foreign country relative to the mean increases by 4.2 percentage points the probability that at least one local firm invests in that country, and increases by 31% the number of employees at domestic recipients of FDI from that country.
_	Anoxia does, however, reduce the probability that scavengers will disturb the dead organism, and the activity of other organisms is undoubtedly one of the leading causes of soft-tissue destruction.
_	Documents are then ranked by the probability that a query is observed as a random sample from the document model.
_	Notice that while this gives the probability that a future observation will fall in a range, it does not give any estimate as to where in a segment it will fall – notably, if it falls outside the range of observed values, it may be far outside the range.
_	Their analysis usually requires a bound on the probability that a non-zero polynomial will have roots at randomly selected test points.
_	Each (directed) edge from vertex v to vertex v carries a weight P , which represents the probability that the molecule will move to conformation v , given that it is currently at v.
_	The key element of the report is believed to be the physical report prepared by Alcides Agustín López Revilla, which concluded that: the form in which Ciro fell "reduces the probability that anyone pushed him."
_	A particular case is the self-coancestry of individual A with itself, f(A,A), which is the probability that taking one random allele from A and then, independently and with replacement, another random allele also from A, both are identical by descent.
_	The higher the score, the better the credit history and the higher the probability that the loan will be repaid on time.
_	For every constant formula_61, a randomized mechanism is called truthful with probability formula_62 if for every agent and for every vector of bids, the probability that the agent benefits by bidding non-truthfully is at most formula_63, where the probability is taken over the randomness of the mechanism.
_	The plaintiff must show a similarity between the two works, and the degree of similarity will affect the probability that illicit copying in fact occurred in the court's eyes.
_	For example, the presence of a stop sign (a discriminative stimulus) at a traffic intersection increases the probability that "braking" behavior will occur.
_	It gives the probability that the value of a standard normal random variable formula_39 will exceed formula_68: formula_162.
_	Having already borne healthy children increases the probability that mothers will not follow clinical recommendations, attributing positive prenatal situations to their past experiences.
_	where formula_2 is the multiplicity of infection or MOI, formula_1 is the number of infectious agents that enter the infection target, and formula_6 is the probability that an infection target (a cell) will get infected by formula_1 infectious agents.
_	If 8% of variants of a given gene are defective, the probability of a single copy being defective is 8%, but the probability that two copies are both defective is 0.08, i.e. 0.64%.
_	The probability associated with a type is the probability that the player, for whom the type is specified, is that type.
_	Removing the scar is one treatment option; however, it may result in more severe consequences: the probability that the resulting surgery scar will also become a keloid is high, usually greater than 50%.
_	Let "q" denote the probability that a given neutron induces fission in a nucleus.
_	Based on how much the suspect datum differs from the mean, use the normal distribution function (or a table thereof) to determine the probability that a given data point will be at the value of the suspect data point.
_	It can be looked at as "the probability that a non-relevant document is retrieved by the query".
_	Sensitivity shows the probability that the output of the Boolean function of a given node changes if its input changes.
_	The knowledge error formula_29 denotes the probability that the verifier formula_8 might accept formula_1, even though the prover does in fact not know a witness formula_10.
_	The RCMS program was a highly regarded and very successful program designed to increase the probability that beginning undergraduate science, mathematics, or engineering minority students would successfully obtain graduate degrees and was the forerunner of the Louis Stokes Alliance for Minority Participation (LSAMP) program in Louisiana for which Slaughter was a Phase One Co-Principal Investigator and Associate Director.
_	It is often useful to have an idea of the probability that a given piece can be removed in the next round.
_	Here consists of the possible combinations of values of the parameters formula_28, formula_29, formula_30, and formula_31, which are the probability that coins 1 and 2 come up heads or tails.
_	The post-test probability is a highly useful Bayesian equation that allows for the calculation of the probability that a condition is present when the test is positive, conditioned by the pretest prevalence of the condition of interest.
_	Independent of this attack, an adversary may attempt to systematically guess many different tags for a given input to authenticated decryption and thereby increase the probability that one (or more) of them, eventually, will be accepted as valid.
_	Note that this is not a symmetrical interval – this is merely the probability that an observation is less than "μ" + 2"σ".
_	To compute the probability that an observation is within two standard deviations of the mean (small differences due to rounding):
_	It is thought of as the probability that the particle will travel into a pore within the capillary walls before traveling into the interstitial fluid.
_	The probability that "A" rolls a higher number than "B", the probability that "B" rolls higher than "C", and the probability that "C" rolls higher than "A" are all , so this set of dice is nontransitive.
_	Among those hazards are mostly non-immediate risks like the probability that individual trees will not withstand strong winds (as during a thunderstorm) and damage parking cars or injure passing pedestrians.
_	In cold fusion reactions, the produced fused nuclei have a relatively low excitation energy (~10–20 MeV), which decreases the probability that these products will undergo fission reactions.
_	An alert defense understands the probability that the offense will call the play at a specific moment, and thus it may choose to call for a pitchout at that moment to defend it.
_	Karl Pearson showed that the probability that the next ("n" + 1) trials will be successes, after n successes in n trials, is only 50%, which has been considered too low by scientists like Jeffreys and unacceptable as a representation of the scientific process of experimentation to test a proposed scientific law.
_	Security officials remained more cautious, tending to accept the probability that a Hebronite Hamas cell was involved, but uncertain whether it was a local initiative to secure prisoner releases or an operation approved by the Hamas leadership in Gaza.
_	RealClearPolitics reported an average lead in the polls of 15.2% for Shumlin and HuffPost Pollster's model estimated Shumlin would beat Milne 51.1% to 37% with the probability that Shumlin would win the election at 95%.
_	This is not the same as saying that the probability that formula_32, given the observation HH, is 0.25.
_	Here, formula_1 means the probability that two individuals picked at random will have a common ancestor.
_	The story takes place in the near future where it is possible to instantaneously measure a person's mental state, personality, and the probability that a person will commit crimes with a device installed on each citizen's body called the Psycho-Pass.
_	The grids are constructed so that the probability that two points formula_84 are assigned to the same bin is proportional to formula_94.
_	Cardiovascular risk scoring systems give an estimate of the probability that a person will develop cardiovascular disease within a specified amount of time, usually 10 to 30 years.
_	Without selection, these CIs offer simultaneous coverage, in the sense that the probability that all CIs cover their respective parameters is at least 1 − α. unfortunately, even such a strong property does not ensure the conditional confidence property following selection.
_	If it can be shown that they are fully compliant with their medication, then the probability that they have another diagnosis (perhaps in addition to the diagnosis of TB) is very high.
_	Both developmental and contextual plasticity influence the fitness of an animal in a novel environment by increasing the probability that the animal will survive in that environment.
_	After performing a number of statistical analyses on the quasar data, and finding extreme changes in the Huge-LQG membership and shape with small changes in the cluster finding parameters, he determined the probability that apparent clusters the size of the Huge-LQG would appear in a random assortment of quasars.
_	be the probability that formula_26 and let formula_27.
_	thus the probability that we chose either "x" or "y" is the sum of their probabilities thus .
_	Predictability indicates the probability that adversary can guess a secret key.
_	For nucleation of a new thermodynamic phase, such as the formation of ice in water below 0 °C, if the system is not evolving with time and nucleation occurs in one step, then the probability that nucleation has not occurred should undergo exponential decay.
_	In the BTL model, the probability that object "j" is judged to have more of an attribute than object "i" is:
_	Simple approaches use the average values of the rated item vector while other sophisticated methods use machine learning techniques such as Bayesian Classifiers, cluster analysis, decision trees, and artificial neural networks in order to estimate the probability that the user is going to like the item.
_	It is important to be able to predict the probability that the cash inflows and outflows will be in the amounts predicted, what is the probability that the timing of them will be as predicted, and what the probability is that there may be unexpected cash flows, and in what amounts they might occur.
_	Therefore, the probability that formula_20 is equal to formula_23.
_	If competitors place even a very small probability on the possibility that the monopolist is spiteful, and places intrinsic value on being (or appearing) aggressive, and the monopolist knows this, then even if the monopolist has payoffs as described above, responding to entry in an early town with aggression will be optimal if it increases the probability that later competitors place on the monopolist's being spiteful.
_	Conventional tests of statistical significance are based on the probability that a particular result would arise if chance alone were at work, and necessarily accept some risk of mistaken conclusions of a certain type (mistaken rejections of the null hypothesis).
_	Suppose that the probability a person has the disease is formula_8 and the probability that they do not is formula_9.
_	This histogram provides information not visible from the static DCF: for example, it allows for an estimate of the probability that a project has a net present value greater than zero (or any other value).
_	If we have a system consisting of many particles, the probability of a particle being in state "i" is practically the probability that, if we pick a random particle from that system and check what state it is in, we will find it is in state "i".
_	By lemma 1, the probability that is the probability that no edge of "C" is selected during iteration "i".
_	where P(1) is the probability that the next bit will be a 1, P(1) is the probability estimated by the "i'th" model, and
_	where "P"(*) is the probability that a linear order < extending the partial order has the property *.
_	The probability that each of the four survivors has a given allele is 1/2, and so the probability that any particular allele combination occurs when the solution shrinks is
_	They increase the probability that the consequences of how to decide and act in accordance with how to plan.
_	Since the probability that the user's jondo ultimately submits the request is 1/n where n is the size of the crowd when the path was created.
_	Thus we learn that the probability that the eavesdropper learns the identity of the receiver decreases as a function of crowd size.
_	By Kolmogorov's zero–one law, for any fixed "M", the probability that the event
_	The first term in the numerator is therefore the probability of at least one boy born on Tuesday, given that the family has two boys, or (one minus the probability that neither boy is born on Tuesday).
_	More precisely, it refers to changes in the probability that an agent chooses a particular option when it is set as a default as opposed to the situation where this option has not been set as default.
_	Here, formula_3 is the number of network links for which flow rates can be adjusted; formula_4 is the link inflow rate for a link with index formula_5; formula_6, where formula_7; formula_8 is the bottleneck index, formula_9, formula_10; formula_11 is the probability that during the observation time interval traffic breakdown occurs at bottleneck with index formula_8.
_	Thus the probability that individual A is chosen for reproduction is not "i / N" any more but dependent on the fitness of A and thus
_	that is, the codeword formula_9 that maximizes the probability that formula_10 was received, given that formula_9 was sent.
_	The reaction term can be deduced by noting that formula_75 particles can interact in formula_76 different ways, so that the probability that a pair annihilates is formula_77, yielding a term
_	This allows cache lines to represent square tiles, increasing the probability that nearby accesses are in the cache.
_	Given these data, Bayes showed in detail how to compute the probability that the ratio of blanks to prizes is between 9:1 and 11:1 (the probability is low - about 7.7%).
_	In cold fusion reactions, the produced fused nuclei have a relatively low excitation energy (~10–20 MeV), which decreases the probability that these products will undergo fission reactions.
_	Delage estimated the probability that the image on the shroud was not caused by the body of Jesus Christ as 1 in 10 billion.
_	The significantly more sensitive Very Large Array did not detect the signal, and the probability that a signal below the detection threshold of the Very Large Array could be detected by the Big Ear due to interstellar scintillation is low.
_	Fractionalization measures are computing the probability that two randomly drawn individuals (from a country) are not from the same group (ethnic, religious, or whatever the criterion is).
_	The "p"-value is the probability that a given result (or a more significant result) would occur under the null hypothesis.
_	The "p"-value does not provide the probability that either hypothesis is correct (a common source of confusion).
_	Under typical physiological conditions, this results in an efflux of K from the cell, which leads to cell membrane hyperpolarization (a decrease in the electrical potential across the cell membrane) and a decrease in cell excitability (a decrease in the probability that the cell will transmit an action potential).
_	formula_26 is the probability that an agent assigns for obtaining outcome formula_
_	The unlabeled pixels are each imagined to release a random walker, and the probability is computed that each pixel's random walker first arrives at a seed bearing each label, i.e., if a user places K seeds, each with a different label, then it is necessary to compute, for each pixel, the probability that a random walker leaving the pixel will first arrive at each seed.
_	The Product Space consists of a network of products, where two products are connected according to the probability that they are co-exported, indicating that they tend to require similar capabilities.
_	The smaller the population the greater the probability that fluctuations will lead to extinction.
_	The differential equations for the probability that the system is in state "k" at time "t" are,
_	Returning to the original problem, we see that the probability that the left pocket is found to be empty first is formula_9 which equals formula_10 because both are equally likely.
_	To estimate the probability that examinees possess specific attributes, given their observed item response pattern, an artificial neural network approach is used.
_	Now it remains to calculate the probability that the implication graph contains a pair path.
_	When calculating one sided upper (or lower) Confidence interval for the true value of the difference between the mean of the treatment and the control group, formula_20 constitutes the probability that this actual value will be less than the upper (or greater than the lower) limit of that interval.
_	When calculating two-sided confidence interval, formula_20 constitutes the probability that the true value will be between the upper and the lower limits.
_	Randomized experiments demonstrate that the performance of low-achieving students can be improved by using technology that adjusts the level of difficulty of the books and math problems that are presented to each student, raises the probability that each student will achieve high scores on end-of-book reading comprehension quizzes and high accuracy scores on daily math assignments, raises the probability that each student can earn high letter grades, and creates a structured environment where each student is likely to receive regular, objective, positive feedback signaling that he or she is advancing on a daily basis, promoting high self-efficacy and a strong sense of control over academic outcomes.
_	Risky sexual behavior is the description of the activity that will increase the probability that a person engaging in sexual activity with another person infected with a sexually transmitted infection will be infected or become pregnant, or make a partner pregnant.
_	P(I|H) - given that a collaborator is on the path, what is the probability that the path initiator is the first collaborator's immediate predecessor?
_	If is not prime, the probability that this is proved by the test is higher than 1/4.
_	Therefore, after non-conclusive random tests, the probability that is not prime is lower than , and may thus be made as low as desired, by increasing .
_	Brzezinski later claimed that "We didn't push the Russians to intervene, but we knowingly increased the probability that they would."
_	Some archaeologists were skeptical, citing the probability that the bones had been mis-labeled in the last century, or perhaps jumbled with bones from other nearby graves.
_	as for large values of "u" the probability that there is a level crossing is approximately the probability of reaching that level.
_	Thus, several important parameters of vascular remodelling can be described using the combined models of diffusion-limited aggregation and dielectric breakdown: the probability that a branch will close off (plasticity of vessel splitting), that a vessel will reconnect to the venous line (plasticity of sprout regrowth), shrinkage resistance of sprouting tips (a balance between external compression and internal shear stress), and the ratio of external tissue growth to internal vessel expansion.
_	In these interpretations, a value is interpreted as the "degree" of truth – to what extent a proposition is true, or the probability that the proposition is true.
_	It is impossible for the observation of a black raven to increase the probability of the proposition "All ravens are black" without causing exactly the same change to the probability that "All non-black things are non-ravens".
_	Let denote a function such that for any formula_31, for any program and for any input formula_108, the probability that formula_109 outputs an overflow is at most formula_110.
_	The question that we desire to answer is: "what is the probability that a given document "D" belongs to a given class "C"?"
_	Using data from mail order retailers he studied the way prices are set finding that they change about once a year, the size of price change is very irregular for a given item, the last digit of the price influences the probability that the price will change and the same item often will have some periods when the price may be constant for more than a year and at other times may change by only one or two percent.
_	What is the probability that the chord is longer than a side of the triangle?
_	On balance, the probability that a Hs 293 launched (and seen as responding to operator guidance) would actually strike a target (or achieve a damage-inflicting near miss) was about the same at Anzio as it was during Operation Avalanche.
_	but thanks to the semi-final selection phase, we can prove that the probability that the implication graph contains a pair path of length at least 3 is at most formula_3.
_	"where" formula_10 "is the probability that a random walk on G starting from x will be in y after n steps, and C is some constant."
_	From the middle of 2012 until election day, the FiveThirtyEight model updated its estimates of the probability that Barack Obama and Mitt Romney would win a majority of the electoral votes.
_	They compute the probability that the monthly change in the nominal exchange rate lies inside the 2.5 percent band.
_	To put it another way, if we assume that the probability that a man is a studier is formula_4, the probability that a woman is a studier is also formula_4, and we assume that both men and women enter our sample independently of whether or not they are studiers, then this hypergeometric formula gives the conditional probability of observing the values "a, b, c, d" in the four cells, conditionally on the observed marginals (i.e., assuming the row and column totals shown in the margins of the table are given).
_	In this case, if the vector has the norm 1, then is just the probability that the quantum system resides in the state .
_	Furthermore, three basic hypotheses are presented by Galtung and Ruge: the additivity hypothesis that the more factors an event satisfies, the higher the probability that it becomes news; the complementarity hypothesis that the factors will tend to exclude each other; and the exclusion hypothesis that events that satisfy none or very few factors will not become news.
_	The probability P(zero failures before first success) is simply the probability that the first drug works.
_	For a given number of unknown dice "n", the probability that "exactly" a certain quantity "q" of any face value are showing, "P(q)", is
_	The probability of disruption formula_11 is the probability that crossover or mutation will destroy the schema formula_5.
_	Greenberg's Diversity Index (LDI) is the probability that two people selected from the population at random will have different mother tongues; it therefore ranges from 0 (everyone has the same mother tongue) to 1 (no two people have the same mother tongue).
_	If a spark is the initiating event there is a probability that the spark will start a fire or will not start a fire (binary yes or no) as well as the probability that the fire spreads to a tree or does not spread to a tree.
_	In "The Aramaic Origin of the Fourth Gospel" he attempted to prove that St John's Gospel was a literal Greek translation of a Gospel written in Aramaic by a Jewish disciple, and this at least led to an accepted view that the author thought in Aramaic, and strengthened the probability that it was the work of an eyewitness.
_	Lifetime risk of maternal death: refers to the probability that a 15-year-old female will die eventually from a maternal cause if she experiences throughout her lifetime the risks of maternal death and the overall levels of fertility and mortality that are observed for a given population.
_	Then the probability that a given document "D" contains all of the words formula_80, given a class "C", is
_	The purpose of the model is to estimate the probability that an observation with particular characteristics will fall into a specific one of the categories; moreover, classifying observations based on their predicted probabilities is a type of binary classification model.
_	So, the probability that a person triggering the alarm actually is a terrorist, is only about 99 in 10,098, which is less than 1%, and very, very far below our initial guess of 99%.
_	Availability is the probability that a navigation system meets the accuracy and integrity requirements.
_	With the relative risk conferred from the family history, the probability that primary hyperparathyroidism (PH) would have occurred in the first place in the individual given from the currently available information becomes:
_	Let formula_6 be the level of this test, that is, the probability that we falsely reject formula_7 when it is true.
_	Former FRB chairman Alan Greenspan says that the probability that the US defaults on its debt repayment is zero, because the US government can print money.
_	If an integer is randomly selected from the interval [1, "n"], then the probability that it belongs to "A" is the ratio of the number of elements of "A" in [1, "n"] to the total number of elements in [1, "n"].
_	At each iteration, the coefficients are adjusted via a "routing" softmax so that they continue to sum to 1 (to express the probability that a given capsule is the parent of a given child.)
_	Similarly, the probability that a feature is present in the input is exaggerated by a nonlinear "squashing" function that reduces values (smaller ones drastically and larger ones such that they are less than 1).
_	The lack of gravity, or the existence of gravity at a small fraction of the gravitational force of the Earth, increases the time during which dust remains airborne, thereby increasing the probability that these dust particles will be inhaled.
_	The Poisson distribution is the probability distribution of a random variable formula_1 (called a "Poisson random variable") such that the probability that formula_1 equals formula_3 is given by:
_	For urban trees, maintaining vigorous, healthy growing conditions (through watering, mulching around the base and adding compost to the drip line) and avoiding wounds will reduce the probability that trees will be affected by this disease.
_	3's destination changed following the German invasion of France on 10 May 1940, which further increased the probability that Italy would enter the war.
_	A pursuit of these two suggestions has established the probability that this, Eupatrid, clan traced its origin to Orestes, and derived its name from the hero, who was above all a benefactor of his father.
_	In probability theory, the harmonic measure of a subset of the boundary of a bounded domain in Euclidean space formula_1, formula_2 is the probability that a Brownian motion started inside a domain hits that subset of the boundary.
_	Given that each element of a tableau is the smallest in its hook and filling the tableau shape at random, the probability that cell formula_12 will contain the minimum element of the corresponding hook is the reciprocal of the hook length.
_	In particular, for a randomly chosen input, if one flips the "i"-th bit, then the probability that the "j"-th output bit will change should be one half, for any "i" and "j"—this is termed the strict avalanche criterion.
_	A voice-over says that an actuary of the British newspaper "The Sunday Times" calculated the probability that all these people who witnessed the assassination would die within that period of time to be 100,000-trillion-to-one.
_	Conditional on formula_12, the probability that person n chooses alternative i is the standard logit formula:
_	Specifically, the electrical potential, formula_10 at node formula_2 will equal the probability that a random walker dropped at node formula_2 will reach an object/foreground node before reaching a background node.
_	The larger the chip, the higher the probability that normal use could damage it.
_	In the most general kind of scattering-with-precession experiment, the data can be used to construct the 2D 'wavelength intensity matrix' for the surface scattering process, i.e. the probability that a helium atom of a certain incoming wavelength scatters into a state with a certain outgoing wavelength.
_	What is the probability that the bacterium dies between 5 hours and 5.01 hours?
_	What is the probability that the bacterium dies between 5 hours and 5.001 hours?
_	In this case, inflation forecast fan charts are usually accompanied with the balance of risks, the probability that the future inflation falls below its modal forecast.
_	The algorithm computes the probability that pairs of datapoints in the high-dimensional space are related, and then chooses low-dimensional embeddings which produce a similar distribution.
_	formula_183 is the probability that when formula_184 are randomly picked from formula_185, "with replacement" and
_	For any integer "m" such that "k" ≤ "m" ≤ "N", the probability that the sample maximum will be equal to "m" can be computed as follows.
_	The AE retrieves events from the Event Queue, processes them, and makes a final determination as to the probability that a successful attack will be launched, and/or an attack is in progress at the local level.
_	If the establishment of the reference range could have been made assuming a normal distribution, then the probability that the result would be an effect of random variability can be further specified as follows:
_	Given the model specifications, the probability that a given neuron formula_10 spikes in a time period formula_11 may be described by
_	In addition, for large values of "n", on average the probability that a composite number is declared "probably prime" is significantly smaller than 4.
_	Prior to taking action against Wang, Chen Baxian considered the probability that Wang's son-in-law Du Kan (杜龕), then the governor of Wuxing Commandery, would act against Chen Baxian, and secretly sent Chen Qian back to their home county of Changcheng (長城) to prepare to intercept
_	With an estimate of the sampling probability, or the probability that the factor would be measured in another measurement, inverse probability weighting can be used to inflate the weight for subjects who are under-represented due to a large degree of missing data.
_	The statistical support for a node in Bayesian inference is expected to reflect the probability that a clade really exists given the data and evolutionary model.
_	For example, a DNN that is trained to recognize dog breeds will go over the given image and calculate the probability that the dog in the image is a certain breed.
_	The ELF index is a measure of the probability that two randomly chosen individuals belong to different ethno-linguistic groups.
_	If the first atom is measured to be in formula_52, then the probability that the second atom is in formula_55 depends on the amount of time between sending in the first and the second atoms.
_	PPV is used to indicate the probability that in case of a positive test, that the patient really has the specified disease.
_	where "W" is the weight fraction of hydrocarbons containing "n" carbon atoms, and "α" is the chain growth probability or the probability that a molecule will continue reacting to form a longer chain.
_	The higher the score, the higher the probability that the message is spam.
_	The Sulston score is the probability that at least formula_8 fragment lengths on clone formula_2 will be matched by any combination of lengths on formula_1.
_	The proximity of the two groups enhances the probability that the reaction could occur and thus the reaction rate is increased.
_	Second, as founders become more geographically separated, the probability that two individuals from different founder populations will mate becomes smaller.
_	The intensity of the male's coloration (which is due to carotenoid pigments) predicts their success at holding territory in their non-breeding, winter locations in the Caribbean, the probability that they will be polygynous, and the proportion of offspring in their nests that they will themselves father.
_	A closely related notion is the probability that a universal computer outputs some string x when fed with a program chosen at random.
_	In particular, if we know that the dice are fair and that the rolling would not have been stopped before double sixes turned up, then the probability that we are seeing the first roll is at most 1/36.
_	Inputting the letter frequencies for the English language, the probability that a 1,700-letter sequence will contain all 26 letters is about 50%.
_	Thus, we have to accept the probability that they were used throughout the Hellenistic era.
_	The net result is an increased amount of serotonin in the synapse, thus increasing the probability that serotonin will interact with a serotonin receptor of the postsynaptic neuron.
_	Such range of semi-axis values should, with a number of assumptions, reduce the probability that the actual orbit is beyond this range to less than 0.3%.
_	Therefore, the probability that during any particular period from t=2nT to t=(2n+1)T, (that is for any particular non-zero integer value of n) exactly one node will begin transmission is
_	This work described several now famous results, including Condorcet's jury theorem, which states that if each member of a voting group is more likely than not to make a correct decision, the probability that the highest vote of the group is the correct decision increases as the number of members of the group increases, and Condorcet's paradox, which shows that majority preferences can become intransitive with three or more options – it is possible for a certain electorate to express a preference for A over B, a preference for B over C, and a preference for C over A, all from the same set of ballots.
_	However, in trying to calculate the marginal probability P(H=hit), what we are asking for is the probability that H=Hit in the situation in which we don't actually know the particular value of L and in which the pedestrian ignores the state of the light.
_	At the same time, the probability that the sequence "contains" a particular subsequence (such as the word MONKEY, or the 12th through 999th digits of pi, or a version of the King James Bible) increases as the total string increases.
_	Another commentator argued that because Lorenzo Prado Navarette's driving was "irreproachable" for at least five minutes, "the probability that Lorenzo Navarette was legally drunk was surely less than the probability for the average daytime driver of a pickup truck; indeed, it ostensibly was all but zero."
_	"In an election where candidate A receives "p" votes and candidate B receives "q" votes with "p" > "q", what is the probability that A will be strictly ahead of B throughout the count?"
_	Only in this case does a successful outcome increase the probability that the hypothesis is true.
_	Plantinga's argument attempted to show that to combine naturalism and evolution is self-defeating, because, under these assumptions, the probability that humans have reliable cognitive faculties is low or inscrutable.
_	(either a finite set or a measurable space formula_6); a transition probability formula_7 from formula_8, where formula_9 is the action profiles, to formula_2, where formula_11 is the probability that the next state is in formula_12 given the current state formula_13 and the current action profile formula_14; and a payoff function formula_15 from formula_8 to formula_17, where the formula_18-th coordinate of formula_15, formula_20, is the payoff to player formula_18 as a function of the state formula_13 and the action profile formula_14.
_	The guard bands will reduce the probability that adjacent channels will interfere, but decrease the utilization of the spectrum.
_	But if there is clear evidence that the accused had a different motive, this may decrease the probability that he or she desired the actual outcome.
_	Second, subsequent predators must disrupt the predation event, thereby increasing the probability that the prey will escape.
_	The discovery of Saturn's "Phoebe ring" in 2009 further strengthened the probability that this process first described by Soter plays a significant role in shaping Iapetus's appearance.
_	As in many disorders that are very rare, an infant with this unusual form of sleep apnea suffers from the probability that their physician has most likely never seen another case and will not recognize the diagnosis.
_	search at location formula_3, formula_5; the probability of finding the object by a single search at location formula_3 if it is at this location, formula_7; and the probability that the object is at location formula_3, formula_9.
_	P is the probability that at least one of the nontransmitted parental marker alleles equals the allele of interest H.
_	Since fertility peaks at a certain age, pushing childbirth past that age significantly decreases the probability that certain women will be able to have children.
_	Finally the probability that positions formula_28 and formula_29 form a base pair is given by:
_	Commentators noted that Prime Minister Abbott would have had to deal with the probability that "a significant number of government MPs would not support her in a no-confidence motion."
_	In cold fusion reactions, the produced fused nuclei have a relatively low excitation energy (~10–20 MeV), which decreases the probability that these products will undergo fission reactions.
_	In addition, at UNO, Slaughter designed and directed the "Next Step" LSAMP program component designed to increase the probability that underrepresented minority students who majored in STEM fields ultimately succeed in obtaining the Bachelor of Science degree.
_	Another useful measure that describes the extent to which two individuals are related (say individuals A and B) is their coancestry coefficient f(A,B), which gives the probability that one randomly selected allele from A and another randomly selected allele from B are identical by descent.
_	Conversely, where a false positive is much less costly than a false negative (blood tests, smoke detectors), it makes sense to bias the system towards maximising the probability that a particular (very costly) situation will be recognised, even if this often leads to the (relatively un-costly) event of noticing something that is not actually there.
_	STD screening is most effective for identifying STDs in women, but is commonly underutilized by women in the U.S. Healthcare access and access to family planning clinics increases the probability that women will seek out and utilize STD screening.
_	This explores the probability that aquaporins are the regulating force and that there is a protein in the walls of these that senses of transmembrane osmotic gradients (Hill and Shachar-Hill experiments).
_	Let the significance threshold for each test be formula_5; then the probability that at least one of the tests is significant under this threshold is (1 - the probability that none of them are significant).
_	Since it is assumed that they are independent, the probability that all of them are not significant is the product of the probabilities that each of them are not significant, or formula_6.
_	The protocol runs through "O"("n") phases, so the probability that formula_56 gets lucky at some phase is ≤ 1/"n".
_	The framing to how the problem is introduced is crucial for understanding and thinking of the probability that the situation will either work in favor or against you and how to prepare for those changes.
_	As the probability that electrons and holes meet together is proportional to the product of their numbers, the product is in steady state nearly constant at a given temperature, providing that there is no significant electric field (which might "flush" carriers of both types, or move them from neighbour regions containing more of them to meet together) or externally driven pair generation.
_	In regards to the second condition, additional predators do appear to disrupt predation events, increasing the probability that the sender will escape.
_	The BM principle is equivalent to the maximization of the probability that traffic breakdown occurs at none of the network bottlenecks.
_	Thus the probability that the algorithm succeeds is at least formula_10.
_	The equation arises not by analyzing the individual positions and momenta of each particle in the fluid but rather by considering a probability distribution for the position and momentum of a typical particle—that is, the probability that the particle occupies a given very small region of space (mathematically written formula_1, where formula_2 means "differential") centered at the position formula_3, and has momentum nearly equal to a given momentum vector formula_4 (thus occupying a very small region of momentum space formula_5), at an instant of time.
_	For each positive integer "N", let "P" be the probability that two randomly chosen numbers in formula_8 are coprime.
_	Rather than structuring rewards and penalties for corrupt behaviour, another approach to civil service reform seeks to increase the probability that corrupt activity will be observed.
_	Halliday's theory encourages a more open approach to the definition of language as a resource; rather than focus on grammaticality as such, a systemic functional grammatical treatment focuses instead on the relative frequencies of choices made in uses of language and assumes that these relative frequencies reflect the probability that particular paths through the available resources will be chosen rather than others.
_	The utility of each agent, under this mechanism, is the probability that one of his Good outcomes is selected.
_	Therefore, let "P(A)" denote the probability that the adversary "A" wins this game against "E", and define the "advantage" of "A" as 2("P(A)" − 1/2).
_	Since moving the wall slowly should keep a thermal distribution fixed, the probability that the light has energy "E" at frequency "f" must only be a function of "E"/"f".
_	For two alleles with frequencies p and q, the probability that p will be fixed is p.
_	However, Laplace was fully aware of the absurdity of the result; immediately following the example, he wrote, "But this number [i.e., the probability that the sun will rise tomorrow] is far greater for him who, seeing in the totality of phenomena the principle regulating the days and seasons, realizes that nothing at the present moment can arrest the course of it."
_	where the various |"V"| represent the probability that the quark of "j" flavor decays into a quark of "i" flavor.
_	It may seem that the probability that the remaining coin is gold is , but in truth, the probability is actually .
_	So if this unit time is taken small enough to ensure that only one spike could occur in that time window, then our conditional intensity function completely specifies the probability that a given neuron will fire in a certain time.
_	The problem of de Montmort is: what is the probability that "none" of the hats gets put into the right box.
_	A belief about a decision node is the probability that a particular player thinks that node is or will be in play (on the "equilibrium path").
_	Baggett claimed that each activist's score was roughly proportional to the probability that the activist was a Southern Unionist.
_	This latter assumption allows us to model the probability that the variable is censored, i.e.,
_	This probability is based on the observation that the probability that any number is divisible by a prime is (for example, every 7th integer is divisible by 7.)
_	Hence the probability that two numbers are both divisible by this prime is , and the probability that at least one of them is not is .
_	For distinct primes, these divisibility events are mutually independent; so the probability that two numbers are relatively prime is given by a product over all primes:
_	When the voter thinks that others are balancing their votes randomly and evenly, the strategy maximizes the voter's power or efficacy, meaning that it maximizes the probability that the voter will make a difference in deciding which candidate wins.
_	The use of a lucky item or ritual, for example, is assumed to increase the probability that one will perform at a level so that one can achieve a desired goal or outcome.
_	A similar sum of squared block lengths gives the expected time bound for a random hash function (rather than for a random starting location into a specific state of the hash table), by summing over all the blocks that could exist (rather than the ones that actually exist in a given state of the table), and multiplying the term for each potential block by the probability that the block is actually occupied.
_	These can be switched by changing sign, possibly with a shift or scale factor (e.g., the probability that a put with strike "K" expires ITM is one minus the probability that a call with strike "K" expires ITM, as these are complementary events).
_	Many complex molecules formed in these "little city economies" and the probability that genes would eventually develop in them was much greater than in the prebiotic environment.
_	Write "E" for some particular part of the system and "p"("s","t") the probability that a customer who arrives at time "s" is in "E" at time "t".
_	Let "p"("n"; "H") be the probability that during this experiment at least one value is chosen more than once.
_	The recurrence rate corresponds with the probability that a specific state will recur.
_	Gregory Chaitin has defined a halting probability, represented by the symbol Ω, a type of real number that informally is said to represent the probability that a randomly produced program halts.
_	The plausibility of the "sun will rise tomorrow" (i.e., the probability of that being true) will then be the proportion of stars that do not "die", e.g., by becoming novae, and so failing to "rise" on their planets (those that still exist, irrespective of the probability that there may then be none, or that there may then be no observers).
_	But the probability of selecting a red ball on the second draw given that the red ball has already been selected in the first draw is 0, and is not equal to the probability that the red ball is selected in the second draw which is equal to 1/2 (i.e. formula_23).
_	Now, the question becomes: for some random string formula_54, what is the probability that formula_55?
_	Therefore, the probability that a cells altruistic behavior will benefit a close relative is extremely high.
_	However, while nephroprotection was observed, the probability that amifostine could protect tumors could not be excluded.
_	"According to such a viewpoint, decision makers assess the probability that additional resource allocations will lead to goal attainment, as well as the value of goal attainment (i.e., rewards minus costs), and thereby generate a subjective expected utility associated with the decision to allocate additional resources."
_	Next the output of the parent is computed as the scalar product of a prediction with a coefficient representing the probability that this child belongs to that parent.
_	This means that for large enough , the probability that a random integer not greater than is prime is very close to .
_	"Availability" is the probability that an item will operate correctly during a period of time when used at random times during that period.
_	For sufficiently large , the probability that a graph from the distribution has both properties is positive, as the events for these properties cannot be disjoint (if they were, their probabilities would sum up to more than 1).
_	Choosing the right ads for the query and the order in which they are displayed greatly affects the probability that a user will see and click on each ad.
_	One represents the likelihood that a subgroup of a specific size will emerge; the other is the probability that it will persist.
_	In general if X is a random variable with a Pareto distribution, then the probability that X is greater than some number x is given by P(X > x) = (x/x_m)-k for all x ≥ x_m where k is a positive parameter and x_m is the minimum possible value of Xi
_	This is directly related to the probability density of the particle's position, which describes the probability that the particle is at any given place.
_	SNPs that are found undergo statistical analysis using the CGAP SNP pipeline to calculate the probability that the variant is in fact a polymorphism.
_	In a long and detailed article on this matter published in Australiana November 2014 Vol 36 No. 4, John Hawkins details the association between these two men and the probability that this instrument is one and the same, the world's first pocket chronometer originally destined for Cook's second voyage, purchased by Banks and lent to Phipps.
_	"R" is the response matrix of the detector (meaning the probability that a decay that feeds a certain level gives a count in certain bin of the spectrum).
_	German side presented the probability that all men would be drafted into Polish military to fight against Soviet Russia in case of pro-Polish victory.
_	Then, for large (such as a million) the probability that the gambler will lose every bet is approximately .
_	For example, if we decompose rotation matrices in axis–angle form, the angle should "not" be uniformly distributed; the probability that (the magnitude of) the angle is at most should be , for .
_	The criticism suggested that the probability that all the experiments reported would show positive results if an identical protocol was followed, assuming the claimed effects exist, is merely 0.4%.
_	where P(i,j,r) denotes the probability that it takes exactly r steps to reach j from i for the first time.
_	Since the probability that no molecule will have relaxed decreases with time, a decay curve emerges that can then be analyzed to find out the decay rate of the event.
_	The scorecard tries to predict the probability that the customer, if given the product, would become "bad" within a given timeframe, incurring losses for the lender.
_	where P[k(t)]dt is the probability that an electron in the state k suffers a collision during the time dt.
_	Work stopped in 1912 following the start of the First Balkan War due to the probability that the Ottoman government would run out of funds.
_	The proportion 9/15 = 60% is the probability that RHO holds the queen and playing the jack will win the suit.
_	Let formula_11 be the probability that on input formula_12, a string randomly selected in formula_3 with probability formula_14, formula_15, i.e.
_	The likelihood of re-identification is a factor in determining the probability that the patient's information has been compromised.
_	After each prediction, the current range is split into two parts in proportion to P(0) and P(1), the probability that the next bit of "s" will be a 0 or 1 respectively, given the previous bits of "s".
_	Producer's risk is the probability that a good product will be rejected as a bad product by the consumer.
_	The graphs show the probability that a subject will survive beyond time t.
_	The TIA program itself was the "systems-level" program of the IAO that intended to integrate information technologies into a prototype system to provide tools to better detect, classify, and identify potential terrorists with the goal to increase the probability that authorized agencies of the United States could preempt adverse actions.
_	For example, the AI could choose to creatively malfunction in a way that increases the probability that its operators will become lulled into a false sense of security and choose to reboot and then de-isolate the system.
_	The lead removal technique will vary depending on the surgeon's estimation of the probability that simple traction will suffice to more complex procedures.
_	While in the garrison at Bordeaux, he came under the influence of Martinez de Pasqually, usually called a Portuguese Jew (although later research has revealed the probability that he was a Spanish Catholic), who taught a species of mysticism drawn from cabbalistic sources, and endeavoured to found thereon a secret cult with magical or theurgical rites.
_	Spread spectrum avoids cochannel interference between adjacent cells, since the probability that users in nearby cells use the same spreading code is insignificant.
_	This, coupled with the probability that Malory had at least some wealth, allowed a certain level of comfort and leisure within the prison.
_	Having several receive sites increases the probability that one of the sites will receive the local signal in the presence of a distant, undesired one.
_	Let formula_27 be a probability distribution over the state space formula_2. formula_29 denotes the probability that the environment is in state formula_30.
_	Overall random agreement probability is the probability that they agreed on either Yes or No, i.e.:
_	A reliable and valid AUC estimate can be interpreted as the probability that the classifier will assign a higher score to a randomly chosen positive example than to a randomly chosen negative example.
_	A memory-1 strategy is then specified by four cooperation probabilities: formula_1, where formula_2 is the probability that "X" will cooperate in the present encounter given that the previous encounter was characterized by (ab).
_	For example, if the previous encounter was one in which "X" cooperated and "Y" defected, then formula_3 is the probability that "X" will cooperate in the present encounter.
_	In each iteration, choose one of the functions above where the probability that "F" is chosen is "p".
_	Finally the probability that a particular set of features indicates the presence of an object is computed, given the accuracy of fit and number of probable false matches.
_	The algorithm first chooses selection probabilities "g"(μ, ν), which represent the probability that state ν is selected by the algorithm out of all states, given that one is in state μ.
_	This increases the probability that urea will be absorbed into the soil after a rain event rather than volatilized into the atmosphere.
_	The right term represents the probability that, the needle falls at an angle where its position matters, and it crosses the line.
_	But for normally-distributed data with these parameters, the probability that the positive control value would be less than the negative control value is less than 1 in 10.
_	Assumption: If at some time formula_9, the Markov chain is in state formula_5, then the probability that at time formula_11, it will be in state formula_12 depends only upon formula_13, formula_14 and formula_15.
_	They use the sensitivity and specificity of the test to determine whether a test result usefully changes the probability that a condition (such as a disease state) exists.
_	Most nuclear reactors use a moderator to lower the kinetic energy of the neutrons and increase the probability that fission will occur.
_	One approach to test whether an observed value of "ρ" is significantly different from zero ("r" will always maintain ) is to calculate the probability that it would be greater than or equal to the observed "r", given the null hypothesis, by using a permutation test.
_	To prove that, we prove the opposite one; that is, the probability that the linear code generated by formula_9 has the Hamming distance less than formula_12 is exponentially small in formula_16.
_	The idea is that while there are composite probable primes to base "a" for any fixed "a", we may hope there exists some fixed "P"<1 such that for "any" given composite "n", if we choose "a" at random, then the probability that "n" is pseudoprime to base "a" is at most "P".
_	where formula_6 is the probability that "(x)" survives to age "x+t", and formula_7 is the probability that "(x+t)" dies within one year.
_	For example, when searching for a proper divisor of a random number "n", it is better to enumerate the candidate divisors in increasing order, from 2 to "n" - 1, than the other way around – because the probability that "n" is divisible by "c" is 1/"c".
_	Since this cannot be perfectly controlled in a mobile environment, each time slot must have a guard time, which reduces the probability that users will interfere, but decreases the spectral efficiency.
_	Arthur Jensen has written in agreement that this is technically correct, but he has also stated that a high heritability increases the probability that genetics play a role in average group differences.
_	I errors, a typical RCT will use 0.05 (i.e., 1 in 20) as the probability that the RCT will falsely find two equally effective treatments significantly different.
_	where formula_21 is the probability that the randomly inserted molecule of species formula_6 will experience an attractive or zero net interaction; in other words, it is the probability that the inserted molecule does not 'overlap' with any other molecules.
_	In most gambling scenarios, and some investing scenarios under some simplifying assumptions, the Kelly strategy will do better than any essentially different strategy in the long run (that is, over a span of time in which the observed fraction of bets that are successful equals the probability that any given bet will be successful).
_	What is the probability that exactly 4 of the 10 are green?
_	For this very reason, the probability that the merger will consummate increases as arbitrageur control increases.
_	In particular, the combination of a maternal infection during pregnancy followed by heightened stress at the onset of sexual maturity markedly increases the probability that a mouse develops symptoms of schizophrenia, whereas the occurrence of one of these factors without the other does not.
_	A volcanic hazard is the probability that a volcanic eruption or related geophysical event will occur in a given geographic area and within a specified window of time.
_	He suggests, in his evolutionary argument against naturalism, that the probability that evolution has produced humans with reliable true beliefs, is low or inscrutable, unless their evolution was guided (for example, by God).
_	According to its definition formula_25 is the number of ionizations per length of path and thus the relation of the probability that there was no collision in the mean free path of the ions, and the mean free path of the electrons:
_	In these interpretations, a value is interpreted as the "degree" of truth – to what extent a proposition is true, or the probability that the proposition is true.
_	A match is found, that man is accused and at his trial, it is testified that the probability that two DNA profiles match by chance is only 1 in 10,000.
_	This does not mean the probability that the suspect is innocent is 1 in 10,000.
_	To be precise, the probability that he ends with the "winning envelope" is 1/2 + P("Z" falls between the two numbers)/2.
_	Using evidence from as few as 10,000 views, it can assess the probability that the video will go viral.
_	For example, consider estimating the probability that the lowest of the daily-maximum temperatures at a site in February in any one year is less than zero degrees Celsius.
_	In a sample of 1000 independent trials, however, the probability that the event "does not" happen in any of them, even once (improbability), is 0.999, or approximately 36.8%.
_	Then, the probability that the event does happen, at least once, in 1000 trials is or 63.2%.
_	A random variable has a probability distribution, which specifies the probability that its value falls in any given interval.
_	Denote the variable which is the number of extracted balls of color "i" ("i" = 1, ..., "k") as "X", and denote as "p" the probability that a given extraction will be in color "i".
_	G.hn employs packet segmentation to sub-divide messages into smaller units, to increase the probability that each one is received correctly.
_	The theorem of typical sequences then shows us that formula_47 is the probability that the given sequence is part of the typical set, and may be made arbitrarily close to 1 for sufficiently large m, and therefore the Schmidt coefficients of the renormalized Bell state formula_48 will be at most a factor formula_49 larger.
_	However, we know from the preceding discussion that the probability that this interval actually contains the population median is
_	The Ignition Component is a number which relates the probability that a fire will result if a firebrand is introduced into a fine fuel complex.
_	The probability that a suprathreshold change will be detected is simply the probability that the change element is encoded in VSTM (i.e., "k"/"N").
_	By a union bound, the probability that there exist a monochromatic set is less than formula_3.
_	Many statistical tests deliver a p-value, the probability that a given result could be obtained, assuming random coincidence.
_	With this second sighting, the probability that both records of this species over the South Atlantic were the result of wind has become less likely.
_	However, when asked to recall the probability that mass extinction will occur, people have a tendency to think counter-intuitively and rate the probability as high when it is in fact low and behaviorally respond opposite to his or her rating.
_	Each value in the matrix is calculated by dividing the frequency of occurrence of the amino acid pair in the BLOCKS database, clustered at the 62% level, divided by the probability that the same two amino acids might align by chance.
_	The problem is to calculate the probability that the source is produced by program formula_89 given that the truncated source after n bits is "x".
_	The output probability is simply the probability that the next bit will be a 1.
_	As microbes share genes, an increase in resistant strains increases the probability that weak microbes acquire these resistance genes.
_	In cases of threats to bodily well being the standard depends on the probability that an injury will actually occur.
_	It can be seen as "the probability that the test is positive given that the patient is sick".
_	Two random variables "X" and "Y" are "equal almost surely" (denoted formula_172) if, and only if, the probability that they are different is zero:
_	The original Simpson index λ equals the probability that two entities taken at random from the dataset of interest (with replacement) represent the same type.
_	Its transformation 1 − λ therefore equals the probability that the two entities represent different types.
_	Many of the scholars who are concerned about existential risk believe that the best way forward would be to conduct (possibly massive) research into solving the difficult "control problem" to answer the question: what types of safeguards, algorithms, or architectures can programmers implement to maximize the probability that their recursively-improving AI would continue to behave in a friendly, rather than destructive, manner after it reaches superintelligence?
_	Since both of the two possibilities in the new sample space {GG, GB} are equally likely, and only one of the two, GG, includes two girls, "the probability that the younger child is also a girl is ."
_	Mating with multiple males may reduce the probability that the female's gametes will not be successfully fertilized.
_	An additive Markov chain of order "m" is a sequence of random variables "X", "X", "X", ..., possessing the following property: the probability that a random variable "X" has a certain value "x" under the condition that the values of all previous variables are fixed depends on the values of "m" previous variables only (Markov chain of order "m"), and the influence of previous variables on a generated one is additive,
_	However, the fortification that exists in Viana do Alentejo ""..does not match this regal intention regal...and the latest research lean towards the probability that [his subjects had] not gotten around to building it...[therefore] may the Castle of Viana do Alentejo be a work of the late fifteenth or early sixteenth century?"
_	These are used to calculate the probability that the cancer could have been caused by occupational exposure to radiation.
_	Firms may alter their behaviour in order to reduce the probability that they will be subject to additional regulations.
_	These pieces of evidence combined with the inscription on the lower half of the figures contribute to the probability that the figurines under the Temple of the Goddess Nimintabba were dedications to Nimintabba by Shulgi, claiming responsibility for the construction of the temple.
_	Risk is measured in this model as a measure of the probability that a forager's net acquisition rate (NAR) falls below a minimum value, such as a threshold for starvation.
_	So, if you are told that at least one is a boy when the fact is chosen randomly, the probability that both are boys is
_	This quantity is a logarithmic measure of the probability that the given amplitude level is due to white noise, in the sense of a type I error.
_	What is the probability that event "B" happens if firstly event "A" happens?
_	In this way, Ω represents the probability that a randomly selected infinite sequence of 0s and 1s begins with a bit string (of some finite length) that is in the domain of "F".
_	With the uniform probability distribution on the space of bitstrings of length "n", the probability that a string is incompressible by "c" is at least
_	The first term on the right hand side of Eq. () appears also in renewal files; yet, the term f(n) is unique. f(n) is the probability that accounts for the fact that for moving n anomalous independent particles in the same direction, when these particles indeed try jumping in the same direction (expressed with the term, (formula_45), the particles in the periphery must move first so that the particles in the middle of the file will have the free space for moving, demanding faster jumping times for those in the periphery.
_	Early work in comprehension included applying Bayesian statistics to the task of optical character recognition, as illustrated by Bledsoe and Browing in 1959 in which a large dictionary of possible letters were generated by "learning" from example letters and then the probability that any one of those learned examples matched the new input was combined to make a final decision.
_	More specifically, for any fixed "k", the probability that the first coin produces at least "k" heads should be less than the probability that the second coin produces at least "k" heads.
_	If formula_10, then the probability that
_	In comparison, the probability that a non-malignant primary hyperparathyroidism would have occurred at the same time as an unrelated non-carcinoma cancer that presents with malignant cells in the parathyroid gland is calculated by multiplying the probabilities of the two.
_	This is thought to reduce the probability that other members of the species will attack them cannibalistically.
_	The thermodynamic entropy is only due to positional uncertainty, so we may take the "alphabet" to be any of the "r" different species in the gas, and, at equilibrium, the probability that a given particle is of type "i" is simply the mole fraction "x" for that particle.
_	Dispersal rate (also called migration rate in the population genetics literature) or probability describes the probability that any individual leaves an area or, equivalently, the expected proportion of individual to leave an area.
_	The data complexity depends on the probability that a wrong key may pass (obtain a false positive), which is formula_48, where is the intermediate state in the first MITM phase.
_	In probability theory, Bernstein inequalities give bounds on the probability that the sum of random variables deviates from its mean.
_	In words, the probability that "R" is bad for some "x" is less than 1, therefore there must be an "R" that is good for all "x".
_	These synapses each have a memory that holds the probability that signal comes in one input and another signal will come out of the output.
_	Then the 'th entry of the unreduced Burau representation of is the probability that a ball thrown into the 'th lane ends up in the 'th lane.
_	Threat Assessment is the practice of determining the credibility and seriousness of a potential threat, as well as the probability that the threat will become a reality.
_	However, because close relatives share a large fraction of their alleles, the probability that any such rare deleterious allele present in the common ancestor will be inherited from both related parents is increased dramatically with respect to non-inbred couples.
_	As the number of licenses increases, the probability that a Free and open source software (FOSS) developer will want to merge software that are available under incompatible licenses increases.
_	It is also the probability that at any locus, two alleles from a random individuum of the population are identical by descent.
_	Loss all try to choose a wavelength that minimizes the probability that future requests will be blocked.
_	Conditioned on choosing a vertex in "R", the probability that a given term 1/("d"("w")+1) is dropped from the sum in the pessimistic estimator is at most ("d"("w")+1)/|"R"|, so the expected decrease in each term in the sum is at most 1/|"R"|.
_	For example, voters for a minor left-wing candidate might select a major left-wing candidate as their second choice, thus minimizing the probability that their vote will result in the election of a right-wing candidate, or voters for an independent candidate perceived as libertarian, or simply as the voter prefers that ideology might select a particular libertarian candidate as their second choice, thus minimising the probability of an authoritarian candidate being elected.
_	From abstract: "A friend who lives within a mile (about 1.6 km) and who becomes happy increases the probability that a person is happy by 25%."
_	For a fixed broodtree, let formula_107 denote the probability that the branching process yields broodtree formula_57.
_	Then the probability that History does not abort is formula_107.
_	Additionally, Zipf's law states that, for many observed phenomena involving the selection of items from an ordered sequence, the probability that the "n"th item is selected is proportional to the unit fraction 1/"n".
_	It describes the probability that we observe a given sample "X", "given" a known value of "θ".
_	To make a rough estimate of the probability that any given subset of "k" points is approximately collinear in the way defined above, let us consider the line between the "leftmost" and "rightmost" two points in that set (for some arbitrary left/right axis: we can choose top and bottom for the exceptional vertical case).
_	For each of the remaining "k"-2 points, the probability that the point is "near enough" to the line is roughly "w"/"L", which can be seen by considering the ratio of the area of the line tolerance zone (roughly "wL") and the overall area (roughly "L").
_	If two tanks rather than one are observed, then the probability that the larger of the observed two serial numbers is equal to "m", is
_	The formula_8 gives us the probability that in the time interval formula_9
_	Thus the probability that "p" is between 20% and 50% is just 30%.
_	"Given" the value of "p", and no other information relevant to the question of whether the sun will rise tomorrow, the probability that the sun will rise tomorrow is "p".
_	If six marbles are chosen without replacement, the probability that exactly two of each color are chosen is
_	the probability that formula_12 is true given that formula_11 is true is written as: formula_22
_	In this case "X" = (1 − (1/50)) where "X" represents the probability that none of the first "n" monkeys types "banana" correctly on their first try.
_	This creates a compounding problem, because the creosote deposits reduce the draft (airflow through the chimney) which increases the probability that the wood fire is not getting enough air for complete combustion.
_	Typically the alkyl halide is made more reactive than the aryl halide, increasing the probability that the alkyl halide will form the organosodium bond first and thus act more effectively as a nucleophile toward the aryl halide.
_	A Pokémon's Accuracy, the opponent's Evasiveness, and the accuracy value of a given move affect the probability that the move will hit.
_	Haldane based his claims on the probability that continuing shortage of housing would cause price increases and stated that he found pensions too complicated to understand.
_	It attempts to maximize both the probability that two objects in the same category have attribute values in common, and the probability that objects from different categories have different attribute values.
_	This presumably increases the probability that the spore will be in range of a mycorrhizal symbiont before it produces the tiny, roughly heart-shaped gametophyte, which also exists entirely below ground.
_	So here we have to consider the probability that Churchill was great in 1940 in part because he was too pugnacious, stubborn, deluded, and conservative (in the deepest sense) to be able to adjust to the New Order in Europe—traits he had shown in the matter of India."
_	Thus, the probability that a mutation will take place in a gatekeeper gene increases when the caretaker gene has been mutated.
_	In contrast to the experience at Anzio, the jammers seemed to have had a major impact on operations after April 1944, with significant degradation observed in the probability that a Hs 293 missile could achieve a hit or damage-causing near miss.
_	Hence the probability that both the independent events will occur simultaneously is
_	To see this, note that the probability that a particle is absorbed between and is given by
_	Collision avoidance calculations may use this data to calculate the probability that one orbiting object will collide with another.
_	Usually publications stating PPV of a throat swab are reporting on the probability that this bacterium is present in the throat, rather than that the patient is ill from the bacteria found.
_	On the basis of experience and evidence, the probability that miracle occurred is always less than the probability that it did not occur.
_	The South African government questioned the secrecy surrounding the trial and warned of the probability that there could be an unfavorable reaction, both in Nigeria and internationally, to a carrying out of the sentences.
_	He argues, in his evolutionary argument against naturalism, that the probability that evolution has produced humans with reliable true beliefs, is low or inscrutable, unless their evolution was guided, for example, by God.
_	Under de Moivre's law, the probability that "(x)" fails to survive to age "x+t" is
_	What is the probability that no one left with his/her own umbrella?
_	Unavailability is the probability that an item will not operate correctly at a given time and under specified conditions.
_	In general, if formula_96 is the probability that our system is in state formula_97,
_	Negi, born on 1 July 1917 in Kalpa, Himachal Pradesh, is a retired schoolteacher who cast the first vote in the 1951 general election in India — the nation's first election since the end of the British Raj in 1947 (although the majority of the election took place in February 1952, residents of Himachal Pradesh were given the chance to vote five months early because of the probability that heavy snowfall would make it impossible for citizens to reach the polling stations).
_	In this derivation, formula_17 is the probability that the envelope pair is the pair 1 and 2, "and" Envelope A happens to contain 2; formula_18 is the probability that the envelope pair is the pair 2 and 4, "and" (again) Envelope A happens to contain 2.
_	Then elementary calculations show that for one of these values of "i", the probability that the measurement of formula_91 in the basis formula_79 yields formula_77 is at least formula_94
_	In contrast, the Erlang C formula provides for the possibility of an unlimited queue and it gives the probability that a new call will need to wait in the queue due to all servers being in use.
_	According to Medea, forms of human conflict can be analyzed with the Continuum and then approached in a way that is appropriate to the level on which the conflict is taking place, thereby increasing the probability that it can be resolved.
_	What is the probability that you are his only child, thus the coin landed on Heads (assume a fair coin).
_	For example, a child may say "ball" in the presence of a ball (stimulus), the child's parent may respond "yes, that is a ball", (reinforcement) thereby increasing the probability that the child will say ball in the presence of a ball in the future.
_	By altering the image, Jolicoeur opens the probability that might have been different and seen differently at the time of Charot.
_	A study published by the American Enterprise Institute in August 2008 examined the effect of state benefit mandates on self-employed individuals, and found that "the larger the number of mandates in a state, the lower the probability that a self-employed person will be a significant employment generator."
_	What is the probability that the observed result of 8 positive differences, or a more extreme result, would occur if there is no difference in leg lengths?
_	In general, for non-Boolean functions, the performance will not correspond directly to the probability that the functions agree, although it will have some relationship.
_	The same size cannot guarantee a threshold less than 0.088 with the same confidence 0.99 when the error is identified with the probability that a 20-year-old man living in New York does not fit the ranges of height, weight and waistline observed on 1,000 Big Apple inhabitants.
_	Risk is defined as the probability that exposure to a hazard will lead to a negative consequence, or more simply, a hazard poses no risk if there is no exposure to that hazard.
_	The survival probability, the probability that the particle has remained at a position formula_22 for all times up to formula_14, is given by
_	The probability that a given internal link is busy is "p" = "uq"/"m", where "q" is the probability that an ingress or egress link is busy.
_	Conversely, the probability that a link is free is 1−"p".
_	The probability that the path connecting an ingress switch to an egress switch via a particular middle stage switch is free is the probability that both links are free, (1−"p").
_	Hence the probability of it being unavailable is 1−(1−"p") = 2"p"−"p". The probability of blocking, or the probability that no such path is free, is then [1−(1−"p")].
_	We are interested in the probability that the card is black given a black face is showing.
_	Therefore, the probability that the era will have a length "k" is equal to (in the stationary limit)
_	Given a patient with a positive test result, what is the probability that the patient has cancer?
_	What is the probability that it will have many more or many fewer divisors or prime divisors than the average?
_	Once the number of individual species or acres of habitat are confirmed, the probability that proposed activities will result in the take of a species must be evaluated.
_	It is possible to use a 16 bit CSMS reference number in order to reduce the probability that two different concatenated messages are sent with identical reference numbers to a receiver.
_	Note that this is "not" the probability that the particle is in state formula_12; it is in state formula_20 until cast to an eigenstate of formula_18.
_	A 2016 study found that immigration in the period 1940–2010 in the United States increased the high school completion of natives: "An increase of one percentage point in the share of immigrants in the population aged 11–64 increases the probability that natives aged 11–17 eventually complete 12 years of schooling by 0.3 percentage point."
_	The AUC indicates the probability that the diagnosis ranks a randomly chosen observation of Boolean presence higher than a randomly chosen observation of Boolean absence.
_	The following variant of Chernoff's bound can be used to bound the probability that a majority in a population will become a minority in a sample, or vice versa.
_	because the probability that the buyer will want to buy the item is formula_5, and if this happens, the seller's revenue will be formula_3.
_	When using normalized units, the area under the curve (often referred to as simply the AUC) is equal to the probability that a classifier will rank a randomly chosen positive instance higher than a randomly chosen negative one (assuming 'positive' ranks higher than 'negative').
_	If a new node gets information about the whole network, the probability that it will be connected with node i depends on the degree ki of that node, such that:
_	These extra-wide lanes increase the probability that motorists pass cyclists at a safe distance without having to change lanes.
_	The question we ask about these data is: knowing that 10 of these 24 teenagers are studiers, and that 12 of the 24 are female, and assuming the null hypothesis that men and women are equally likely to study, what is the probability that these 10 studiers would be so unevenly distributed between the women and the men?
_	If we were to choose 10 of the teenagers at random, what is the probability that 9 or more of them would be among the 12 women, and only 1 or fewer from among the 12 men?
_	An even stronger condition is pairwise independence: we have this property when formula_18 we have the probability that formula_30 will hash to any pair of hash values formula_31 is as if they were perfectly random: formula_32.
_	To do so, one must calculate the probability that P(X=k) for all values "k" from 0 through "n".
_	The spurious trip level concept represents the probability that safety function causes a spurious (unscheduled) trip.
_	The problem, according to Montmort, is to find the expectation of each player and the probability that the pool will be won within a specified number of games.
_	For constraints that are convex (e.g. in semidefinite problems involving LMIs, Linear Matrix Inequalities), a deep theoretical analysis has been established which shows that the probability that a new constraint is not satisfied follows a distribution that is dominated by a Beta distribution.
_	Intuitively, the probability that any single number is divisible by a prime (or any integer) is .
_	Hence the probability that numbers are all divisible by this prime is , and the probability that at least one of them is "not" is .
_	Elaine Rose in 1999 reported that disproportionately high female mortality is correlated to poverty, infrastructure and means to feed one's family, and that there has been an increase in the ratio of the probability that a girl survives to the probability that a boy survives with favourable rainfall each year and the consequent ability to irrigate farms in rural India.
_	After the discovery of the Higgs boson, he computed the probability that the Higgs vacuum undergoes quantum tunnelling, finding the surprising result that the universe is in a critical state which will eventually end in a cosmic collapse.
_	Policy experts were asked to rate the probability that the Soviet Union would invade Poland, and the United States would break off diplomatic relations, all in the following year.
_	Lack of trust and cohesion between individuals reduces the probability that they will be willing to monitor the behavior of others or intervene to prevent crime.
_	But by the multiplicative form of the Chernoff bound, when the load factor is bounded away from one, the probability that a block of length contains at least hashed values is exponentially small as a function of ,
_	He also suggests the probability that "Babur has not mentioned the whole of the circumstances and that her [Khanzada] being left behind was a part of Babur's agreement with Shaybani."
_	Credit scorecards are mathematical models which attempt to provide a quantitative estimate of the probability that a customer will display a defined behavior (e.g. loan default, bankruptcy or a lower level of delinquency) with respect to their current or proposed credit position with a lender.
_	Currently, Canada is home to some five or more sign languages (that number rising with the probability that Plains Sign Talk is actually a language family with several languages under its umbrella), belonging to four distinct language families, those being:
_	where g(N) is the production function, L is the value of on-the-job leisure from shirking, and p is the probability that an employee is caught shirking and sacked.
_	For example, if formula_17 represents a simple one-dimensional single-particle wavefunction formula_18, the probability that the particle is at location "x" is:
_	This property maximizes the probability that the result of an integer multiplication will end in zero, given that neither of its factors do.
_	Anoxia does, however, reduce the probability that scavengers will disturb the dead organism, and the activity of other organisms is undoubtedly one of the leading causes of soft-tissue destruction.
_	In this case, the combinations of BB, BG and GB are assumed "equally" likely to have resulted in the boy walking companion, and thus the probability that the other child is also a boy is .
_	The question is the same: for a given "p", what is the probability that a path exists between top and bottom?
_	In other words, for a finite non-equilibrium system in a finite time, the FT gives a precise mathematical expression for the probability that entropy will flow in a direction "opposite" to that dictated by the second law of thermodynamics.
_	One approach to handling Loschmidt's paradox is the fluctuation theorem, derived heuristically by Denis Evans and Debra Searles, which gives a numerical estimate of the probability that a system away from equilibrium will have a certain value for the dissipation function (often an entropy like property) over a certain amount of time.
_	The Asymptotic Equipartition Property (AEP) shows that for large enough , the probability that a sequence generated by the source lies in the typical set, , as defined approaches one.
_	Also formula_13 is the probability that player 1 experiences gambler's ruin having started with formula_14 amount of money: formula_15; and formula_16 is the probability that player 1 experiences gambler's ruin having started with formula_17 amount of money: formula_18.
_	Shortly thereafter, the Committee for Human Rights in North Korea published "Hunger and Human Rights: The Politics of Famine in North Korea" (by Stephan Haggard and Marcus Noland, 2005), which discussed the probability that North Korean food shortages in the 1990s were a man-made (regime) phenomenon and that with plausible policy adjustments – such as maintaining food imports on commercial terms or aggressively seeking multilateral assistance – the North Korean government could have avoided famine and food shortages.
_	As represented in the table below, operant conditioning involves two basic actions (increasing or decreasing the probability that a specific behavior will occur in the future), which are accomplished by adding or removing one of two basic types of stimuli, positive reinforcers or negative reinforcers .
_	The optical depth is, roughly speaking, the average fraction of source stars undergoing microlensing at a given time, or equivalently the probability that a given source star is undergoing lensing at a given time.
_	Let formula_1 be the probability that a player of degree d chooses action
_	Then the probability of finding a solution (if a solution exists) is the probability that the random selection will select the correct element from each cell, which is formula_37.
_	Colquhoun (2014) used the term "false discovery rate" to mean the probability that a statistically significant result was a false positive.
_	Thus, the probability that the deck is in its original order after shuffling it in this way is "B"/"n", which is significantly larger than the 1/"n"!
_	In statistics, a c-probability is the probability that a contrast variable obtains a positive value.
_	Spherical depth, formula_14 is defined to be the probability that a point formula_
_	It also improves the probability that the pollinator will find productive flowers easily accessible and recognisable by familiar clues.
_	There are four main strategies to reduce the probability that a risk event will occur: eliminate the threat, minimize its likelihood, isolate the event, or completely avoid the risk.
_	"Readiness" is the probability that an item will operate as expected when used at any random time while the item is in the correct mode of operation.
_	These public broadcasts measure the probability that a packet between two nodes in radio contact reaches its destination.
_	In a homogeneous, first-order reaction, the probability that an atom or molecule will react depends only on its residence time:
_	In order to make any inferences of causal effect on a subject, the probability that the subject receive treatment must be greater than 0 and less than 1.
_	Suppose that, of the available anti-depressant drugs, the probability that any particular drug will be effective for a particular patient is p=0.6.
_	What is the probability that the first drug found to be effective for this patient is the first drug tried, the second drug tried, and so on?
_	Availability is the probability that a system will work as required when required during the period of a mission.
_	Then the unconditional probability that "A" = 1 is 3/6 = 1/2 (since there are six possible rolls of the die, of which three are even), whereas the probability that "A" = 1 conditional on "B" = 1 is 1/3 (since there are three possible prime number rolls—2, 3, and 5—of which one is even).
_	It is defined as the probability that the adversary algorithm can guess a cipher's randomly selected key, given a fixed amount of computational resources.
_	Since the denominator is the total number of pairs, the Rand index represents the "frequency of occurrence" of agreements over the total pairs, or the probability that formula_185 and formula_186 will agree on a randomly chosen pair.
_	In particular, he identified the "near universal misinterpretation of p as the probability that H₀ is false, the misinterpretation that its complement is the probability of successful replication, and the mistaken assumption that if one rejects
_	The probabilities for the number of copies of allele A (or B) that survive (given in the last column of the above table) can be calculated directly from the binomial distribution where the "success" probability (probability of a given allele being present) is 1/2 (i.e., the probability that there are "k" copies of A (or B) alleles in the combination) is given by
_	The sticking probability is the probability that molecules are trapped on surfaces and adsorb chemically.
_	Averaging formula_16 over all possible realizations, we find that the probability that a given configuration of the disordered system has an energy equal to formula_
_	Sampling theory provides methods for calculating the probability that the poll results differ from reality by more than a certain amount, simply due to chance; for instance, that the poll reports 47% for Kerry but his support is actually as high as 50%, or is really as low as 44%.
_	By using the probabilistic method, to show that there exists a linear code that has a Hamming distance greater than formula_12, we will show that the probability that the random linear code having the distance less than formula_12 is exponentially small in formula_16.
_	Apart from the probability that it was obtained under torture, there is some doubt about the reliability of O'Collun's confession, since the Crown's interrogators, as in many treason cases, put strong pressure on the suspect to confess to what they wished to hear.
_	Another concern is that the "p"-value is often misunderstood as being the probability that the null hypothesis is true.
_	As "θ" → ∞, the probability that no two of the "n" genes are the same approaches 1.
_	is the probability of exceedance, the probability that has been exceeded at least once by time .
_	The association between the alleles "A" and "B" can be regarded as completely random—which is known in statistics as "independence"—when the occurrence of one does not affect the occurrence of the other, in which case the probability that both "A" and "B" occur together is given by the product formula_6 of the probabilities.
_	Informally, the probability that any number is divisible by a prime (or in fact any integer) formula_3 is formula_4; for example, every 7th integer is divisible by 7.
_	Hence the probability that two numbers are both divisible by "p" is formula_5, and the probability that at least one of them is not is formula_6.
_	If one makes the heuristic assumption that such reasoning can be extended to infinitely many divisibility events, one is led to guess that the probability that two numbers are coprime is given by a product over all primes,
_	In the following hours, the probability that a vortex might occur was reduced to zero.
_	In probability theory, Boole's inequality, also known as the union bound, says that for any finite or countable set of events, the probability that at least one of the events happens is no greater than the sum of the probabilities of the individual events.
_	With a multinomial event model, samples (feature vectors) represent the frequencies with which certain events have been generated by a multinomial formula_37 where formula_38 is the probability that event occurs (or such multinomials in the multiclass case).
_	of agreements over the total pairs, or the probability that formula_8 and formula_9
_	Random Man Not Excluded (RMNE) is a type of measure in population genetics to estimate the probability that an individual randomly picked out of the general population would not be excluded from matching a given piece of genetic data.
_	where is the probability that the interaction transforms
_	This is the assumption of unit measure: that the probability that at least one of the elementary events in the entire sample space will occur is 1.
_	Let frk be the probability that "F" outputs a triple starting with 1, given an input "x" chosen randomly from "IG".
_	Similarly, when for some , Hoeffding's inequality bounds the probability that we see at least more tosses that show heads than we would expect:
_	Peter Ackroyd adds that examinations of the marginal notes in the Hoghton family copy of Edward Hall's "Chronicles", an important source for Shakespeare's early histories, "indicate the probability that Shakespeare and the annotator were the same man, but do not by any means prove it."
_	formula_1 is defined as the probability that any two alleles, sampled at random (one from each individual), are identical copies of an ancestral allele.
_	The planetary orbital parameters are linked to an online transit ephemeris prediction tool which can be used to predict the probability that an exoplanet may transit and the date/time and observability of the transits.
_	The result is a number expressing the probability that the individual in question will perform a specific action.
_	Monte Carlo retirement calculators take volatility into account and project the probability that a particular plan of retirement savings, investments, and expenditures will outlast the retiree.
_	In fact, when the rankings of the agents over the objects are drawn uniformly at random, the probability that the allocation given by RSD is Pareto efficient approaches zero as the number of agents grows.
_	Their survival probability is therefore equal to the probability that a random permutation of the numbers 1 to 100 contains no cycle of length greater than 50.
_	The loss of the canal to the Ottoman Empire would be a huge propaganda coup for their opponents and increase the probability that Egypt would be reconquered by them.
_	The last term is the probability that a new mutation will become fixed.
_	If "X" is a random variable with a Pareto (Type I) distribution, then the probability that "X" is greater than some number "x", i.e. the survival function (also called tail function), is given by
_	In probability theory, an excursion probability is the probability that a stochastic process surpasses a given value in a fixed time period.
_	As for the second event, we note that the probability that formula_73 is formula_74 where formula_75 is the Hamming ball of radius formula_76 centered at vector formula_77 and formula_78 is its volume.
_	For a customer in transit to state formula_7, let formula_8 denote the probability that immediately before arrival the customer 'sees' the state of the system to be
_	If we let formula_6 denote the grid cell with index i (often in 2d maps, two indices are used to represent the two dimensions), then the notation formula_7 represents the probability that cell i is occupied.
_	In a study of 341 schoolchildren, Bernard and his colleagues found that long-term attendance at indoor chlorinated swimming pools by the children up to the age of about 6–7 years was a strong predictor of airway inflammation (measured by exhaled nitric oxide) independently of other factors, while for those children susceptible to allergic problems, as defined by having a blood serum level of immunoglobulin E greater than 100 kIU/L, their total time spent at indoor chlorinated swimming pools was a strong predictor of the probability that they would have asthma.
_	Then for all non-uniform probabilistic polynomial time algorithms that output formula_3 and formula_4 of increasing length "k", the probability that formula_5 and formula_6 is a negligible function in "k".
_	A classical result in the theory of random graphs states that the probability that a formula_125 random graph is connected tends to formula_126 if formula_127.
_	In contrast, the probability that a formula_125 graph contains a triangle tends to formula_131 when formula_132.
_	There is a positive correlation between the semantic similarity of two words (as measured by LSA) and the probability that the words would be recalled one after another in free recall tasks using study lists of random common nouns.
_	Daye’s printing of the “Oath” had not been reported as seen since 1647, and according to historian Lawrence C. Wroth, “the probability that one will be some day be found has never ceased to excite the New England collector.
_	Integrating the joint probability density function gives the probability that the needle will cross a line:
_	Flood defences are rated according to the probability that a particular level of flood water will be exceeded at least once in a specific period, so a 100-year flood represents a level that would only be expected to occur once in 100 years.
_	and the probability that particle 1 is in region with spin "and" particle 2 is in region with spin etc. at time is the integral of the probability density over these regions and evaluated at these spin numbers:
_	That is, if "c" is a constant with 0 < "c" < 1/2, and P("n") is the probability that choosing uniformly at random among the "n"-vertex graphs with "cn" edges results in a pseudoforest, then P("n") tends to one in the limit for large "n".
_	Class prediction is more difficult than class discovery, but it allows one to answer questions of direct clinical significance such as, given this profile, what is the probability that this patient will respond to this drug?
_	Intelligence and early warning systems increase the probability that the enemy will have the time to launch its own strike before its warmaking capacity has been significantly reduced, thus rendering a first strike pointless.
_	The formula may be used to predict the probability that a firm will go into bankruptcy within two years.
_	At generation formula_12, the probability that two individuals have a common ancestor is "they have a common parent" OR "they descend from two distinct individuals which have a common ancestor" :
_	In the training stages, the probability that a hidden node will be dropped is usually 0.5; for input nodes, this should be much lower, intuitively because information is directly lost when input nodes are ignored.
_	Forced outage rate (FOR or FOAR) of a power station unit is the probability that the unit will not be available for service when required.
_	Indeed, let "p"("a") be the probability that observable A has value "a", then the product Π"p"("a"), taken over all possible observables
_	For, the expected number of ancestors of is by linearity of expectation equal to the sum, over all other values in the set, of the probability that is an ancestor of .
_	Note that the higher the area of a block, the higher is the probability that the seed will be nucleated in it to divide that into four smaller blocks since seeds are sown at random on the substrate.
_	It can be shown that, if one is given a function of any complexity, the probability that it will have an elementary antiderivative is very low.
_	Another example of a hidden benefit is indirect reciprocity, in which a donor individual helps a beneficiary to increase the probability that observers will invest in the donor in the future, even when the donor will have no further interaction with the beneficiary.
_	A number of pendants representing Mjolnir, the hammer of the god Thor, have also been found in England, reflecting the probability that he was worshipped among the Anglo-Scandinavian population.
_	The observed lifetimes for Fl and Cn were rather longer than those measured and accepted for those isotopes and Ds, but agree well with those measured at Dubna in an early 1999 experiment aimed at synthesising Fl; both these chains may originate from isomeric states, or the electron capture of Fl leading to Nh and its spontaneously fissioning daughter Rg. However, the results could not be confirmed due to lack of beam time, even though the probability that the observations were due to accidental coincidence were calculated as 4 × 10.
_	For a given embedding dimension formula_2, tolerance formula_3 and number of data points formula_4, SampEn is the negative logarithm of the probability that if two sets of simultaneous data points of length formula_5 have distance formula_6 then two sets of simultaneous data points of length formula_7 also have distance formula_6.
_	A decrypted report from General Alexander Löhr, the commander in chief of the German Army Group E in the Balkans, reported on 22 June that 583 German soldiers and 7,489 Partisans had been killed, with the probability that the Partisans had lost another 4,000 men.
_	In particular, the probability that two elements are on the same cycle is 1/2.
_	The "ij" th entry in formula_7 will give the probability that the outcome of an encounter between "X" and "Y" will be "j" given that the encounter "n" steps previous is "i".
_	We can write a probability mass function dependent on "t" to describe the probability that the M/M/1 queue is in a particular state at a given time.
_	In such system the probability that the handoff will not be served is equal to blocking probability of new originating call.
_	Hence the probability that there is one job at each node is:
_	The first column sum is the probability that "x" =0 and "y" equals any of the values it can have – that is, the column sum 6/9 is the marginal probability that "x"=0.
_	If we want to find the probability that "y"=0 "given" that "x"=0, we compute the fraction of the probabilities in the "x"=0 column that have the value "y"=0, which is 4/9 ÷ 6/9 = 4/6.
_	Likewise, in the same column we find that the probability that "y"=1 given that "x"=0 is 2/9 ÷ 6/9 = 2/6.
_	If "dt" is an infinitely small number, the probability that "X" is included within the interval ("t", "t" + "dt") is equal to "f"("t") "dt", or:
_	the probability that an element formula_22 is not covered is about
_	The IRF gives the probability that a person with a given ability level will answer correctly.
_	The operating characteristic (OC) curve is the probability that the null hypothesis is accepted when it is true.
_	The theorem is especially important in the theory of financial mathematics as it tells how to convert from the physical measure, which describes the probability that an underlying instrument (such as a share price or interest rate) will take a particular value or values, to the risk-neutral measure which is a very useful tool for pricing derivatives on the underlying instrument.
_	According to Benford's law, the probability that the first decimal-digit of an item in the data sample is "d" (from 1 to 9) equals , "regardless" of the unit of measurement.
_	The purpose of a reserve factor is to reduce the probability that any party elects their least popular candidates across the region.
_	Let formula_9 and formula_10 be the probability that a relevant document and an irrelevant document has the term respectively.
_	If every prisoner selects 50 drawers at random, the probability that a single prisoner finds his number is 50%.
_	Therefore, the probability that all prisoners find their numbers is the product of the single probabilities, which is () ≈ , a vanishingly small number.
_	The newspaper based the ranking on calculating the probability that two persons selected at random would be of different ethnic groups or races.
_	Close scrutiny of the production technique of the more complex vessels—the perfect duct of some complex decoration patterns—strengthens the probability that the ceramics were produced by specialists.
_	Roughly speaking, the Freidlin–Wentzell theorem gives an estimate for the probability that a (scaled-down) sample path of an Itō diffusion will stray far from the mean path.
_	If formula_39 is the probability that a bit will be part of an formula_40-bit run (formula_41 "P"s and one "Q") and formula_42 is the compression ratio of that run, then the expected compression ratio is
_	This is the efforts by financial regulators to reduce the probability that a financial firm collapses.
_	In other words, formula_1 is the probability that a normal (Gaussian) random variable will obtain a value larger than formula_2 standard deviations.
_	Equivalently, formula_1 is the probability that a standard normal random variable takes a value larger than formula_2.
_	For a given distance, the two-point autocorrelation function is a function of one variable (distance) which describes the probability that two galaxies are separated by this particular distance.
_	Ivacaftor is a "potentiator" of CFTR, meaning it increases the probability that the defective channel will be open and allow chloride ions pass through the channel pore.
_	The degree of password security is determined by the probability that a password can be guessed in its lifetime.
_	where formula_2 is the probability that both events "A" and "B" occur.
_	The likelihood of a state is the probability that would be assigned to the observed results had the system been in that state.
_	However, the strict definition is "the probability that a pair of individuals will both have a certain characteristic, given that one of the pair has the characteristic."
_	Modern research points to the probability that he and his teacher were Palestinian Jews; and since Yannai is known to have been one of the halakic authorities of Anan ben David, the alleged founder of Karaism, and must therefore have lived a considerable time earlier than he had, Killir's time may be fixed with some probability as the first half of the 7th century.
_	A master-checker is a hardware-supported fault tolerance method for multiprocessor systems, in which two processors, referred to as the "master" and "checker", calculate the same functions in parallel in order to increase the probability that the result is exact.
_	The more heavily a material is doped, the higher the probability that a carrier will collide with an ion in a given time, and the smaller the mean free time between collisions, and the smaller the mobility.
_	In probability theory, the Chung–Erdős inequality provides a lower bound on the probability that one out of many (possibly dependent) events occurs.
_	Their results demonstrated that a prepulse before a stimulus pulse effectively reduces the probability that pain will be experienced due to electrocutaneous stimulation.
_	In a sense that can be made precise, the probability that two randomly chosen integers are coprime is 6/π (see pi), which is about 61%.
_	Indeed, the probability that the least mutated genomes in an asexual population end up carrying at least one (additional) mutation depends heavily on the genomic mutation rate and this increases more or less linearly with the size of the genome (more accurately, with the number of base pairs present in active genes).
_	Greater variety of HLAs decreases the probability that the entire population will be wiped out by a single pathogen as certain individuals will be highly resistant to each pathogen.
_	Moreover, is the probability that the state "i" is attained and "k" is the Boltzmann constant.
_	In other words, the burden of prevention is less than the probability that the injury will occur multiplied by the gravity of the harm/injury.
_	Consider the probability that the walker is at the vertex "i" at time "t", given the probability distribution that he was at vertex "j" at time "t-1" (assuming a uniform chance of taking a step along any of the edges attached to a given vertex):
_	As an example, using formula_5 shows that the probability that values lie outside the interval formula_6 does not exceed formula_7.
_	The denser the material, the higher the probability that radiation will be redirected towards the detector.
_	If one were to wait 0.4 microseconds, then the probability that the particle will have decayed will be formula_1; that is, the probability will be very very close to one.
_	Log 5 is a formula invented by Bill James to estimate the probability that team A will win a game, based on the true winning percentage of Team A and Team B.
_	In particular, if "G" is a graph with root "0", formula_62 is the probability that a formula_63-step random walk returns to "0".
_	This makes it possible to bound the probability that for example formula_266.
_	In Dawkin's case we have 3 dials, with 6 positions each, so the probability that you open the lock by sheer luck is one in 216.
_	Let the mutation rate formula_4 correspond to the probability that a "j" type parent will produce an "i" type organism.
_	They determined that in the neutral case, the probability that an individual would be homozygous, "F", was:
_	Varying amounts of environmental stress increase the probability that these individuals will develop that condition.
_	The strength or weight of the percolating cluster, formula_69 or formula_70, is the probability that a site belongs to an infinite cluster.
_	where the right-hand side represents the probability that the random variable "T" is less than or equal to "t".
_	Rating systems generally predict the probability that one player will defeat another player and use this prediction to rank a players strength.
_	Voting among several receivers at different sites increases the probability that one of the receivers will acquire a usable signal from two-way radios in a system.
_	The pseudorandom advantage of the algorithm is defined as two times the probability that the algorithm guesses correctly minus one.
_	Gauss's inequality gives an upper bound on the probability that a value lies more than any given distance from its mode.
_	Studies find that the probability that disputes between states will be resolved peacefully is positively affected by the degree of democracy exhibited by the lesser democratic state involved in that dispute.
_	If we define "P" as the above 4-element strategy vector of "X" and formula_4 as the 4-element strategy vector of "Y", a transition matrix "M" may be defined for "X" whose "ij" th entry is the probability that the outcome of a particular encounter between "X" and "Y" will be "j" given that the previous encounter was "i", where "i" and "j" are one of the four outcome indices: "cc", "cd", "dc", or "dd".
_	For example, from "X" 's point of view, the probability that the outcome of the present encounter is "cd" given that the previous encounter was "cd" is equal to formula_5.
_	For example, if the power required to maintain a motorcoach or an over-the-road truck at highway cruising speed is somewhere around , the probability that a engine will consistently operate at loads above 30%, without "dips" to lower power levels, can be relatively small.
_	This expression is the average of "N", weighted by the probability that the verifier sent message "m".
_	yields the probability that a random permutation is an involution.
_	The second principle is to protect the victims and to provide support for them by training authorities to be more sensitive when interacting with a victim of a sexual assault, which would in turn make the process easier on the victim as well as increase the probability that the case will be solved since the victim is more likely to feel like he/she is being taken seriously when his/her case is handled with a symphatetic attitude.
_	An upper limit of 750 BC is indicated by a number of considerations, such as the probability that his work was written down, the fact that he mentions a sanctuary at Delphi that was of little national significance before c. 750 BC ("Theogony" 499), and that he lists rivers that flow into the Euxine, a region explored and developed by Greek colonists beginning in the 8th century BC.
_	Referring to the example given above, the probability that the population proportion is in the range of the confidence interval is either 1 or 0.
_	This increase in parental activity will increase the probability that predators will locate nests.
_	Thus, the probability that a random "R" is bad for at least one input "x" is
_	Any random variable can be described by its cumulative distribution function, which describes the probability that the random variable will be less than or equal to a certain value.
_	The model can answer questions like "What is the probability that it is raining, given the grass is wet?" by using the conditional probability formula and summing over all nuisance variables:
_	The location of an item is, by definition, that location at which the probability that formula_23 is equal to 0.5.
_	In addition, to derive the probability of a particular gene tree topology in the population, if a coalescent event occurs in a sample of formula_39 lineages, the probability that a particular pair of lineages coalesce is formula_53.
_	A less abstract task is to estimate the probability that an aircraft will crash, given that there are numerous possible faults each with a likelihood of one in a million.
_	If I can brace myself for the probability that this will all lead to nonsense, I can groove on all the atmospherics along the way.
_	By expressing later preferences, the two voters supporting A promote their first preference A from a tie to becoming the outright winner (increasing the probability that A wins).
_	If the tag length "t" is shorter than 128, then each successful forgery in this attack increases the probability that subsequent targeted forgeries will succeed, and leaks information about the hash subkey, "H".
_	Because most recessive alleles are rare in populations, it is unlikely that two unrelated marriage partners will both be carriers of the same deleterious allele; however, because close relatives share a large fraction of their alleles, the probability that any such deleterious allele is inherited from the common ancestor through both parents is increased dramatically.
_	Suppose that the probability that a pedestrian will be hit by a car, while crossing the road at a pedestrian crossing, without paying attention to the traffic light, is to be computed.
_	Solving for formula_26, the probability that the formula_5-th unit is on gives:
_	Rolled throughput yield (RTY) is the probability that a process with more than one step will produce a defect free unit.
_	The outcome of "x" as a pass sample is determined by a function "s"("x"), 0 < "s"("x") < "q" ≤ 1, such that "s"("x") is the probability that x will be selected as a pass sample.
_	The presence of others’ eggs reduces the probability that a predator will attack her egg when a female eider leaves the nest after laying the first egg.
_	The relatedness parameter (r) in Hamilton's rule was introduced in 1922 by Sewall Wright as a coefficient of relationship that gives the probability that at a random locus, the alleles there will be identical by descent.
_	This result was extended in 1987 to show that the probability that "k" random integers have greatest common divisor "d" is "d"/ζ("k").
_	As Keith Devlin says (Devlin 2003), "By opening his door, Monty is saying to the contestant 'There are two doors you did not choose, and the probability that the prize is behind one of them is .
_	But by eliminating door C, I have shown you that the probability that door B hides the prize is 2 in 3.
_	In statistical mechanics, the Boltzmann distribution is a probability distribution that gives the probability that a system will be in a certain state as a function of that state’s energy and the temperature of the system.
_	In any discussion of atheism (skepticism, etc.), the probability that someone will compare a vocal atheist to religious fundamentalists increases to one.
_	"What's the probability that Pat exhausts all 30 houses in the neighborhood?"
_	The second criterion refers to the probability that a new incoming call will be rejected or blocked.
_	Although the algorithm was described in terms of random walks, the probability that each node sends a random walker to the seeds may be calculated analytically by solving a sparse, positive-definite system of linear equations with the graph Laplacian matrix, which we may represent with the variable formula_1.
_	Time and space are vast, so the probability that the reader came to be alive here and now, as opposed to another time or place, was slim.
_	More important, the probability that the reader came to be alive at all were even slimmer: the correct structure of atoms had to align in the universe.
_	Using higher-order methods reduces the probability that the term under the square root in the congested branch of the velocity equation will fall below zero.
_	In particular, Prynne doubts the probability that the Jews would be converted to Christianity once in England.
_	First, although home glucose meter readings are often misleading, the probability that a low reading, whether accompanied by symptoms or not, represents real hypoglycemia is much higher in a person who takes insulin than in someone who does not.
_	By way of contrast, the probability that someone in a room of other people has the same birthday as a particular person (for example, you), is given by
_	The central object of the model is to investigate the probability that the insurer's surplus level eventually falls below zero (making the firm bankrupt).
_	where formula_4 is the probability that message "m" is chosen from all possible choices in the message space formula_5.
_	The "u" probability is the probability that an identifier in two "non-matching" records will agree purely by chance.
_	The "m" probability is the probability that an identifier in "matching" pairs will agree (or be sufficiently similar, such as strings with high Jaro-Winkler distance or low Levenshtein distance).
_	The problem in more mathematical terms is: Given a needle of length formula_1 dropped on a plane ruled with parallel lines "t" units apart, what is the probability that the needle will cross a line?
_	The reason why this appears is the following: initial attractiveness increases the probability that the node obtains connection with an arriving node.
_	where the right-hand side represents the probability that the random variable "X" takes on a value less than or
_	Write "μ" for the service rate at node "i" and "P" for the customer routing matrix where element "p" denotes the probability that a customer finishing service at node "i" moves to node "j" for service.
_	Thus given a random base, the probability that a number is a strong pseudoprime to that base is less than 1/4, forming the basis of the widely used Miller–Rabin primality test.
_	A discrete choice model specifies the probability that a person chooses a particular alternative, with the probability expressed as a function of observed variables that relate to the alternatives and the person.
_	In its general form, the probability that person "n" chooses alternative "i" is expressed as:
_	We can use Bayes' theorem to calculate the probability that a positive test result is a false positive.
_	According to Martin Nowak, a Harvard professor of mathematics and evolutionary biology "We cannot calculate the probability that an eye came about.
_	The advantage in using this approach is that the work spared by computing each minimum just once can be spent on computations in (a) and (b), which will increase the probability that the global minimum will be found.
_	Event tree analysis can be used in risk assessment by determining the probability that is used to determine the risk when multiplied by the hazard of the event.
_	In cold fusion reactions, the produced fused nuclei have a relatively low excitation energy (~10–20 MeV), which decreases the probability that these products will undergo fission reactions.
_	The former gives the probability that a system will be in a certain state as a function of that state's energy; in contrast, the latter is used to describe particle speeds in idealized gases.
_	An exclusive OR gate with two inputs represents the probability that one or the other input, but not both, occurs:
_	Another way is to define the cdf formula_71 as the probability that a sample lies inside the ellipsoid determined by its Mahalanobis distance formula_72 from the Gaussian, a direct generalization of the standard deviation
_	The ratio formula_43 can be understood as arising from the probability that two lineages selected uniformly at random are both ancestral to the sample.
_	The value "p(t)" for a contest with a resource of value "V" over time "t", is the probability that "t = a".
_	In other words, what is P(T | B), the probability that a terrorist has been detected given the ringing of the bell?
_	The name "Tullock's spike" refers to a thought experiment in which Tullock suggested that if governments were serious about making motorists drive more safely, they should mandate that a sharp spike be installed in the center of each car's steering wheel, to increase the probability that an accident would be fatal to the driver.
_	Summation of excitatory postsynaptic potentials increases the probability that the potential will reach the threshold potential and generate an action potential, whereas summation of inhibitory postsynaptic potentials can prevent the cell from achieving an action potential.
_	He said: "So far, there's not enough information so [that] I can give an evaluation of the probability that it might work or not...
_	What is the probability that a certain number, or all of the particles, will be found in one section versus the other when the particles are randomly allocated to different places within the box?
_	For instance, if "n" = 2, then the probability that "X" will land between the existing two observations is 1/3.
_	Instead of taking the max or min of the utility values of their children, chance nodes take a weighted average, with the weight being the probability that child is reached.
_	Hence every sequence that begins with A and reaches a tie is in one-to-one correspondence with a sequence that begins with B, and the probability that a sequence begins with B is formula_9, so the probability that A always leads the vote is
_	Consequently, one of the goals for most marketing communications is to increase the probability that consumers will include the brand in their consideration sets.
_	For Hume, the probability that a miracle hasn't occurred is always greater than the probability that it has because "as a firm and unalterable experience has established these laws [of nature], the proof against a miracle, from the very nature of the fact, is as entire as any argument from experience can possibly be imagined" ("Enquiry".
_	In survival analysis, the cumulative distribution function gives the probability that the survival time is less than or equal to a specific time, t.
_	When this criterion is met, the probability that a new advantageous mutant becomes fixed is approximately equal to 2s.
_	After a mathematics instructor testified about the multiplication rule for probability, though ignoring conditional probability, the prosecutor invited the jury to consider the probability that the accused (who fit a witness's description of a black male with a beard and mustache and a Caucasian female with a blond ponytail, fleeing in a yellow car) were not the robbers, suggesting that they estimated the odds as:
_	An intelligence "consumer" might be an infantry officer who needs to know what is on the other side of the next hill, a head of government who wants to know the probability that a foreign leader will go to war over a certain point, a corporate executive who wants to know what his or her competitors are planning, or any person or organization (for example, a person who wants to know if his or her spouse is faithful).
_	From previous theories, it can be concluded that subjects are willing to cooperate if the probability that others will also do so is sufficiently large.
_	Now the probability that a system in the state formula_63 will be found to be in the arbitrary state formula_64 is given by formula_65
_	At its heart, the fallacy involves assuming that the prior probability of a random match is equal to the probability that the defendant is innocent.
_	If every object in a collection of objects fails to have a certain property, then the probability that a random object chosen from the collection has that property is zero.
_	where summation runs over all possible distinct states of the system, and "p" is the probability that the system could be found in the "i"-th state.
_	It is important to note that the timestep involved is a function of the probability that all events "i", did not occur.
_	"Probabilistic record linkage", sometimes called "fuzzy matching" (also "probabilistic merging" or "fuzzy merging" in the context of merging of databases), takes a different approach to the record linkage problem by taking into account a wider range of potential identifiers, computing weights for each identifier based on its estimated ability to correctly identify a match or a non-match, and using these weights to calculate the probability that two given records refer to the same entity.
_	Speiser thus cited as an instance when the Tetragrammaton and Elohim occur in otherwise duplicate narratives, and the presence of the Priestly source is ruled out on other grounds, evincing the probability that the passages with Elohim point to a source that is neither the Jahwist nor the Priestly source, and thus evidently the Elohist.
_	It is responsible for inducing Cl ion influx into cells, thereby reducing the probability that membrane depolarization will occur upon the arrival of a graded potential or an action potential.
_	That is, the probability that "A" "or" "B" will happen is the sum of the probabilities that "A" will happen and that "B" will happen, minus the probability that both "A" "and" "B" will happen.
_	The R function codice_1 calculates the probability that there are k failures before the first success, where the argument "prob" is the probability of success on each trial.
_	So the probability that such an event occurs "exactly once" in 10 successive years is:
_	Since the areas of the diagonals of the square are zero, the probability that the dart lands exactly on a diagonal is zero.
_	This progressively increases the probability that Sukkot will be cold and wet, making it uncomfortable or impractical to dwell in the traditional "succah" during Sukkot.
_	This density function is defined as a function of the "n" variables, such that, for any domain "D" in the "n"-dimensional space of the values of the variables "X", …, "X", the probability that a realisation of the set variables falls inside the domain "D" is
_	In probability and statistics, a probability mass function (pmf) is a function that gives the probability that a discrete random variable is exactly equal to some value.
_	For the volume, this should be equal to the probability that the volume is less than 4 = 64.
_	In experimental comparisons, the probability that a female will mate with an unrelated male was about twice as high as the chance of her mating with brothers.
_	The piling-up lemma allows the cryptanalyst to determine the probability that the equality:
_	Relatedness is the probability that a gene in one individual is an identical copy, by descent, of a gene in another individual.
_	It follows that the probability that "X" takes any value except for "u", "u", ... is zero, and thus one can write "X" as
_	The selected context model supplies two probability estimates: the probability that the bin contains “1” and the probability that the bin contains “0”.
_	In addition, if an ongoing distribution with a probability factor greater than one-half is made finite by, after any number of terms, establishing a final term with "all the remaining probability," that is, 1 minus the probability of all previous terms, the expected value of switching with respect to the probability that "A" is equal to the last, largest "a" will exactly negate the sum of the positive expected values that came before, and again the total expected value of switching drops to 0 (this is the general case of setting out an equal probability of a finite set of values in the envelopes described above).
_	The probability that the next medication will achieve seizure freedom drops with every failed AED; for example after two failed AEDs the probability that the third will achieve seizure freedom is around 4%.
_	Generally, the more healthy sons she bore, the higher the probability that she was not a carrier.
_	In this case "s"("x") is the probability that the individual having an array "x" of phenotypes will survive by giving offspring to the next generation; a definition of individual fitness given by Hartl 1981.
_	Given some set of hidden variables formula_1 and observed variables formula_2, the goal of approximate inference is to lower-bound the probability that a graphical model is in the configuration formula_2.
_	His works are on demand around the globe in such countries as Mexico, United States, Japan, Europe, and recently Russia; giving the probability that his works will increase in value over the years.
_	Despite these efforts, the probability that these attempts at conservation will work is slim.
_	Although Butler had long been a suspect, it was not until DNA testing techniques were advanced enough to establish the probability that the semen stain on the towel was his, that he was charged.
_	"The diversity index measures the probability that any two residents, chosen at random, would be of different ethnicities.
_	The greater the proportion of individuals in a community who are immune, the smaller the probability that those who are not immune will come into contact with an infectious individual.
_	This is comparable to the older infinite monkey theorem but instead of the works of William Shakespeare, the claim is that the probability that a protein molecule could achieve a functional sequence of amino acids is too low to be realised by chance alone.
_	Technically, it is supposed to be a measure of repeatability, the probability that that branch (node, clade) would be recovered if the taxa were sampled again.
_	The expression formula_25 is the probability that the maximum serial number is equal to "m" once "k" tanks have been observed but before the serial numbers have actually been observed.
_	When the results of a series of measurements are described by a normal distribution with standard deviation formula_6 and expected value 0, then formula_7 is the probability that the error of a single measurement lies between −"a" and +"a", for positive "a".
_	Nor can a person on the same occasion use opposing probabilities in his favour in reference to several obligations of which one or another would be certainly violated; thus a priest cannot lawfully take meat on the probability that Friday has already elapsed, and at the same time postpone the reading of Compline on the probability that Friday will not elapse for some time.
_	Assuming genetic drift is the only evolutionary force acting on an allele, at any given time the probability that an allele will eventually become fixed in the population is simply its frequency in the population at that time.
_	For example, if the frequency "p" for allele A is 75% and the frequency "q" for allele B is 25%, then given unlimited time the probability A will ultimately become fixed in the population is 75% and the probability that B will become fixed is 25%.
_	The presence of terrestrial tracks indicate that "Hibbertopterus" was able to survive on land at least briefly, possible due to the probability that their gills could function in air as long as they remained wet.
_	The degree of infection, quantified as the copies of the viral genome per unit of the patient's tissue, is relevant in many cases; for example, the probability that the type 1 herpes simplex virus reactivates is related to the number of infected neurons in the ganglia.
_	To increase the probability that any extraterrestrial recipients would recognize the signal as an intentional communication from another intelligent life form, Arecibo scientists attached a repeating-sequence header to each individual message, and beamed the transmission at roughly 20 times the wattage of the most powerful commercial radio transmitter.
_	Subsequently, the probability that hypercalcemia would have resulted from no disease can be calculated as:
_	Milgram's experiment developed out of a desire to learn more about the probability that two randomly selected people would know each other.
_	DIST() give the probability that a random observation from a normal distribution will have a z score less than a specified z score.
_	In multiprocessing, omega networks may be used as connectors between the CPUs and their shared memory, in order to decrease the probability that the "CPU-to-memory" connection becomes a bottleneck.
_	In the standard applications of the test, the observations are classified into mutually exclusive classes, and there is some theory, or say null hypothesis, which gives the probability that any observation falls into the corresponding class.
_	A reaction's cross section, denoted σ, is the measure of the probability that a fusion reaction will happen.
_	(For example, when incoming calls at a telephone switchboard are modeled as a Poisson process, and "λ" is the average number of calls per minute, then "e" is the probability that no calls arrive in the next two minutes.)
_	In 2001 the U.S. Geological Survey published a report on the probability that gas would be found in the basin.
_	Here, a formal definition of it is considered: f is the probability that two "same" alleles (that is A and A, or a and a), which fertilize together are of common ancestral origin—or (more formally) f is the probability that two homologous alleles are autozygous.
_	Modern anthropologists seem to accept the probability that cannibalism did exist among the Iroquois, with Thomas Abler describing the evidence from the Jesuit Relations and archaeology as making a "case for cannibalism in early historic times... so strong that it cannot be doubted."
_	Taking "ε" = 1 ⁄ "c", one can use Schilder's theorem to obtain estimates for the probability that a standard Brownian motion "B" strays further than "c" from its starting point over the time interval [0, "T"], i.e. the probability
_	There are at most formula_132 output datasets and the probability that formula_133 is at most proportional to formula_134.
_	It has the important consequence for conservation ecology that viability of spatially structured populations is lower than one would expect from the local populations: it increases the probability that several local populations go extinct simultaneously.
_	The probability of experiencing a fade in this composite channel is then proportional to the probability that all the component channels simultaneously experience a fade, a much more unlikely event.
_	After each ball was drawn, participants in one group were asked to state out loud their judgments of the probability that the balls were being drawn from one or the other basket.
_	This can be expressed as the probability that Pat does not finish on the fifth through the thirtieth house:
_	Because each literal within a clause has a chance of evaluating to true independently of any of the truth value of any of the other literals, the probability that they are all false is formula_2.
_	Thus, the probability that "c" is indeed satisfied is formula_3, so the indicator variable formula_4 (that is 1 if "c" is true and 0 otherwise) has expectation formula_3.
_	As the temperature of the "fuel" rises, Doppler broadening increases the probability that neutrons are captured by U-238 atoms.
_	Paraphrasing of copyrighted material may reduce the probability that a court will find that copyright has been infringed; however, there have been many cases where a paraphrase that uses quite different words and sentence structure has been found to infringe on a prior work's copyright.
_	SSMD has a probabilistic basis due to its strong link with d-probability (i.e., the probability that the difference between two groups is positive).
_	They support the discount factors used in the Stern analysis, particularly the view that discounting should reflect only the probability that the world will end at a given future date, and not the "impatience" of an infinitely lived representative consumer.)
_	In terms of statistics, the value of each output image pixel characterizes the probability that the corresponding input pixel group belongs to the object whose histogram is used.
_	In Information theory, outage probability of a communication channel is the probability that a given information rate is not supported, because of variable channel capacity.
_	Outage probability is defined as the probability that information rate is less than the required threshold information rate.
_	It is the probability that an outage will occur within a specified time period.
_	Exposure represents the probability that a given hazard will have some level of effect of a receptor of interest.
_	"S"(0) is commonly unity but can be less to represent the probability that the system fails immediately upon operation.
_	If, on the other hand, we wish to answer an interventional question: "What is the probability that it would rain, given that we wet the grass?" the answer would be governed by the post-intervention joint distribution function formula_8 obtained by removing the factor formula_9 from the pre-intervention distribution.
_	This is because even though the probability that the weaker solutions will survive is low, it is not zero which means it is still possible they will survive; this is an advantage, because there is a chance that even weak solutions may have some features or characteristics which could prove useful following the recombination process.
_	The IOTA models can be used to estimate the probability that an adnexal tumor is malignant.
_	The number of possible combinations in this random sequence is 27, or about 10, so the probability that the monkey will produce a given sequence is extremely low.
_	As such formula_5 can be interpreted as the probability that the player's "true" skill is formula_6.
_	This is related to the probability that if we choose formula_138 uniformly at random and form formula_139 by flipping each bit of formula_140 with probability formula_141, then the majority stays the same:
_	Hence there are about formula_39 derangements and the probability that a random permutation is a derangement is formula_40
_	Architectonics theory, the brain's global EM field modifies the electric charges across neural membranes, and thereby influences the probability that particular neurons will fire, providing a feed-back loop that drives free will.
_	Once a satisfactory value of formula_22 has been found, the blocking probability formula_3 and the recall factor can be used to calculate the probability that all of a caller's attempts are lost, not just their first call but also any subsequent retries.
_	As stated above, the probability that no two birthdays coincide is
_	It expresses its output in terms of Game Winning Chance, which is the probability that the specified team will win the current game.
_	Using 130 years of data on historical migrations to the United States, one study finds "that a doubling of the number of residents with ancestry from a given foreign country relative to the mean increases by 4.2 percentage points the probability that at least one local firm invests in that country, and increases by 31% the number of employees at domestic recipients of FDI from that country.
_	where formula_47 is the probability that a given interarrival time is
_	C formula expresses the probability that an arriving customer will need to queue (as opposed to immediately being served).
_	The "First Passage Time Density" (FPTD) is the probability that a particle has "first" reached a point formula_16 at time formula_14.
_	Based on past observations, we can infer the parameters of this random process, and from there evaluate the probability that the sun will rise tomorrow.
_	The kinship coefficient is a simple measure of relatedness, defined as the probability that a pair of randomly sampled homologous alleles are identical by descent.
_	More simply, it is the probability that an allele selected randomly from an individual, i, and an allele selected at the same autosomal locus from another individual, j, are identical and from the same ancestor.
_	If the events "E" are independent and the sum of the probabilities of the "E" diverges to infinity, then the probability that infinitely many of them occur is 1.
_	By the union bound, the probability that there exists a bad hypothesis in formula_83 is at most formula_84, which is less than formula_85 if formula_86.
_	The Survival function S(t), is the probability that a subject survives longer than time t. S(t) is theoretically a smooth curve, but it is usually estimated using the Kaplan-Meier (KM) curve.
_	With the data taken until the end of 2016, a preliminary upper limit can be set for the probability that the Pauli exclusion principle is violated in an atom of
_	Since the non-zero elements of formula_3 are chosen randomly from a continuous distribution the probability that this summation equals exactly formula_62 is zero.
_	Consider the problem of estimating the probability that a test point in "N"-dimensional Euclidean space belongs to a set, where we are given sample points that definitely belong to that set.
_	Maxwell–Boltzmann statistics gives the probability that the nth particle has momentum formula_25 and coordinate formula_26 as
_	In other words, formula_71 being the mean of the set of observations, the probability that the mean of the distribution is inferior to UCL is equal to the confidence level 1 − "a".
_	For a given point "p" and constant "a">0, define "Pr(a,p,o)" as the probability that a random line through "o" lies at a distance of less than "a" from "p".
_	The phrase 'Polkey deduction' has become a standard concept in UK Employment Tribunals, as a result of this case and later ones, meaning that even if a Tribunal decides a dismissal was unfair, it must separately decide whether the compensatory award is to be awarded in full, or be reduced by a percentage based on their estimate of the probability that the dismissal would have occurred anyway, even had a fair process been followed.
_	Finally, the probability that an individual actually has the disease, given that the test result is positive:
_	The argument is then to infer from the huge size of the phase space that the probability that the entity could appear by chance is exceedingly low, ignoring the key process involved, natural selection.
_	Brand advertising can increase the probability that a consumer will include a given brand in his or her consideration set.
_	The random walker algorithm was initially motivated by labeling a pixel as object/background based on the probability that a random walker dropped at the pixel would first reach an object (foreground) seed or a background seed.
_	The quality of the issue refers to the probability that the bondholders will receive the amounts promised at the due dates.
_	If the number of peaks exceeding grows as a Poisson process, then the probability that at time there has not yet been any peak exceeding is .
_	He demonstrated that social desirability ratings of personality trait descriptions are very highly correlated with the probability that a subsequent group of people will endorse these trait self-descriptions.
_	In his first demonstration of this pattern, the correlation between one group of college students’ social desirability ratings of a set of traits and the probability that college students in a second group would endorse self-descriptions describing the same traits was so high that it could distort the meaning of the personality traits.
_	In cold fusion reactions, the produced fused nuclei have a relatively low excitation energy (~10–20 MeV), which decreases the probability that these products will undergo fission reactions.
_	However, the probability that monkeys filling the observable universe would type a complete work such as Shakespeare's "Hamlet" is so tiny that the chance of it occurring during a period of time hundreds of thousands of orders of magnitude longer than the age of the universe is "extremely" low (but technically not zero).
_	If "m" is the number of bits in the array, the probability that a certain bit is not set to 1 by a certain hash function during the insertion of an element is
_	In cold fusion reactions (which use heavier projectiles, typically from the fourth period, and lighter targets, usually lead and bismuth), the fused nuclei produced have a relatively low excitation energy (~10–20 MeV), which decreases the probability that these products will undergo fission reactions.
_	Fission chain reactions are generally driven by the probability that free neutrons will result in fission and is determined by the material and geometric properties of the reactor.
_	By increasing boric acid concentration in the reactor coolant, the probability that a neutron will cause fission is reduced.
_	The geometric distribution gives the probability that the first occurrence of success requires "k" independent trials, each with success probability "p".
_	If the probability of success on each trial is "p", then the probability that the "k"th trial (out of "k" trials) is the first success is
_	In geometric probability theory, Wendel's theorem, named after James G. Wendel, gives the probability that "N" points distributed uniformly at random on an "n"-dimensional hypersphere all lie on the same "half" of the hypersphere.
_	In other words, one seeks the probability that there is some hyperplane intersecting the center of the hypersphere such that all the points lie on the same side of the hyperplane.
_	Trunked radio takes advantage of the probability that with any given number of user units, not everyone will need channel access at the same time, therefore fewer discrete radio channels are required.
_	For example, the probability that a given object weighs "exactly" 500 g is zero, because the probability of measuring exactly 500 g tends to zero as the accuracy of our measuring instruments increases.
_	A genealogical DNA test allows two individuals to find the probability that they are, or are not, related within an estimated number of generations.
_	The probability that the first gene originates from genotype i in the seed orchard is p, and the probability that the second originates from genotype j is p.
_	For the same reason, "p"-values do not give the probability that the data were produced by random chance alone.
_	The theory behind such a market is that the monetary value of a futures contract on an event reflects the probability that that event will actually occur, since a market's actors rationally bid a contract either up or down based on reliable information.
_	The goal of the simulation is to show the user the different possible outcomes of his decisions, along with the probability that each outcome will occur.
_	The researchers wanted to examine the impact of firearms and other deadly weapons on: (1) the probability that threatening situations escalated to a physical attack, (2) the probability that injuries resulted from a physical attack, and (3) the probability that death resulted from a physical attack.
_	The purpose of dive planning is to increase the probability that a dive will be completed safely and the goals achieved.
_	These psychological subtleties increase the probability that spectators will believe the illusion:
_	Then, for large (such as one million) the probability that nothing will be won is approximately and tends to this value as tends to infinity.
_	The larger trip has two notable differences over the smaller traditional type: increased leverage, which requires less force from the rodent to trip it; and the larger surface area of the trip increases the probability that even the most cunning of rodents will set off the trap.
_	The final step is finding the probability that a compound is active and then ranking each compound based on its probability of being active.
_	Assume that at the individual level, being Protestant impacts negatively one's tendency to commit suicide but the probability that one's neighbor commits suicide increases one's tendency to become Protestant.
_	Other topics of research in the logic of graphs include investigations of the probability that a random graph has a property specified within a particular type of logic, and methods for data compression based on finding logical formulae that are modeled by a unique graph.
_	Both are accompanied with a link to a digital download of the music, acknowledging the probability that purchasers might be unable to play the vinyl recording.
_	However, questions remain unanswered in regard to the lack of fingerprints on the weapon and the probability that the police who found Nugan had prior knowledge of his death.
_	As a result of the symbiotic relationship between commensals and the immune system, the probability that pathogens will reach sufficient numbers to cause illness is reduced.
_	Quantitative risk assessment requires calculations of two components of risk : the magnitude of the potential loss, and the probability that the loss will occur.
_	Bliss requested commission to China reportedly because he believed in "the probability that, at no distant day, it will occupy the position of supreme influence among nations of the East."
_	In 1902 and 1903 Walter Sutton suggested that chromosomes, which segregate in a Mendelian fashion, are hereditary units: "I may finally call attention to the probability that the association of paternal and maternal chromosomes in pairs and their subsequent separation during the reducing division … may constitute the physical basis of the Mendelian law of heredity".
_	If a point formula_96 is sampled from a countable formula_3 union of Poisson processes, then the probability that the point formula_96 belongs to the formula_323th Poisson process formula_324 is given by:
_	formula_70 is the probability that a life age formula_41 will survive to age formula_65.
_	What is the probability that the cab involved in the accident was Blue rather than Green knowing that this witness identified it as Blue?
_	Reliability is defined as the probability that a device will perform its intended function during a specified period of time under stated conditions.
_	Due to the probability that the mission will go wrong, Microscope is forced to accompany Caprice.
_	While the probability that a UUID will be duplicated is not zero, it is close enough to zero to be negligible.
_	Good gives an example of background knowledge with respect to which the observation of a black raven "decreases" the probability that all ravens are black:
_	Particle decay is a Poisson process, and hence the probability that a particle survives for time "t" before decaying is given by an exponential distribution whose time constant depends on the particle's velocity:
_	In the context of a set of examples (or instances) in a data set, instance hardness measures the probability that an instance will be misclassified ( formula_12 where is the assigned class label and represent the input attribute value for an instance in the training set ).
_	Let "p" denote the probability that the microstate that system "S" is in has energy "E".
_	Now, if we assume that the number of humans who will ever be born equals "N", the probability that "X" is amongst the first 60 billion humans who have ever lived is of course 100%.
_	However, if the number of humans who will ever be born equals "N", then the probability that "X" is amongst the first 60 billion humans who have ever lived is only 1%.
_	A history of devaluation of the group that becomes the victim, past violence against the group that becomes the perpetrator leading to psychological wounds, authoritarian cultures and political systems, and the passivity of internal and external witnesses (bystanders) all contribute to the probability that the violence develops into genocide.
_	Now, if "z" is drawn from uniform distribution, the probability that the above algorithm accepts is ≤ 1/2, since the size of image is 1/2 of the size of the pre-image.
_	Using the same probabilities that the hypercalcemia would have occurred in the first place by the other canditate conditions, the probability that hypercalcemia would have occurred in the first place is 0.00335, and given the fact that hypercalcemia "has occurred" gives adjusted probabilities of 37.3%, 6.0%, 14.9% and 41.8%, respectively, for primary hyperparathyroidism, cancer, other conditions and no disease.
_	If a number of events are independent (in probability theory) of one another, the probability that none of the events occur can be easily calculated.
_	For example, if cancer is related to age, then, using Bayes’ theorem, a person’s age can be used to more accurately assess the probability that they have cancer, compared to the assessment of the probability of cancer made without knowledge of the person's age.
_	the probability that the element is not covered is less than formula_88.
_	Chebyshev's inequality uses the variance to bound the probability that a random variable deviates far from the mean.
_	Assuming a sequence of independent and identically distributed input signals (for example, symbols from a binary alphabet chosen by coin tosses), if the machine is in state "y" at time "n", then the probability that it moves to state "x" at time "n" + 1 depends only on the current state.
_	The expression formula_16 is the probability that the vector of variables formula_9 has values equal to the vector formula_10.
_	Several websites used poll aggregation and psephology to estimate the probability that the Republican Party would gain enough seats to take control of the Senate.
_	The first way is to define the cdf formula_65 of a random vector formula_66 as the probability that all components of formula_66 are less than or equal to the corresponding values in the vector formula_28:
_	The forecasts represent the probability that freezing rain or combined snow/sleet accumulations will meet specific criteria within a 24-hour period.
_	And the probability that during any particular period t=(2n+1)T to t=(2n+2)T, no node will begin transmission is
_	In contrast to the experience at Anzio, jammers seemed to have had a major impact on operations after April 1944, with significant degradation observed in the probability that a Hs 293 launched at a target (and responding to operator guidance) would achieve a hit or damage-causing near miss.
_	The asymptotic availability, i.e. availability over a long period, of the system is equal to the probability that the model is in state 1 or state 2.
_	Equivalently, r(t)Δt is the probability that a spike occurs during this time interval.
_	Under this criterion, estimator A is preferred to estimator B if the probability that estimator A is closer to the true value than estimator B is greater than one half.
_	The Chebyshev inequality states that if formula_1 is a random variable with standard deviation "σ" > 0, then the probability that the outcome of formula_1 is no less than formula_3 away from its mean is no more than formula_4:
_	A risk assessment identifies recognized threats and threat actors and the probability that these factors will result in an exposure or loss.
_	The first, formula_6, is the number of nucleation sites multiplied by the probability that a nucleus of critical size has grown around it.
_	Terrorist financing generated through the use of underground smuggling tunnels and the probability that a specific smuggling tunnel or terrorist criminal social network will use the smuggling tunnel to launch a kidnapping operation or terrorist attack has been addressed in the literature.
_	the probability that one of the formula_89 bad events happens
_	For every invalid proof, the probability that the checker will accept it must be low.
_	More specifically, TV reflects the probability that the option will gain in IV — become (more) profitable to exercise before it expires.
_	If a reimbursement process is made cumbersome or inconvenient to the applicant, then the probability that the applicant will successfully obtain the funds decreases, regardless of legitimacy, resulting in fewer paid reimbursement claims overall.
_	What is the probability that one sees a "1" at least once?
_	Semantically, the transition probability is the probability that the symbol "o" is received given that "i" was transmitted over the channel.
_	If we measure formula_68 in the state formula_69 then the probability that we simultaneously measure formula_70 is given by formula_71.
_	As mentioned before, we would like to obtain separate confidence limits for each of the differences formula_32 such that the probability that all formula_16 confidence intervals will contain the corresponding formula_34 is equal to formula_20.
_	Turnbull announced that the FTTP rollout would continue in the short term, with the probability that rollout will be downgraded to 'alternative technologies' such as Fibre to the node after a 60-day review was completed.
_	The eigenvalues formula_19 are the possible outcomes of the experiment, and their corresponding coefficient formula_22 is the probability that this outcome will occur; it is often called the "transition probability".
_	The problem of de Montmort is to find the probability that "none" of the hats gets put into the right box.
_	The advantage is that, with random bases, one can get a bound on the probability that "n" is composite.
_	If "X" is a zeta-distributed random variable with parameter "s", then the probability that "X" takes the integer value "k" is given by the probability mass function
_	Risk is the probability that exposure to a hazard will lead to a negative consequence, or more simply, a hazard poses no risk if there is no exposure to that hazard.
_	It takes a number of health factors from a patient and, using precalculated logistic regression coefficients, attempts to quantify the probability that they will survive to discharge.
_	Steganalysis has an interesting difference from most other types of detection, in that it can often only determine the probability that a hidden message exists; this is in contrast to the detection of signals which are simply encrypted, as the ciphertext can often be identified with certainty, even if it cannot be decoded.
_	A voice-over then says that "an actuary of the British newspaper "The Sunday Times" calculated the probability that all these people who witnessed the assassination would die within that period of time to be 100,000 trillion to one".
_	So, for example, as in the theory of projective measurement, the probability that the outcome associated with measurement of operator formula_9 occurs
_	"Let formula_1 be an arbitrary system subject to changes in time formula_10 and let formula_2 be an arbitrary event that is a stimulus for the system formula_1: we say that formula_1 is an adaptive system if and only if when t tends to infinity formula_14 the probability that the system formula_1 change its behavior formula_
_	16 in a time step formula_17 given the event formula_2 is equal to the probability that the system change its behavior independently of the occurrence of the event formula_2.
_	To overcome this difficulty Zech suggested conditioning the probability that formula_41 on the observation that formula_42, where formula_43 is the (unmeasurable) number of background events.
_	Let formula_56 be the probability that, by the end of game 4, the gambler has at least $6, given that she has $formula_45 at the beginning of game formula_8.
_	This is the probability that k=0.
_	Now, notice that since the square has area 1, the probability that the dart will hit any particular subregion of the square equals the area of that subregion.
_	For example, the probability that the dart will hit the right half of the square is 0.5, since the right half has area 0.5.
_	Then, the probability that be the largest of the four numbers is equal to the probability that both is at least as large as and is at least as large as , that is, .
_	In probability theory, Kolmogorov's inequality is a so-called "maximal inequality" that gives a bound on the probability that the partial sums of a finite collection of independent random variables exceed some specified bound.
_	This can also be thought of as the fraction of total diversity that is not a consequence of the average diversity within subpopulations, where diversity is measured by the probability that two randomly selected alleles are different, namely formula_5.
_	The output of decision trees is a class probability estimate formula_117, the probability that formula_3 is in the positive class.
_	TPC-W standard describes all pages that must be present in the shop (including sample HTML code), interaction graphs (how the user navigates between the pages), transition tables (that is the probability that the user will move from page A to page B) and database schema.
_	Some ethograms are given in pictorial form and not only catalogue the behaviours but indicate the frequency of their occurrence and the probability that one behaviour follows another.
_	"While Bart may be familiar with the canon of Chilean poetry, the joke takes its force in part from the probability that "The Simpsons"<nowiki>'</nowiki> viewers are not."
_	The interest rate on a loan is determined not only by the time value of money, but also by the lender's estimate of the probability that the borrower will default on the loan.
_	Such further consideration can be performed, for example, by an epidemiology-based differential diagnostic procedure, where potential candidate conditions are listed that may explain the finding, followed by calculations of how probable they are to have occurred in the first place, in turn followed by a comparison with the probability that the result would have occurred by random variability.
_	The probability density function describes the infinitesimal probability of any given value, and the probability that the outcome lies in a given interval can be computed by integrating the probability density function over that interval.
_	On the other hand, the cumulative distribution function describes the probability that the random variable is no larger than a given value; the probability that the outcome lies in a given interval can be computed by taking the difference between the values of the cumulative distribution function at the endpoints of the interval.
_	"Risk is the probability that an event will occur.
_	In epidemiology, it is most often used to express the probability that a particular outcome will occur following a particular exposure."
_	If in an AB alloy the component A is sputtered preferentially, the surface of the solid will, during prolonged bombardment, become enriched in the B component, thereby increasing the probability that B is sputtered such that the composition of the sputtered material will ultimately return to AB.
_	A 2013 study of Milwaukee’s program posited that the use of vouchers increased the probability that a student would graduate from high school, go to college, and stay in college.
_	"What's the probability that Pat finishes on or before reaching the eighth house?"
_	If the synapse has already been subject to LTP, the threshold is raised, increasing the probability that a calcium influx will yield LTD.
_	According to a 2001 study by Cecilia Rouse of Princeton and Claudia Goldin of Harvard, the introduction of blind auditions to American symphony orchestras increased the probability that a woman would advance from preliminary rounds by 50 percent.
_	Third, the links in the network are not binary; in fact, in many cases they represent the probability that there is a link.
_	Let "w(x)dx" be the probability that the "s"-th era terminates with the value formula_75 lying in a specified interval "dx".
_	In probability theory, Etemadi's inequality is a so-called "maximal inequality", an inequality that gives a bound on the probability that the partial sums of a finite collection of independent random variables exceed some specified bound.
_	where "π" is the probability that the system contains "k" customers.
_	As a consequence, he finds lower bounds on the probability that these patterns form in any sufficiently sparse and sufficiently large random initial condition for Life.
_	This strengthens the probability that "1991 VG" is a near Earth asteroid.
_	The system's effectiveness against aircraft diminished as planes became faster, but toward the end of World War II upgrades were made to the Mk37 System, and it was made compatible with the development of the VT (Variable Time) proximity fuze which exploded when it was near a target, rather than by timer or altitude, greatly increasing the probability that any one shell would destroy a target.
_	If a large number of nodes is trying to transmit, then by using Poisson distribution, the probability that exactly x nodes begin transmission during period T is
_	This parameter is the probability that a given coin lands heads up ("H") when tossed.
_	The 1% VaR is then -100, because the probability that he loses more than that is less than 1% while the probability that he loses less than zero (which is impossible) is less than 99%.
_	Ivacaftor is a potentiator of CFTR that is already at the cell surface, increasing the probability that the defective channel will be open and allow chloride ions to pass through the channel pore.
_	If "f" is the probability that "i" other calls are already active on the ingress switch, and "g" is the probability that "j" other calls are already active on the egress switch, the overall blocking probability is:
_	Furthermore, the probability that the coin comes up heads at most times can be exactly quantified by the following expression:
_	The birthday "paradox" refers to the result that even if the group is as small as 23 individuals, the probability that there is a pair of people with the same birthday is still above 50%.
_	The number of electrons also changes because of the probability that each photon results in an emitted electron are a function of photon energy.
_	This would involve weighing the changes in utility in each option by the probability that each option will occur, something that subject X ignores.
_	The understanding achieved by these geneticists spanned the action of natural selection on alleles (alternative forms of a gene), the Hardy-Weinberg equilibrium, the evolution of continuously-varying traits (like height), and the probability that a new mutation will become fixed.
_	For any node formula_67 different from formula_65 or formula_66, the probability that formula_67 is not simultaneously connected to both formula_65 and formula_66 is formula_73.
_	Thus, the probability that none of the formula_74 nodes provides a path of length formula_75 between nodes formula_65 and formula_66 is formula_78.
_	In probability theory, a random variable "Y" is said to be mean independent of random variable "X" if and only if its conditional mean E("Y" | "X"="x") equals its (unconditional) mean E("Y") for all "x" such that the probability that "X" = "x" is not zero.
_	Let formula_26 be the probability that formula_25 predicts the formula_3st bit correctly, i.e.
_	That is, for any (Borel set) formula_63, the probability that a particle, starting either at the origin or uniformly distributed in formula_6, exhibiting Brownian motion in formula_6, reflecting when it hits formula_66, and escaping once it hits formula_42, ends up escaping from formula_3 is
_	The Rare Earth equation, unlike the Drake equation, does not factor the probability that complex life evolves into intelligent life that discovers technology (Ward and Brownlee are not evolutionary biologists).
_	Observe that since formula_11 is a random permutation, formula_23 is also a random permutation, so the probability that formula_14 is adjacent to formula_
_	Classifying an event can be generally described as the probability that an observed measurement x was a result of event ω.
_	One demographic consequence of a small population size is the probability that all offspring in a generation are of the same sex, and where males and females are equally likely to be produced (see sex ratio), is easy to calculate: it is given by formula_1
_	To calculate the risk factor in our 2x2 game, consider the expected payoff to a player if they play H: formula_1 (where "p" is the probability that the other player will play H), and compare it to the expected payoff if they play G: formula_2.
_	Since the Calvo probability is constant and does not depend on how long it has been since the price was set, the probability that it will survive i "more" periods is given by exactly the same geometric distribution for all formula_3.
_	What is the probability that there are zero boys before the first girl, one boy before the first girl, two boys before the first girl, and so on?
_	This marketing relationship also emphasizes the probability that, to avoid confusion, there was more interaction between the different German firms making the models.
_	If we think of formula_5 as a property, then the formula states that as formula_42 varies, the derivative of the probability that formula_5 occurs at formula_42 equals the average sensitivity at formula_42.
_	where formula_16 is the probability that a new node possesses a knowledge about the global network.
_	This means that if one chooses an -vertex graph uniformly at random among all graphs on labeled vertices, then the probability that such a sentence will be true for the chosen graph approaches one in the limit as approaches infinity.
_	That is, when , the probability that a specific point (for example, the origin) is contained in an open cluster (meaning a maximal connected set of "open" edges of the graph) of size decays to zero exponentially in .
_	It is a measure of the reward that can be achieved by the process evolving from that state on, under the probability that it will be terminated in future.
_	Then the number formula_61 is the probability that a random walk of length "k" starting at "v" ends at "w".
_	The error of guessing wrong is equal to the probability formula_46 that the formula_5 state was sent, which is 50% as it is assumed either state is equally likely to be sent, times the probability that a zero detection result can occur when the displaced state is formula_37.
_	If the previous generation had an allele with frequency p, then the probability that the next generation has k of that allele is:
_	However, there is no particular number of trials that guarantees that outcome; rather, the probability that it will already have occurred approaches but never quite reaches 100%.
_	In particular, if "B" is a majority in "A" (i.e. "r" > 0.5) we can bound the probability that "B" will remain majority in "S" ("r">0.5) by taking: "d" = 1 - 1 / (2 "r"):
_	Hence the probability that the larger amount of money is in a small interval around "a" of length "h" and Envelope A contains the larger amount is approximately formula_49.
_	Statistically, the level of downside risk can be calculated as the product of the probability that harm occurs (e.g., that an accident happens) multiplied by the severity of that harm (i.e., the average amount of harm or more conservatively the maximum credible amount of harm).
